title,selftext,subreddit
New Moderation Team &amp; other news!,"Hello!

The r/Pickup subreddit now has a new moderation team! The old moderator got his account suspended, so I requested to take over this subreddit.

# Stylesheet

I made some changes to the aspect of the subreddit. It's not complete yet, I'm still working on it, but I think it looks better than the old design. If anyone wants to help, feel free to [modmail](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Fpickup&amp;subject=Stylesheet%20Contributor) or contact me on [Discord](https://discord.gg/J55ystH).

# Sidebar

I'm working on creating content for the sidebar! I'm looking to compile a list of beginner resources so new people coming to our subreddit can get started fast. [Modmail](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Fpickup&amp;subject=Apply%20for%20Sidebar+Contribuitor!&amp;message=Let%20us%20know%20for%20how%20long%20have%20you%20been%20into%20pickup%20%26%20seduction%20and%20how%20can%20you%20help%20us!) or contact me on [Discord](https://discord.gg/J55ystH) if you would like to contribute.

# Discord

We have a discord server, hurray!

You can use the following link to join:

https://discord.gg/J55ystH

# Regarding Self-Promotion

For the time being, no self promotion will be allowed on this subreddit. The subreddit is full of youtubers just sharing their videos without contributing with anything else to the community. We need to decide on a set of rules/community guidelines in regards to this, so if you want to express your opinion, you can do so in Discord where we have a feedback channel.

# Sharing of paid content

Sharing or requesting of pickup programs, books or any other paid content is not allowed. We have recieved DMCA requests and we don't want to get this subreddit banned. There are other subreddits dedicated to sharing pickup content, so please use those.",pickup
Ask Karisma King Anything. Friday 1PM PST.,"Hello!

We are very happy to announce that [Karisma King](https://www.youtube.com/channel/UCRz-96Yzlz5uAba9vPVGRJA/videos?sub_confirmation=1) (Denton Fisher) will be holding an AMA this Friday, Oct. 12 at 1PM PST on our sub-reddit!

You can leave your questions in this thread and he'll answer them.

Social Media Links:

* [YouTube](https://www.youtube.com/channel/UCRz-96Yzlz5uAba9vPVGRJA/videos?sub_confirmation=1)

* [Instagram](https://www.instagram.com/the_karisma_klan_/)

* [Facebook](https://www.facebook.com/thekarismaclan)

Thank you!

***

PS: **We recommend everyone to leave their questions in advance in this thread!**",pickup
The Art Of Writing Field Reports,,pickup
Think I got outgamed by a friend,"So I was out on a weekend with an almost friend and some other people. Met this gorgeous girl and we had a great talk from the first second. Though she was a lot like me. At one point I think I had my chance. I took her to the bar and tried to make out with her. Had my hands on her legs and she said she ""wouldn't get sexual on the first day"", so we could as well just go back to the dancefloor. She did not take my hand away, but eventually I pulled back. I am pretty sure I blew my chance there by giving in. Did take her number though.

So she said she wanted to go home soon anyway and we went back to the dancefloor. She and her girlfriend left the floor with the guy I know then. Haven't seen them afterwards. He is pretty fast on the trigger with girls. I used to be like him, when I was younger until a relationship emotionally traumatized me. I am not as good with girls anymore since.

Well next day we exchanged a few texts and when I was asking to meet, she was telling me that she wasn't romantically interested in me. Well, I guess that is because I blew my chance and would like to get a second one. I know I should just take her words for true, but I know that attraction is constantly changing. I was just being a coward and that is why. Thing is that I think my friend did her and that kind of conflicts with my ego as well. I should just relax and don't take it personally I guess. I just told him earlier that I was into her. I don't know if I should just ask him, because if I don't want to show him I am afraid that he did. Stupid game...",pickup
Where should i start?,"Tl;Dr my 5 year long relationship ended. Where do I start? 

Long story short ... I broke up with my gf after 5 years. It's been 9 months now and I think she moved on so I kind of need to as well. Only issue is ... I'm 25, full time job (long hours) where do I meet someone? I work in technology so on my floor there are 30 guys ... No women at all. My circle of friends is mostly guys with 2 girls that are in long term relationships. I hate clubs and I don't really have anyone to go with anyway. I'm not much into ONS. I think I'm looking for a decent girl to get into another proper relationship. Where and how should I start because I have no clue.  ",pickup
The art of pickup Game is dying,"It’s sad that when I look to talk game with other pua nobody posting in the groups I’m new to reddit so when I check for groups for like minded individuals I see old threads on pick up . It pains me to see guys in the club pretending to be Bartenders taking drink orders for every cute girl. Or using that “ do you come here often “or “are you having a good time ,” same talk . I guess RIP ",pickup
Success with pickup at new school,"I'm 17 years old, in grade 12 currently.  I started a new school this year and decided that I was going to practice game. Before starting this school I had 0 experience with sex or hadn't really kissed a girl.. mostly of my lack to put myself out there and negative beliefs about myself. I changed my life through self improvement, self reflection, reading, meditating, cold showers, positive affirmations, and of course, Nofap. Went into this school with confidence and drive, because I wasn't going to be that lonely depressed kid with self esteem like I was in the past. I know that you always have the power to change something and you can be anything you want to be. I built up a tremendous social life in the first 4 weeks (social proof) despite not knowing anyone from the start. I practically introduced and befriended anyone I'd meet in a social setting. I befriended other high value males. I approached lots of girls.. (maybe a little too many) but I got so many numbers, lots of attraction from girls, because they could see that I was happy with myself and my own energy, completely 100% authentic and didn't care what anyone thinks of me. I got multiple make outs, and some other sexual experiences. I used techniques such as push/pull, leading, ect but mostly used natural game. What I would do is create a sexual vibe and bring girls w/ me to different places around the city and we'd make out on the first date, ect. I've had alot of different experiences with girls in the past 2 months and realized that it's not all that I thought it would be, and that girls aren't to be the main purpose in your life. What I'd like to say to you guys is that you can be anything you want to be as long as you are motivated enough to do it and willing to face the challenges.

The way I live my life is to do thing I am scared of, to do things people wouldn't traditionally do because they are afraid. When I consistently do this I make myself a man of action - a man of purpose.

Game has taught me one very powerful thing, that you can become anything you want to be, and that, my friends, is priceless.",pickup
Best PUA courses,"Guys what are the pick up courses you recommend?
",pickup
Anyone have deleted videos from RSDTyler and RSDJulien's channel? The ones that got deleted last week.,"They went down during a week ago, does anyone have backups?",pickup
How to deal with her friends?,"Guys i’m gaming in a venue where a lot of girls are sitting down which is already hard or standing in groups. My issue was keeping a convo going but it seems to be going well now.

My problem now is : how to isolate her or deal with her friends. Basically my problem is how can I get her to invest without seeming like a slut infront of her friends. Nothing on RSD explains this. ",pickup
The Top Ten Pickup Artists In The World (Part 4),,pickup
Looking for some advice on a conversation Im having with a lady.,"So I am talking to this lady that I met on a Tinder like app. We are gonna meet this week in person but so far we are talking lot. I am making loads of jokes and getting a good vibe.  


But our texts are getting pretty long. And she suggested to become pen pals in a romantic way. And it caught me by surprise and not sure how to come back. Not really interested until I meet her. But she is artsy and all.  


Any idea on how to go about this guys? Thanks",pickup
"other than hot girls,yachts,jets what can a playboy like Dan Bilzerian get from life?!","Seriously, what's there to do after you live a luxurious lifestyle like Dan Bilzerian?",pickup
Looking for a regular wing in hongkong,"Sup guys, Im looking for a regular wingman to go out with in Hongkong. Shoot me a pm if any of you guys are down!",pickup
Any moderately successful pua’s in the Sacramento area down to sarge?,Lemme kno wing got a serious Gf so i need a new one,pickup
"Caught myself acting needy, any help?","Hey, im 18 and just starting out at uni. Im about 5'11 and have a muscular physique and tanned skin, girls usually tend to find me quite attractive. I'm not saying this to boast or show off, just to have you guys get into my situation. I pulled 3 girls in the last month (not great ik haha but I'm only just starting in pickup and Lost my virginity 3 months ago) and hooked up with around 15 or so in clubs. I use this as a way to explain that I'm not exactly a very needy person and imo have some small measure of abundance. 

However, recently I hooked up with one girl and hooked up again with her a couple days ago. This is important because she's the first girl Ive ever seen more than once after a hookup. I've started to catch feelings for her (something I've not experienced before) and I think she has too. I haven't pulen her yet because her friends all told me she likes taking things slowly so I've given her a bit of space. But last time we saw each other (second time we hooked up) I told her I kinda liked her and was willing to stop talking to all the girls I was currently trying to pull (around 4 or so), because I thought this would show her that I liked her and was willing to commit. Everrything looked fine and we made out for most of the night and cuddled somewhat. Over the next two days (yesterday and today) we have msgd back and forth but havent been able to meet due to her being tired and both of us feeling sick. However I think that my display of feelings and then over message having asked her a couple times to come over to my place might have been just a bit too needy for her liking and may have put her off a bit.

What dyou guys think of the situation and how I handled it, and dyou think I should go back to gaming other girls so I dont come across as needy with this one or dyou think I should focus on her and show her I dont have any other girls on the line? 

TL;DR: caught feelings for a girl but fear I might have been a bit too needy for her liking: pursue this girl, show her I have abundance, go back to regular game or focus on her and no one else?",pickup
Does Race Matter In Attracting Woman?,,pickup
Some good text/online/snapchat instagram game programs?,"Hey guys,

Can anyone recommend me a good program for online game?
Preferred about: Snapchat, Instagram, Tinder and Bumble.
Like how to set up a profile with a good bio and pictures.

Or something in general about good text game (with some examples)

I'm a big fan of todd his work, but i feel like when it comes down to texting or online game in general i could use some more.

Thanks in advance!

",pickup
"""PUA"" Mastermind/Wingman - Wroclaw, Poland. (OR any other Polish City but Mainly Wroclaw)","What's up fellow friends.

Currently Living in Wroclaw and would like to connect with like-minded individuals that want to improve their gaming skills for both, Day game and Night Game.

It'll be cool if we could build quite of a small Mastermind group as well and meet up somewhere and chat plus do some game.

&amp;#x200B;

It doesn't matter if you are a Fan or Hate any so-called PUA program or company. As long as you want to grow and make new connections, you're welcomed.

Reply to this thread if you want to join.

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;",pickup
University of Twente - Any wingmans here?,"Hey guys, Looking for people to game with around Enschede/Hengelo in the Netherlands, anybody on this sub?",pickup
Any Filipinos here who knows a good pick up place in Manila?,,pickup
Why Men Pull Away &amp; What to Do When It Happens?,,pickup
"Apparently I’m a hunk, but pick up skills are not good.","Guys, I’ve been getting a lot of looks from ladies they stare and sometimes even stare at my crotch, but I’m lacking the skills to approach this is frustrating for me and I’m sure the ladies too. What is a good reaction to a stare and how do I approach, these instances usually catch me off guard as I don’t expect them, I usually keep walking let say in the opposite direction and think to myself, dam it, how do I turn back and say something, what’s a good thing to say? This would be a great help guys! ",pickup
Testing for character," Guys, I have a question for you. How do you test a potential girl for character traits? I'm interested in testing both for positive traits and for negative ones.

Such character screening is extremely important and that's what smart women always do to guys. Could you share your tricks?

I'll start first. 

 Observing how she interacts with the waiters. This shows whether she is kind and considerate to people who depend on her. "" You judge a person by how they act towards those who cannot do anything to them or for them"". Martin Luther King. Those who are rude to waitstaff are usually cunts to you as well.

 Doing something good for the person and seeing if they reciprocate. Here, you check for gratefulness and kindness as a trait of character or at least proper manners as a result of a good upbringing.

 Multiple tattoos and piercings. A possible marker of borderline personality disorders. There was even a study about that. 

 What are your tricks that you used successfully and traits that you screen for? What's your reason for using that test? How's the success? Please list your age as well.",pickup
How To Become A Friend Making Machine,,pickup
Talmadge Harper - harperhealing.com AMA,"Hello!

Talmadge Harper will be holding an AMA on our subreddit.

You can ask him anything in the comments below!

&gt; My name is Talmadge Harper. I am an ultra depth certified Hypnotist and Healer. Every product here meets the highest standards of effectiveness and quality. I encourage you to check out the testimonials. You will be hard pressed to see any other hypnosis service provide such a dynamic array of profound and effective results. I take great pride in being available for my clients. 

www.harperhealing.com

[Contact Talmadge Harper](https://www.harperhealing.com/index.php?main_page=contact_us)

Thank you!

***

**Leave your questions in this thread!**",pickup
"Those who went through transformation mastery, let’s discuss it","Do you feel it really works? In my experience, it seems like total bullshit. The benefits I received are the same ones I would have with Mindfulness meditation, nothing of that “trauma release” stuff, high vibrational energy and etc. What is your opinion and personal experience? (Only on your OWN experience)",pickup
Frank Nightgame,"I saw a post asking what happened to him. I just want his affirmation videos. They were long, used a womans voice, and helped me many times from dark places. I cant find them or a copy any where. It was a 6 hour long video with many confidence boosting statements spoken by a woman with an accent. Anybody that can help i would greatly appreciate it.  

It seems there were two of them maybe? Idc about any of his other stuff just those affirmations. I cant find any really good long ones that use a womans voice. ",pickup
"Start backing up all RSD youtube videos, another media scandel is about to hit","Google youtube-dl or get the 4k video downloader of some other youtube downloader. 

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;",pickup
Top Ten Pickup Artists In The World (Part 3),,pickup
I am creating an app for day game/ night game,"Hi all,

I am creating an app that would let you pick a place and a time to do day game/ night game, and other people can hit you up with your provided social media handles. I wanted to know if this community would use something like this, so I know it is something worth keep building. Please share your thoughts. :D ",pickup
Did Mystery Have Game?,,pickup
"Finishing school, working a lot, want to raise my vibration and be in state (POSITIVE MINDSET)","Ay guys. Whatup ?

OOOOOOOOOOO

Whatup?

As a guy who studies a lot, in his head for the biggest part of the day, I come to think about my past failures and beat myself up. This blocks me from getting to know more people and start taking more action in going out. 

How do I forget about my past shit, keep working hard in my field of engineering (not be a slacking off, fuck-boy), but still take consistent action?

Any professionals out here? Maybe you guys know some blog, book, or youtube references I can consult. Something in the realm of ""professional and pimp"".

Gracias lads. ",pickup
those interested in RSD (realsocialdynamics),[ Removed by reddit in response to a copyright notice. ],pickup
Has anyone used Talmadge Harper hypnosis/subliminal products?,I would like to hear the review of Talmadge Harper products. I have been  using his product for 30 days now (Alpha Protocol v3 Extreme) but no  results at all. I could not find many positive reviews (which are  genuine) on the internet also. So wondering if any of you have anything  to say.,pickup
"Cold approach got me a girlfriend, and how I regret falling so in love with her","So Ive been doing pickup for the past year and a half, going out regularly. 

One night (which I consider to be my best performing night so far) I made out with 5 girls in the span of 3 hours, and at the end of the night met a girl who ended up (after 5-6 months of dating) becoming my steady girlfriend. 

So this girlfriend I had was literally my dream girl, thin, blond, foreign, amazing girl to be with, just the perfect match for me. 

I honestly fell in love completely for her, something I had never felt before for a girl. 

That strong love I had for her made me want to \*almost\* move to her country and completely change and forget my current life. I told my friends to f off, I told my landlord I wanted to quit the lease, it was bad. 

At this point she had to go back to her home country so we just stayed in contact calling each other every day and so on, and every day she seemed to get more distant and distant from me. It was really weird seeing it happen, how she was slowly losing interest on me the more I told her what I was doing to move to her country for her. 

Then I realized the reason why she was slowly losing interest in me was because I was completely transforming my life just for her. The hustler guy with ambition that she fell for was now a guy that would do anything to keep her around and would walk on eggshells around her. 

Probably made her sick to think how I would turn if I actually moved to her country and lived with her. 

Anyways, 2 weeks later she sent me a text saying ""Hey I think we should just stay friends, youre great and I want to keep knowing about you but its not gonna work out"". I cried like a mofo. 

But it taught me a HUGE lesson, doesnt matter how much a girl likes you or how much you like a girl, the moment you're willing to put her over your life goals and ambitions, thats the moment you lose her. 

Just thought I'd share this here if anyone is going through what I was going. 

Keep building a life you're proud of, women are just the icing on the cake. 

Cheers! ",pickup
In search of a wingman in Groningen of the Netherlands,"I've been going out for almost 2 years now, the last year bearing the most improvement. Throughout that whole time I had a few wingmen here and there, but none who had the same passion and motivation to truly improve. Now, I've moved to Groningen to begin my studies and even though I'm already achieving new levels of success, I still feel like I need someone to share it with. 

Pickup is more fun with a friend. Someone to share your knowledge but also to learn from. So, please, don't be shy and take a step forward and who knows? We might end up reaching mastery together. 

Doesn't matter if you're a Beginner, Intermediate or Advanced, there's always something to learn from each other or, at the very least, there will be a lot of motivation to improve. PM me if you truly want to reach Mastery!",pickup
Moving to America for game,"Hey guys,

​

For a while now I've been thinking about moving to Las Vegas or Los Angeles to immerse myself in game. After quite some research I started to realise it's very hard for a European (I'm from Belgium) to immigrate legally. I don't really know how I can increase my chances to get a visum/green card. Ideally I would want to live, work and game in LV/LA (even if it's just for a year or 6 months), but I can understand that US employers are not really waiting for a Belgian guy. I don't have any special talents or skills that US companies could be interested in and I don't know anyone in the US.

​

Anyone here got any ideas or advice?

​

Gr Thijs",pickup
How to deal with retarded boyfriends&amp;husbands,"Where I live there are many outright retards who would start a fight with you just for talking with their girlfriend/wife.

Even asking her if she is single is sometimes considered a reason to fight by them.

Aside from this, there are many women who would lie that they don't have a husband only to find out later.

&amp;#x200B;

Is there a better solution except for self defense weapons and calling police on them?",pickup
How Do You Keep From Falling in Love?,"July was a great month for pickup, met alot of new girls, but met one I really liked and developed feelings for her.

&amp;#x200B;

Not sure if the feeling is mutual, but either way, how to the guys that are killing it (like RSDMax) keep from falling in love and just thinking about 1 girl?

&amp;#x200B;

I tried being coldhearted before but it's just not me. Actually effed me up for a bit. I don't want to be a symp either. So not sure what to do.",pickup
Warning on u/hot_shot77,"Answered my post on trading for my purchased Shogun Method Black Book 4 for Reseduction 2.0. 

Kept assuring me he has the new version but still sent the old Reseduction after I sent the link to BB4. 

Glad I didnt send the new Shogun Sequences and the other additional bonus. Should have listened to my intuition.

Lesson learned for me. 

But just a warning to anyone who will make a trade with him in the future.",pickup
RSD Mastermind DL,Does anyone have this or know where to download it?,pickup
"RSDMax's Girlfriend Game, what does it cover?","Is it for guy's that already have a girlfriend and want to keep her-so a relationship product? Or does it help a guy get a girlfriend? I haven't seen this product, so i have no idea what it's about, or what it covers. ",pickup
Is there an app for game?,"Did a quick search in Google Play and didn't find anything. Super open ended question, what tools/apps do you use to track your progress with game?",pickup
17 year old socially awkward hard case new to pick up and asking for advice,"2 months ago my eyes were opened. I discovered female beauty, but in a very unhealthy way. I was raised in a shitty super strict religion called the Jehovah’s witnesses. Because of this I’m really awkward, out of touch with reality, depressed, and a complete train wreck. So I have 0 game. 

I fell super hard for this gorgeous girl one of my classes, she was slightly tomboyish, very flirty, and super fucking hot. I will spare the painful details and just say that I lacked the social skills to even have a chance at getting her. She was kind of interested in me at first (flirty comments, touching my thigh, smiling and laughing at my jokes, and she had this luster in her eyes when she looked at me. I was really awkward around her because she always had me at full mast. lol

Sadly this did not last because I screwed it up. I got what they call “oneitis” and became obsessed. I saw her as the holy grail, and I put her on a pedestal. I could barely even talk to her out of fear, and I would sweat and my voice would crack. It was embarrassing. Over time, her flirtatious banter turned into mundane conversation, her adoration turned into what almost appeared to be disgust. The fire died. It sucked. It got so bad that sometimes we wouldn’t say a single word to each other the entire class period. 

The day after graduation I decided enough was enough and I told her that I was in love with her in a long winded letter via text. She never responded, I haven’t seen her since then. It devastated me. Now I understand that I need to crawl out of the rubble.  I’m a weirdo, and I need to learn game and general social skills.

I’m ready to start, but I’m not even at square one. Im as bad as they come. only have 3 friends, no social media presence, no social skills, social anxiety, and no game. Any and all advice would be appreciated. Also, I am going to college in January. I will be starting at community college and then transferring to Uni. Would it be a good idea to get good at pickup and then try to find her by transferring to her school ? I would have 2 solid years to hone my skills. Is this too creepy/stalkerish ? 

tl;dr:  I’m a socially awkward teen who was raised in a cult. I have such bad game that I scared away an awesome girl who actually made advances toward me. I want to improve my social skills, get good with women, and eventually find her again by going to the same school as her. How do I start ? And is going to her school a bad idea ? ",pickup
So is Justin Wayne fake?,In light of recent events,pickup
Any update on the rsd vs todd court case?,"There was some posters before the had the inside scoop. 

Im guessing rsd is losing because Todd is still releasing shit with no care for them. ",pickup
Who has squirting mastery?,,pickup
"RSD World Summit Rant/Review (Las Vegas: August 5th-11th, 2018).","This is going to be a fairly long and in-depth review/rant about the RSD World Summit that took place in Las Vegas over the past week (August 5th-11th2018). This is my view of the current state of RSD. I wrote this for myself…I needed to get my thoughts out on paper. However, I’ve decided to share it because I think a lot of you will find it interesting.

**Background**

Let me give this a little bit of background. I was a guy who had very moderate success with women pre-2016. I was a cool enough guy who had friends (not a complete chode) but I was never really able to pull on a consistent basis. I was introduced t0 RSD by a friend in the fall of 2015…and it really changed my life. 

I was drawn to RSD almost immediately – it really spoke to some of the frustrations I had been experiencing. I was especially fascinated with Owen. I thought his content in particular was highly relatable and engaging. I quickly began to employ his tactics in clubs. I was opening sets, talking about stupid random shit, spiking emotions, getting make-outs, etc. – I wasn’t closing a lot though. However, there is no doubt that I was all of a sudden getting better results, and that fueled my drive for more.

I have purchased 3 RSD products, including a Bootcamp, over the past couple of years. The Bootcamp gave me a lifetime free pass to World Summit. 

The first time I began to see the cracks in what RSD was teaching came on the Bootcamp. The instructor rubbed me the wrong way. He didn’t seem to be invested in any of us much at all. He would show up late and seem to be very indifferent about the weekend. If we questioned him too much he would often laugh it off or try to change the subject. Either that or he would berate us and try to break us down mentally to conform to his philosophies. I found myself sitting there at the end of the 3 days wondering why I felt the need to listen to this pseudo authority figure anyways? 

**Back To The Summit**

We got in on the Thursday morning – halfway through the Summit. First up that day was Max. I got down to the Summit room and started to meet some of the guys who would be attending. The general crowd in there was pretty fucking chode-ish. Many were asking weird, unhelpful questions, ham-fisting their strange personalities onto others, and fake laughing at the instructors’ lame antics.

The funny thing is that RSD promotes thinking for oneself and “unplugging from the Matrix”, while many of their clientele do the exact opposite and don’t think critically about what they’re being taught by these instructors. I was shocked at how many of them seemed to be completely plugged into the RSD Matrix. 

We all file into the conference room and some random guy (probably Max’s assistant or something) gets up on stage and asks the audience if they want to hear the story about how he banged his teacher – the crowd erupted in applause. I sat there bored out of my mind listening to this guy ramble on for half an hour about how he fucked his teacher (who apparently hated him). The guys around me were hanging on his every word; it was honestly so embarrassing…the whole dynamic was very cult-like. 

Once this guy was done telling his teacher story and a subsequently useless 3-some story, he tells the audience to give the loudest round of applause of their lives to Max, who is about to come on stage. Everyone went fucking wild. Members of the audience were jumping up and down on their chairs and screaming at the top of their lungs. This was some highly sycophantic behavior on full display. It’s hard to deny that there is an undercurrent of darkness and emptiness to all of this.

**Max**

RSD Max takes the stage and proceeds to give a speech that anyone who follows him or RSD has heard many times before. They seem to be completely fresh out of new ideas at this point. Max rambles on for two hours before he finally gets to the big upsell – his new product “Mentor Me Max”. Before I go on a tangent about this, I should say that Max said some good stuff. He gave some really interesting perspective on life and death and chasing your dreams and other stuff like that. 

RSD employs some strange manipulative marketing tactics. They tell their clients that they are ENOUGH today as they are, but they then begin to slowly manipulate that truth and break down their clients’ psyches over the next couple of hours (to the point where they actually feel the opposite way about themselves). Once their clients are in this vulnerable position, they bring in the upsell, and on top of that they load it up with a bunch of incentives to get people to BUY NOW!

So, Max winds his way down the road and finally gets to “Mentor Me Max”, his new 8-week program that will ACTUALLY get you laid with consistency. Every time RSD does this, they tend to discredit the products they’ve put out in the past. Max now claims that a Bootcamp just isn’t enough. It’s only three days. It can’t really change your results long term (which is in fact the opposite of what they claim when you are purchasing the Bootcamp). You must take his 8 week program to have consistently successful results with women! 

As someone who has followed this for a while, it’s easy to see that in a year or two all of a sudden it will be a 10 week or a 6 month program you need to really change. Max says that if you sign up today, you get to have breakfast with him and his “Mentor Me Max” team tomorrow! Pens start scribbling. Max also says that he doesn’t really care about making any more money than he is right now, but of course this program will go up from $2,500 to $3,500 in September, so you should really sign up TODAY…before you’ve had the chance to mull it over!

The upsell lasts for a good 60-90 minutes, with guys in the audience giving their own personal testimonials about how much the program has helped them. This 20 year old kid stands up and claims he has fucked 27 girls over the past 8 weeks of him doing this program. He then subsequently says that this proves you don’t need to be 21 to implement game on a high level. I honestly can’t see how this guy isn’t either an RSD hired hand or completely exaggerating his numbers. For a guy with the best game, 27 chicks over 8 weeks is logistically difficult in this time-bound world. Am I supposed to believe this very average guy has achieved these results because he took Max’s online program? Max then takes us through a bunch of testimonials (both written and video) of guys confirming their results…which I’m always highly skeptical of. The testimonials don’t really show us anything or prove anything to us…we are supposed to take their word for it.

I was thinking to myself as this was going on, “Do I really want my life to look like any of these instructors’?” There is something about the nuclear family that RSD subliminally and continuously discredits. I honestly wouldn’t trade my life with Max’s if you paid me. Jet setting around the world, fucking strippers and brain-dead blondes, and going clubbing every night doesn’t appeal to me as much as the idea of having a solid, deep connection with a girl, laying down roots, and achieving meaningful goals and shared experiences. This is where I feel at serious odds with RSD. Look, I know they support the idea of you finding the right girl and creating a life with her (if that’s what you want); however, I believe the way they approach this does not set you up for long-term happy relationships.

Max then ends his upsell and clients begin scribbling on their “Mentor Me Max” signup sheets, hands shaking with nervous excitement about how this will ACTUALLY be the answer to all of their pickup problems. And who knows…maybe it will? I can’t fault any of those students for trying.

**Tyler**

There is an approximately half-hour wait after Max’s seminar speech before Tyler takes the stage; this is the guy we have all been waiting for. Tyler is an incredibly powerful orator. He is light years beyond any of his RSD peers as a speaker. He has an energy and a presence that is undeniable. He has a very, very powerful draw, but he also comes across as sociopathic – especially in person. I only stayed until about 10:30-11 (with an hour dinner break before that) and the speech was still well under way. I thought to myself, “I’m in Vegas to apply what I’m learning at Summit and actually game,” so I left and hit the town. I heard the speech ran until 1 a.m. I don’t even think that most of the seminar attendees gamed the entire week LOL. 

I honestly came to Summit to see Tyler in person. But let me make this clear, there is nothing you learn at Summit that you can’t from any one of RSD’s drawn-out, rambling videos. 

**Derek**

The next day I decided to skip Jeffy’s speech, but I did go to the panel, which was essentially hosted by RSD Derek…the all-illusive RSD Derek. 

I had never seen/heard any of Derek’s stuff before and, let me tell you, the man is the fucking penultimate disgusting asshole. He told the audience that they need to fucking leave now if they don’t like 3-somes, cock-in-pussy, rubbing his cock on the microphone, fucking 10s, not fucking ugly women, eating pussy, not being a total fucking chode, and not being a fucking faggot. He portrayed such a warped view of women that I just needed to leave. It was so toxic. 

Derek says he won’t fuck anything over 24 years old…pretty much stating that any woman older than that is completely fucking useless in his mind. These types of RSD tactics have the ability to completely fuck up one’s perspective of healthy relationships, the value of family, and the value of women. I didn’t stay very long…I just couldn’t sit there and waste my time listening to him.

**The Saturday Night Panel**

On the final night of Summit, all 7-8 of the RSD instructors congregated in the conference room to talk to the entire audience and have a dialogue with them. 

I must say right off the bat that Maze and Ev are THE WORST! I think they are both 21 or something and I honestly cannot take a thing either of them says seriously. They *hardly*have enough reference experience to know what they themselves should do, let alone what other guys should do. They are also both super fucking annoying and very chode-ish. Maze was running up and down the aisles screaming “MY NAME IS TYRONE AND I’M GOING TO FUCK YOU WITH MY BIG BLACK DICK”…or something along those lines. He was standing on chairs and screaming in people’s faces. Honestly, he is just the worst…such a fucking douchebag. Also, his peacocking is really fucking faggy.

Ev is similarly annoying. He acts like a seasoned vet and is super pompous. It’s hard to believe that Todd left and was replaced with these two dummies. Even Jeff seemed to be annoyed with them. Julien too.

Tyler and Julien had some really good stuff to say on the final night. Jeffy couldn’t keep up. Madison sat there pretty quietly. So did Max. I must say that Julien was really impressive. He just seems like an all-around good guy. He is visibly distancing himself from RSD. 

While I may be growing away from many of Tyler’s principles and philosophies, he has still helped me in my life immensely. He is without doubt a *very*engaging and powerful speaker. Among the greatest I’ve ever seen.

**Summary**

Las Vegas is a cool city, but it’s a difficult city to game in. Not a single person I talked to who was attending the seminar had come close to pulling as of the final night. These examples are at serious odds with the ones Tyler uses in his Summit promotional videos. 

At the end of the day, RSD is more of a business than anything else…and that’s understandable. Businesses need to sell their products and ideas to survive and thrive. RSD does a *very*good job at doing exactly that. But I believe that there is a potential ethical and moral dilemma here that needs to be discussed further. I believe they are setting up many young men (most of these guys were in their early 20s) for false hope and unhealthy relationships. 

I hope everyone who is into this shit seriously asks themselves what they got into it for and to then dictate their own path, as opposed to having RSD dictate it for them. 

I would LOVE to hear others opinions on this and get a discussion going. ",pickup
The Reason Why You Might Not Be As Aggressive in Getting Some,,pickup
Who watched Todd new program The System? any reviews or opinions?,,pickup
Where did Julien n get his skills?,Anyone know where he learned his game from? What coaches did he study? Anyone have the products of these coaches?  I’m talking old badass  jullien ,pickup
How much does it cost to buy all of SimplePickup's material through their website (legally)? I'm only able to find a monthly subscription plan ($37 a month).,,pickup
What are the top best programs outside Rsd,,pickup
What are the best products and the best instructors to follow,"There are alot of instructors out there that do pickup but i dont know which one are the best to follow instead  

",pickup
Social Circle Blueprint 2.0 Telegram Group,Anyone have the link to the SCB 2.0 telegram group? Mine for some reason doesn't work,pickup
Seduction and Dating Programs,"I have lots of seduction and dating programs. I have attached a link in this post. It contains screenshots of programs that I have. I have lots of other programs too which are not in the screenshots. If anyone's interested, then message me.

[https://imgur.com/a/aJ8vnx4](https://imgur.com/a/aJ8vnx4)",pickup
is it worth it to become a full time pickup coach?!,"given how rsd todd was treated , aka ""shaved"" by papa &amp; tyler from RSD, do u think  it's a good career?

becoming a pickup coach for life instead of pursuing some std career, 9 to 5 day job?",pickup
I’ve never trusted people who mix spirituality with business,"""I’ve never trusted people who mix spirituality with business"" - The Truth by Neil Strauss  
seems like time is passing  
and people don't change  
welcome to RSD religion  
xD",pickup
JP (todd's assistant instructor and protege) from Todd's the System,"I was going through the infield section on Todd's new program and holy shit I was blown away by JP's infield. Todd is constantly praising this guy and for good reason, he has by far the smoothest charm and character that women can't resist and it's like he's not even trying. He is exactly the embodiment of what I want my game to look like. In his infields you can clearly see the women working to close him and not the other way around. Todd is excellent but he is smart and makes chess moves, with JP its effortless almost. Todd found a real gem of an assistant.",pickup
[ TRADING ] - The System by you know who,"Willing to trade for logins or SCBP2.0 or girlfriend game.

I made software to download the vids from the product and right now it's only tested on the system, but I want to make it more versatile so therefor I need other logins.

If you have any programs you want to have downloaded without the tedious work HMU",pickup
Social circle game in villages and small cities,"Hello fellow men! I invite you to brainstorm with me here. I need to find leisure groups / social clubs following these rules:

* **common** enough to be found in villages and small cities
* **decent percentage of girls** / people in their 20s
* **group member change** from time to time =&gt; old go, new come
* **not super pricey**
* done in the **evening after work** or during the **weekend**
* **not physically exhausting.** A huge priority of mine is weightlifting, mostly done every day. It's more important to me then girls, and I firmly believe every man needs something above women. I absolutely hate compromising my training by being exhausted, having less / bad sleep, less / bad food, getting influenced by wasted drunk people, ect. Because of that my night game cold approaching is practically non existent right now. Night life is mostly poor in my area and you loose a lot of time traveling to quality events.

My ideas till now:

* chill forms of yoga
* groups making music
* language exchange groups
* social media / dating apps. I hate looking at my phone all the time, trying to market myself as a good ""product"" for some Instagram addicts, but hey, it seems to be really important and potent these days.

More details about my location: I live in a European group of kinda rural villages, 10k people there. Nearby is a city with 100k, multicultural, small university but without any student subculture, hence the weak night life.

You may think ""Jesus, just move"". Done that, been there. Not possible at the moment and except for the ""gaming potential"" I like my area a lot. Gentlemen, let the ideas flow!",pickup
Anyone has RSDMAX girlfriend game?,title says it all. It just came out. Looking for a torrent or link of this if any1 has this,pickup
LOOKING FOR THE SYSTEM BY TODD,[ Removed by reddit in response to a copyright notice. ],pickup
Picking up a girl from university,"Basically we go on adventures (me her and other girls) like skydiving,rafting etc.I really enjoy her personality.I can see that she likes me too.Laughs at everything I have to say and listens carefully.She even gave me a massage on the back while I was half sleeping  half awake (shirtless).I got tap hugged by her  which made me feel like sh#t though.Not very intimate and almost too friendly. So how do I figure out if this girl is sexually into me or not?The thing is that I am cool with being friends or having sex with her and still being friends going on adventures etc.But I don't want to risk opening up too much.Can I use a technique or something to make it clear if she wants to take a step further?It's not like a random girl you just go all in.The situation is more awkward because we are already decent friends and bringing up my sexual intentions  towards her can kinda kill the friendship that we already have. ",pickup
I met a girl and I have an idea how to show her I like her,"Yesterday when I was coming home back from work I saw a beer pretty girl that turned out to live very close to where I do. Before she reached her house I greeted her. And also managed to compliment her dress and to ask her name. It happened on a way that I literally walked her home (I live a block further down the street) and we are basically neighbors.
I really like her, but I know nothing about her and right now my idea is to leave a rose on her door with her name on it in the late afternoon when l'm coming home from work. That will give her time to respond in whichever way she wants. Do you guys think that is a good idea. Should I also leave my name on it? Because I think that if I do it might look weird since we just met yesterday. Nevertheless I think it will be a nice gesture that will make her smile
",pickup
Simple Pickup's Kong is seen doing Youtube Training!???,"Hey guys im not sure if ur familiar with simple pickup but they used to be really good on youtube, now they've just disappeared? Ive seen ads though recently with Kong in it with him talking about giving everyone youtube training? to grow channels and shit? And he CLAIMS he has trained Imaginary Ambition??? What the fuck is going on????",pickup
Approach Anxiety and Fear of Rejection,"Hey guys, my game went from not that good to really bad. Im not able to cold approach, one of my life challenges I think, only done a few, like 10, ever. AA or fear of rejection, I can't know which, if not both, keeps me from approaching and getting the results I want. 




I have really great results with social circle game, already pulled a 3some and few Triple Kisses but approaching on the dance floor or anywhere else is pure doom. Completely paralysed. A lost kid looking for its parents. 





A few random times, when I was drunk mostly, a great opener/comment came into my mind and out of nowhere I could approach. But that's rare. 




#TL;DR




I suffer from massive AA and/or Fear of Rejection






What do you  suggest to me to overcome or deal with this? 





I also can't find a good wingman, tried gaming with a few, but mostly only good at social circle game.",pickup
I want to get into it!,What literature do you recommend? What videos? Do you have personal tips? How do I get in this in general? How did you get into it? What are the downsides?,pickup
Long Distance Game,"Is there any point to continuing the text game with someone when there's a high chance you'll never see them again? I mean, the point is to get them out and go on dates. How do I justify continuing to talk to them when it seems very unlikely? That being said, the person I'm texting always talks to me whenever she can. She's hooked. Any thoughts?",pickup
RSD's Hot Seat at Home vs. Hot Seat at Home Mastermind,"Which is better? I can either buy the first one for $300 and the second one for $400. It seems like they're so similar, though, that it would be smarter for me just to get the first one for $300. Any advice?",pickup
SIRHUD KALRA FRIENDZONE,"If anyone wants sirhud kalra's how to get out of friendzone video, then DM me.",pickup
Latest on the Todd vs RSD lawsuit,,pickup
How do i seal the deal and get with this girl?,"Info about me: I'm a 17 year old guy, funny, confident and just chill really(apologies for sounding cocky/vain).

So I like this girl and while she's shown SOME interest, it ends up in some fucked up response. Just today I decided to talk to her to restart this thing; we were talking and just said to her that I was gonna voice call her, her reply being ""oh isit"" and me being dat boi saying ""don't test me xD(could not add laughing emoji here)"". After that it was just ""what"".

I've seen people do worse yet end up with those girls in the end, and I know this isn't good for me but I just wanna try shit you know. How do I make this secure? I've deadass grown tired of taking this type of shit and just wanna be able to actually solve these type of issues when they come.

TL;DR 17 year old trying to get this girl i've been talking to for some time now, worth it or nah? 

**3 Comments**",pickup
[Review] Is RSD Luke's Social Circle Blueprint 2.0 good?,"Hello kind people on the internet! 

I know RSD Luke released Social Circle Blueprint 2.0 recently. Has anyone gotten a chance to go through the programme, is it worth it? Please share your thoughts, much much appreciated thank you!",pickup
"Want To Be A Great PUA Coach, Watch This! (and the fundamentals of seduction)",,pickup
I will be sharing scb 2.0 highest tier for free,"I will be buying this program day 1. It seems like it is close to release with the promo vids coming out on Lukes channel. 

My goal for sharing is to create our own telegram chat and share value with each other and the things we learned from the program to improve are game, lifestyles, and business. 

That is what this program is all about. Lifestyle design. We all have value and things we can help mentor each other on. So let's share that and crush it together! 

I know this place hates Luke for whatever reason, but I trained with him and everything he has taught I have put into practice and made it work for me. 

Also if you guys have any questions I’ll ask them for you on the official scb 2.0 telegram and Facebook groups. 

Which have the most value, that is one problem getting these free versions, you don’t get to partake in the chat, so any questions you have can’t get answered. 

I will be creating are own telegram chat for all those that get the program for free from me, all that I ask for sharing this value with you all is your participation in our telegram chat and to apply the program. Not just watch it to add to your collection. 

DM me and I will add you to the telagram chat were I will be providing the download link and providing value. 

DM me and get added to the telegram chat by July 1st because after that I will no longer be taking admissions or sharing with outsiders. ",pickup
"Got busy and let her sit two days, what would you reply back, she my ex of three 3 ago, great fuck.",,pickup
Best program for body language and charisma?,"Whats the best program on body language and charisma? and also is there a program on voice tonality? If yes, whats the best one?",pickup
Help a Begginer!,"I'm 22, had about..2 relationships in my life, no sex,in the last one of em i ve been humiliated allot of times and rejected, but i understand, who wants something with an guy that can shut up for 8 hwrs straight near his girlfriend, i had some ""balls"" to tell her i like her and it worked out, she was really into me, then everything went to waste because of my...i don t even know how to call it...it sucks. i ve known about pickup for a while, but never took it seriously, i did some approaches...nothing came out of them or me from them(bad sense of humour)
My so called ""sticking points"" my confidence is below 0, i think i m depressed and i fucking SUCK at speaking to people, even w my friends or guys, my dicksize also s on my mind always and fucks my confidence,(arround 5) i m not bad looking, i m just socially...retarded?
Anything that can help is very, very much appreciated.
Tips, books, advice, motivation!
How should i start talking to people and make fun and endless convo, not completely blanking out everytime and waiting for ppl to say something?
How can i become good with girls and people in general?
Thank you guys!
",pickup
Why I Hate Day Game Pickup Artists,,pickup
Logistics — Why it’s More Important Than Game (HARSH truth),,pickup
Asian Viet Guy Pickup Girls at the Beach,,pickup
STATE TODD V {SWEET},"[https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=u\_AhhQVhJco&amp;t=7s](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=u_AhhQVhJco&amp;t=7s)  


I really had that problem, sometimes it took me even 2h to open first set on night game, becasue I was in shity state ...

and almost never or rarely worked at daygame becasue my daily default state bar was pretty low

hope Todd will bring new solutions for that :\)",pickup
How to approach uncalibrated and still get her number -Daygame Infield 2018,,pickup
Alpha Male VS. Superior Male,,pickup
Asking Hot People: The Craziest Places They've Had Sex,,pickup
How To Approach Girls On A Bus,,pickup
Conquering Your Purpose - Motivational Video,,pickup
Asking Hot Girls: Tinder or Clubbing?,,pickup
RSD programs,"Iv'e purchased The Natural, PIMP, Making a Shift, and TENGAME. Those interested in buying them for cheap add my snapchat: ajerec. these programs are fucking amazing, but im still trying to reimburse myself a bit. Those working on their lives hmu.",pickup
Asking Hot Girls How to Pick Up Girls at the Club (Toronto),,pickup
How To Dress To Get Undressed,,pickup
Intetesting... Interesting...,,pickup
Is SimplePickup Fake? Pt. 2 (did kong have game?),,pickup
New Peugeot Pickup 2018 Truck Review Interior Exterior,,pickup
What happened to that Frank Nightgame guy?,His Youtube videos and other accounts are all deleted. [http://archive.is/6nX4r](http://archive.is/6nX4r),pickup
"He may be a little weird, but Chuck Tingle knows how game works",,pickup
Should I do pickup if I'm 17?,"So I want a girlfriend or just girls in general to mess around with. But I don't know where to start I'm thinking of just randomly talking to girls in coffeeshops and grocery stores etc. Is this weird? Should I do that? Or even in a shopping centre. I'm too young to go to bars and nightclubs. Any tips? Should I go by myself, with friends or?  Thanks for advice",pickup
A little help please,"Um..this will be weird, in pickup/woman and life my most..powerful fear is my dicksize, not rejection or stuff like that, that s always on my mind and fucks me day and night, my point beeing, is there any of you guys w a shorter thingy that do it and u have success? I m 1.77-13cm, i just wanna know if i have a chance at life..woman w this, thanks in advance",pickup
The Truth About Pickup — Pickup is bad? (TRIGGER WARNING),,pickup
Todd's old Youtube videos,Can someone email me Todd's old videos from YT. The ones that got deleted from RSD. I had access to them but I can't remember my stupid fcking password to mega,pickup
Is Simple Pickup Fake? (did Jason have game?),,pickup
Cold Approaching A Girl - Facing Social Fears,,pickup
Who's your favorite PUA to learn from,Who is it? ,pickup
3 Tricks To Master Something FAST! (no dicking around),,pickup
Todd explains why his subcommunications are garbage,,pickup
[Request] ReSeduction 2.0 by Derek Rake,,pickup
So this sub is running without a moderator? His accounts seems to be suspended,,pickup
"Is The Youtube Channel ""PUA infield"" Fake or Legit?",,pickup
Is RSD Legit?,,pickup
Derek rake / Mr. X,Does someone have Mr X's ebooks?\(derek's pseudonym\),pickup
derek Rake stuff,"Hey, anyone has derek rake's shogun sequences over text,black book Volume 3 and online dating playbook? Message me. I have all of derek's stuff except these 3.",pickup
Go get some!,,pickup
[Question] Best Instagram Course ?,What is the best instagram course that teach you how to have a lot of followers on your personal profil ? ,pickup
Is a small studio apartment alright for having girls over?,"I'm considering getting this small studio apartment. I don't care much where I live as long as it's quiet and clean and cheap, but I can forgo some cheapness if it means it's more suitable for having girls over.",pickup
What's the excuse now crybabies,"[Inb4 jmulv was better](https://youtu.be/WYBMtAbiUqA)

I also think these are the updates to the h@h Mastermind. But he wants to give out massive value to the public as this maybe and I quote be his last pickup content

Edit - Lot of hate boners out there. You'll go far guys👌",pickup
[HOT] Free guide to getting more lays [+ infield],"https://dreamconqueror.gitbooks.io/druid-game/content/

I wanted to give back to the community cause I've learned so much from you all.

Enjoy!

(satire)",pickup
Check out this android app I built for pick-up! Complete fun challenges to gain XP and track your progress!,"I just released the beta version of my app and would love to have your feedback! 

[https://play.google.com/store/apps/details?id=com.it.polaris](https://play.google.com/store/apps/details?id=com.it.polaris)

The app gamifies “Pick\-up”: it is basically a real\-life RPG. You have a set of 8 attributes \(Approaching, Confidence, Playfulness, Rapport, Sexuality, Leading, Energy and Smoothness\) and gain XP in them by login your real life pick\-up activities \(Approaches, Banters, Rapports, Numbers, Dates, etc…\) and by completing missions, which range from beginner missions, like talking to strangers on the way to a venue or spending a couple of songs on the dance floor to get a good energy going, to intermediate and advanced missions such as talking to a girl while focusing on having good tonality \(downtalk\) or approaching 5 girls daily for 7 days in a row. 

Please get the app and don't pay to upgrade as I will go online a couple of times a day to upgrade all new users to premium for free! Currently the free version has ads and the easy challenges, with the option to upgrade to the premium to get all of the challenges and no ads. You can also give me feedback on the monetization strategy! Would you pay for a subscription to access more challenges and remove ads? How much?

If you like the app, help me out and leave a good review! If you have ideas for features to add to the app, I am also open for suggestions!",pickup
"Justin Wayne threatens his paid model girlfriends life, hints that he has weapons and that he's willing to lose it all, and that he has threatened other women in the past. RSD Tyler Owen Cook not only defends him, says that he's made way worse threats to girlfriends.","Tyler

&gt;Then put a relationship issue on blast, when there's not a human in the world who hasn't had a fight with their significant other where you say a lot of emotional stupid shit.  I mean hell, if I had some of my arguments with ex's on there, I'd look way worse and have said way crazier shit, as have the girls.

Clip in question https://youtu.be/mv90sn4wnvs?t=4m6s

No Tyler, normal people don't threaten to kill their girlfriends or wives in the worst of times in their relationships. While I'm at it, most people don't physically coerce and subdue their girlfriends into having sex when they full when know that they don't want it. 

And he wonders why his closest friends distanced themselves from him. He doesn't think there's anything wrong with putting out a sexual assault instructional video (complete with infield!) 

I doubt he's ever going to get in trouble, he's super paranoid now that he's a niche celebrity, so I doubt he's physically subduing women or threatening to kill them anymore. He even has women give explicit verbal content before he has sex with them. 

He does have a strong sense of reality. He literally believes that he's never done anything wrong, or 'that bad' in his words. I wonder if it'll be his downfall, like what happened to Steve Jobs. ",pickup
(Request) the 1 tb pickup folder,"Thanks in advance!

",pickup
How to Build a Social Circle in a New City,,pickup
"WHY normal PICK UP sucks, dude seems to master who is chasing who",,pickup
Giving up on Pick Up (for now),"Hi guys. Quite new at posting on here but I was just trying to get some outside thoughts on stuff. I've been single for around a year and a half now and I've not had much luck at getting back into pickup. Last year was all about me getting over approach anxiety (still a work in progress, as is kicking depression and anxiety in general) so I barely got any numbers ect and from about August to December last year, any approach I did make would always end in the old:

""I have a boyfriend""

Could be true, could be total bullshit but its been enough to make me doubt myself to the point where I dont approach anymore. This coupled with a pretty messy last year in film college, chronic anxiety and zero success with online dating as well as falling out of shape and health concerns. 

I've attempted No-Fap as well but have consistantly relapsed to the point where I'm just in a manic depressive circle. What do you guys think on just going solo and not thinking about any of this shit for the forseeable?

Phew, that was long lol.",pickup
Sharing DAY 41 DOMINANCE Certification™ Program,"Sorry for ads that is small support for me
. Vid 1 full 

http: // bit. ly /2F40Hkw

Vid 2 http: // bit. ly /2HimnuZ

Vid 3 Fast Start Exercise

http: // bit. ly/2F54AWd
Sharing DAY 41 DOMINANCE Certification™ Program",pickup
Why is there so much hate for RSD in this subreddit?,,pickup
Feminism is just institutionalized shit tests,,pickup
"Sharing Set Your Voice Free,roger love","Sharing Set Your Voice Free,roger love
http : // bit.ly / 2EYUCWm",pickup
INFIELD: How to Pick Up a Logical Backpacker Girl (2018),,pickup
From 1 to America.....,"""From 1 to America how free are you?""

""North k......wait they are too free so I am going with England instead"" ",pickup
How To Tell If She Is Checking You Out,,pickup
Sharing Rules of Success Grant Cardone,[ Removed by reddit in response to a copyright notice. ],pickup
Sharing the 10 X rule,"Sharing the 10 X rule

http :// bit .ly /2GX0hlS",pickup
Sharing Be Obsessed or Be Average Grant Cardone,"Sharing Be Obsessed or Be Average Grant Cardone

http: // bit . ly /2GUadMC",pickup
How this GIRL got a job at RSD,,pickup
Sharing dominace vido THE OVERCONFIDENCE BIAS,"
Sharing dominace vido THE OVERCONFIDENCE BIAS

http: // bit.ly/2HsD8oj",pickup
Sharing jason capital dominace ( THE FBI FORMULA FOR FRIENDSHIP) dane pena secret,"
Sharing jason capital dominace
 (THE FBI FORMULA FOR FRIENDSHIP) 
dane pena secret

http : // bit .ly /2veWM4q",pickup
Engineers/Coders/Maths Guys in pickup! What do you do to get in state after full day of coding or sitting in front of computer?,Today i learned that Mystery was into engineering and robotics before getting into PU. This explains to some extent why he felt the need to do what we all now he did. So all you techie PUAs outthere what do you do to get into social state.,pickup
[buying] RSD hotseat at home mastermind,I'll pay in paypall,pickup
Sharing jordan peterson 12 rules for life pdf,"Sharing jordan peterson 12 rules for life pdf


http: // bit.ly/2GOCjsQ",pickup
Sharing number 2 jason capital dominace VOCAL TONALITY,"
Sharing jason capital dominace vocaltonaity vido 30 min vido about vocal tonality /wista link............. .........

1 skip the ad .........

...... 2 enjoy the vido...... ......

http: // icutit .ca/mc3r7",pickup
Sharing jason capital dominace (THE WORLD SHE WANTS TO BE FILLED WITH vido ),"
Upvote , and this is the link

http ://bit.ly/2IGtjTd",pickup
5 Great tips to picking up Chicks...,,pickup
Sharing jason capital dominace charisma vido,"
Sharing jason capital dominace charisma vido 46 min vido about charisma /wista link............. .........

1 skip the ad .........

...... 2 enjoy the vido...... ......

http:// bit.ly/2H5cnbB",pickup
Need some social interaction advice,"Hello everyone I hope this isn't too off topic but it's bothering me.

So I'm 26 and have been told I'm a confident good looking guy. In an effort to better myself I began watching RSD videos and practicing approaching girls at the clubs and bars. My buddies girlfriend would be with my friend group so she would see me doing this.

Time went by and she began calling me a fuckboy and saying I was horrible to girls. Thing is I hardly went home with these girls, and I always strove to make the people I spoke to happier than before I met them.

She is an estranged feminist with insecurities so this is definitely why. Thing is I am dating a girl now, Beautiful girl inside and out. We are all out drinking the other night and I decide to go home early so I can wake up to study at a reasonable hour.

My girlfriend comes home at around 130am upset. She tells me in a quiet voice that this girl was calling me a fuckboy and telling her again and again I was going to break up with and fuck her over. I was deeply hurt by this because well I thought this girl was somewhat my friend.

So I had two options. Ignore it or confront it. I chose to confront it so I sent her a message on Facebook asking why she would say it. She ends up denying it and saying my gf made it up. Thing is this girl has done this exact thing before with a buddy of mine, and has been known to say things she shouldn't.

So now I'm here wondering if I would have been better off just not saying anything at all to save myself the drama.

Sorry for the long post, but if you're into pickup you may well encounter something like this. If any of you have any words of wisdom or something uplifting to say I'd love to hear them.

Thank you all and Godspeed meeting that beauty you all deserve. ",pickup
You've been mislead to be a douche bag - GENUINE nice guys should NOT finish last,,pickup
best SEDUCER in Literature?,"who is best SEDUCER in Literature in your opinion?

a book should have vivid and precise descriptions of:  

&gt;how he acts  
&gt;what he thinks  
&gt; what he feels  

so you can get a strong mental-image of that character

Thank you in advance for your time.",pickup
Letting Go of Fear to Create Deeper Connections,,pickup
"LetsEatWater of /r/Pickuptorrents here with a new update on inner workings of RSD. And yes, this will include fucked up shit RSD is doing, as usual. A lot of the instagram models on Tyler's instagram/snap are there to get more followers.","First off, all the former mods have been banned, and recently, Reddit went back and did a second round banning of all the new alt accounts. Pickuptorrents and the new private subreddits we created after it's banning seemed to really piss them off. 

If any of you added me on facebook, just send me a message and I'll confirm that this account is Letseatwater. 

Anyways, now to the good stuff. 

**RSD is making a significant portion of their revenue from non-advertised, non-publicly available, and non-dating products.** 

It's no secret that RSD has been making A LOT of money, but bootcamps and hotseats only make a small fraction of the total revenue these days. 

There's a few categories. First off, there were non-advertised but publicly available. These are things like bootcamps from non-regular instructor (Derek used to be private, Ryan, etc). Some were only advertised to alumni though anyone could sign up if they called in. If you're interested you can call them and ask about these programs, they'll probably share a few with you.

There's also a lot of products/programs that are tailor made to clients. RSD has a lot of 'high-roller' clients that pay 20-100k/year for customized attention. They include private bootcamps, phone calls, skype sessions, invites to their mansion parties, invite to hangouts, etc. What's funny is Tyler resisted the high-roller model for years, and gloat about it in the forum and videos, as if personally goading Love Systems whose main mode is that. Later on, he said that in the future RSD will do 10k$ programs once their client base gets rich enough. But, they're doing it right now. 

There's publicly available non-dating products. That's no secret, Julien has been doing self-development shit for years. 

Now for the really juicy stuff, the non-advertised non-dating stuff. They do a wide range of stuff but the majority of this is business/marketing consulting. Tyler has actually mentioned it in his youtube channel. Though it's not advertised heavily, it's not exactly a secret, you can probably hit up customer service and ask about these services. Now, they marketing/social media advice is actually top quality. You can tell from their youtube videos that they got their social media on lock, and in a lot of ways are pioneers in the new type of marketing Gary Vaynerchuk talks about a lot. 

HOWEVER, maybe not so much when it comes to business advising. I mean sure, Tyler has a ton of experience and there probably a lot of cases where Tyler has the exact advice an emerging business needs. But for anyone following what Alex/Todd/Internet Law Review Guy, RSD if rife with layers and layers of bullshit. In the same way that a lot of their dating clients get screwed over, they're doing the same thing to their business clients. A lot of times they claim to have a lot of experience in an area that they really don't, and give bullshit advice. And they can get away with it because their marketing is so good. 

Here's a principle. Sometimes when marketing quality goes up, actual quality of product goes down. This certainly happened to RSD. The average quality of their bootcamps have been going down since 2014. 

It's kind fucked up at times, because some of the business they client are not that well off, sometimes they're non-profits that do really good work. 

Now here's really embarrassing thing, they run a service to help instagram models get more followers, and going on a 'date' with Tyler is part of the service. 

A little background, instagram is big business. I'm not an expert, but once someone gets a couple thousand followers, they tend to get advertising offers, or they can go out and seek advertising offers. It could be posting a picture, or product placements. 

So a lot of the girls you see in his Instagram/snap, they're just there to get a following boost. Not all, a bunch are legit dates, but whenever her snap/insta is mega displayed and easy to click, most likely she's there for the service. 

It's actually a pretty smart move, because RSD gets some very good marketing material as well. 

There have been cases where the girl is not in the instagram business at all. She's just a girl who met tyler on SeekingArrangment (sugar daddy app) or MillionaireMatchMaker, and Tyler convinces her to do an instragram to make side money, then he gets to display her date on snap. That's something that's actually . . . heart warming lol. It's actually good for her to do a side business and not depend on sugar daddies. 

My sources don't have exact numbers but in 2015, 15% of RSD's revenue came from non-publicly available and non-dating products. In 2016 they actually did much more of this, but it was only 17%, because RSD also made a millions on their online products. In 2017 it was 30%. In 2018 it's projected to be around 50%, but this is partially due to the decrease in their online products.

They seem to be getting into all sorts of media/marketing businesses, but their dating marketing is actually good enough to convince all sorts of businesses to take on their clients. 




",pickup
A heart breaking truth I felt first hand today...,Beautiful and amazing women hang out with jerks because gentlemen couldn't grow their BALLS... So grow your f***king balls people! They deserve better.,pickup
(Request) David Tian - Limitless,"- Please kindly share if you have a watchable video ""3 - Basic Conversation &amp; The Hook Point"" in ""Module 4 - Masculine Magnetism In Conversation"".

-If anyone knows other videos which covered this topic from David Tian, please advise.

Thank you all.",pickup
UWaterloo scouting,"Hey all. Looking to start a day/night pickup group in the UWaterloo area. Looking for passionate folk who are enrolled in or have graduated from one of the local universities (Uwaterloo, Laurier, Guelph, etc..) to help get it off the ground. Send me a PM if interested. 

Best regards,

Dustin 
",pickup
(TRADE) I need JC's Dominance (my programs I can share are listed below),"HEY! I need DOMINANCE. I can give you:
JC's MBA in Internet Marketing
JC's Conversation God
JC's MWWY 2018
RSD Todd Attraction Unloced
Tripp Advice's Hooked
JC's Copywriting Bootcamp

PM me if you got Dominance and I give you what you need.",pickup
How to handle a girl who is trying to test you (shittests),,pickup
[REQUEST] The Social Man - Confidence Hypnosis Subliminals,Pm me,pickup
[REQUEST] Hookup Mixes by The Social Man,Pm me,pickup
What women think they want and what they really want,,pickup
Interviewing rave girls at ULTRA2018 and asking them about dating,,pickup
RSD SCAMS finally exposed By Deepak Wayne - RSD Hiring Models and Actresses - Snake Oil Seduction,,pickup
Execute the program by Jeffy,Does anyone have this and could PM me it? Thanks,pickup
Looking for good beginners resources,"Hey there, I'm 31, recently single, and one of my biggest regrets is not overcoming my social awkwardness and learning to approach women. I really have no excuses on this, I'm tall, fit, have a distinct look and I'd like to think I have decent style. Conversationally if I'm warmed up, I'm quick with a joke and clever. It seems like I have the ingredients to do alright at this but, man, I have never successfully chatted up a woman I just saw at a bar or someplace and had it go anywhere, I've barely ever tried. 

I'm looking for a few links/books/channels to start educating myself. I read the game when I was younger, been some years though, and I wouldnt call that a guide.",pickup
How effective is the Classical Pickup advice in most Asian Cultures?,"I was wondering How effective is the Classical Pickup advice in most Asian Cultures? I understand that the basic rules of attraction are applicable everywhere but what how applicable systems like Double Your Dating or Daygame are in countruries like India,Iran,Japan etc. Anyone has experience doing pickup there?",pickup
Is it possible to get in trouble because of pick-up/ daygame?,"i want to try daygame.. but i fear what people might Think of me , or police / authoroties or even if the girl would hit me / slap me or if i get in any sort of trouble ... is it a problem ? should i be worried about it ? ",pickup
*Animated Video* (How To Become A Lion),,pickup
Alex &amp; Todd TRUTH: The Unrevealed Secrets of Why We Left RSD &amp; Our Vision Going Forward,,pickup
"A LIST of 'sticking points' and main challenges at each phase of game is about to be made cooperatively, RIGHT HERE - so you might as well be there","If you're reading this, thanks for your participation - you're about to write between 1 and 5 lines detailing where it is that you get most stuck. I want to help in empowering men, and I want to know where to start. 

With other men, and what we wonder most about seduction/flirting, the process, techniques, adjustments, and so on. 

For example, my sticking points back in the day were mostly in how to establish trust and get her to let her guard down, and how to read when a woman's openness to sex is peaking and fading. Those aren't yours, and here, it's all about what has really let you down, what remains a challenge, what remains a mystery. Your time begins ... ... now!",pickup
Approaching Girls &amp; Overcoming Fears - A little tiny little adventure,,pickup
"Joe Rogan Experience - game, relationship, manliness","once upon time Todd recommended on of the Joe Rogan Experience podcast - related to game,  
but I don't remember who was the guest,  
maybe someone knows, saw it or remember it?  

if yes, please let me know  
I enjoy the show, but it's too many of them to seen all",pickup
Offering 100$ for Dominance program by JC,"only on mega,  if you have it on other platforms fuck off",pickup
The Six Stages Every PUA Goes Through,"What drives someone to the secret society of pickup/Game? As a [reformed pickup artist myself](https://www.nickhatter.com/single-post/2017/11/11/Men-heres-why-you-dont-need-game), and having coached mPUAs via [my life coaching practice](https://www.nickhatter.com) I believe I am well-qualified to share the six stages that every pickup artist goes through.

**Stage 1: Trauma**
The journey of a pickup artist begins here. Many PUAs have suffered childhood trauma, which includes physical, emotional and sexual abuse from parents and caregivers. They may also have experienced severe bullying at school which cripples their self-esteem and image. As a result, they develop a shame-based core.

**Stage 2: Love Addiction**
As a result of the trauma endured, many PUAs then develop Love Addiction. Believing that the love of a woman will heal their wounds, they become obsessed with one (or multiple) women. This phase of their life is often very painful as it results in many unrequited loves and heartbreak.

**Stage 3: Resentment**
With their heart smashed to pieces by unavailable women, many PUAs begin to develop a subtle (or not so subtle!) rage towards women and believe that they are the problem. PUAs may also resent themselves and think they're unattractive to women. They may also develop a belief that women only date assholes and ""players"".

**Stage 4: Sex Addiction**
Having discovered The Game by Neil Strauss, and the secret society of pickup, many PUAs develop a single-minded focus: getting laid. At this point, their lives become consumed by the pursuit of sex - with many devoting a large part of their life to scouring nightclubs, bars or the streets, for their next fix. Some even quit their day job and go on ""Euro Jaunts"", a pilgrimage into Eastern Europe to look for sex full-time. For many PUAs, this is considered the holy grail.

**Stage 5: Despair and Emptiness**
At this point, PUAs have reached a crisis point in their lives. This could be in the form of depression and suicidal thoughts. For some, it could be an unwanted child or a sexually-transmitted disease. There may also be an excessive and extreme usage of pornography or even prostitutes at this stage. The shame-based core in Stage 1 may become reactivated which exacerbates their sex addiction. Despite getting laid, they are aware of a deep underlying unworthiness, sadness and loneliness; no amount of sex will fix this. They also may find that Game and pickup techniques are only attracting equally damaged women into their lives, who are either love addicts or love avoidants.

**Stage 6: Transcendence**
Not every PUA will make it this far. But those who do, end up living far richer, more balanced and fulfiling lives. At this stage, the PUA is no longer a PUA but is a mature and healthy man. They may enter into trauma therapy and/or 12-Step Recovery Programmes and begin deep healing work. They finally see the insanity of their past ways. They develop healthy relationships with themselves and women. At this stage, the PUA has transcended game and pickup. Rather than pretending to be someone they're not, they become a more authentic and wholesome person. They no longer feel the need to win women over or to use Game. They are content with or without a woman in their lives. For them, a relationship would merely be a +1 to an already good life.

**Conclusion**
The making of a pickup artist comes from a place of deep-rooted pain and suffering. The issue is that Game is inherently flawed because it sets the wrong frame of needing to somehow ""win"" a woman over through manipulation and psychological tactics; it sets the frame of needing to win their approval. Thus, getting laid seems like an achievement, rather than as an expression of love and connection.

Which stage are you at right now? Feel free to comment below.

**If you're a Sedditor reading this, you may be interested in my [Integrated Alpha workshop](https://www.integrated-alpha.com) - a 3-day intensive bootcamp for men to develop their attraction, fighting and business abilities**, which I am co-running with a self-defence instructor and ex-soldier. I'd also like to offer a free life coaching session for any readers here - feel free to book [here](https://calendly.com/nickhatter/60min).",pickup
How to Get a Guy to Chase You: 3 Explosive Mindsets,,pickup
Has anyone benefited from Dr David Tian's products especially The Social Man?,,pickup
The DOOR OPEN AGAIN,"The DOOR open again
We've opened THE PRIVATE SUB up for a second TIME . If you want to join the rest of us INSIDE Type Yes.

You must be an old and not a new member. Should you have to contribute a product has not shared Before.

WE JUST accept 37 member not more Thank you badass.",pickup
By the skin of my teeth - 3 some attempt - Field Report,"Went out Solo here in Russia. Walked into a bar and saw a cutie with a big smile. I said hi, she said hi and hugged me. She went to dance on stage with a friend. I just kept approaching other girls &amp; getting contact info but I kept my eye on her. She went outside to smoke and got separated from her friend so I made my move again when she got back inside. I walked up and said hi again, you're so pretty, then grabbed her hand and started dancing.  Did all the silly dance moves/spins I know, then I started running basic comfort/qualification game: what's your name? what do you study? Where do you live? Who are you here with? Show me your instagram photos. Oh you're a singer? That's so cool!!!!!! Etc. After enough comfort I said ""find your friend, let's go to the bar next door."" We found the friend, but then then they wanted to buy drinks at this bar. I have recently made a rule: I never buy drinks for a girl unless she is willing to venue change. This has been such a great rule to follow!! I don't know why I've never seen it proposed before.
Anyway, the friend was pretty drunk by now so kept getting distracted by other dudes hitting on her. I should have been more of a LEADER and said NO, LETS GO NOW. But I agreed to wait 10 minutes while this guy spit his game. Luckily his game sucked and I got the friend's attention back and got them to get out of there and down to a quieter bar where the guys aren't as aggressive.
Bought them cheap beers, and sat in a far corner where no one would bother us (any time guys hear English they always use that as an excuse to come in and fuck up my set, saying whoah where you from, bla bla bla). Ran standard comfort game again getting them to talk about themselves most of the time, and answering their questions with as few of words as possible (to stay mysterious and not accidentally start qualifying myself). Also kept the vibe up by joking/singing/making funny faces etc. 
Another guy did finally come sit down with us and try talking to them, but I just ignored him and told the girls we should go dance, so we stood up and he fucked off.
Out on the dance floor I finished getting logistics (where do you live etc.) I tried getting them to come to my house with lure of cigarettes and alcohol, but they seemed hesitant so when I found out one girl lived alone and we could go to her house I latched onto that idea. Only token resistance was that ""my place is messy"" my reply was ""it's ok we're drunk we won't notice anyway."" The logical excuse to go was there was a song that I wanted her to play me but our internet wasn't working inside the bar.
Ordered Uber… After 15 minutes the first one canceled, and then had to wait another 15 minutes for the next one &gt;:(  A guy outside tried coming in and stealing a girl again. I knew this was dangerous so I told the girls fuck the uber let's just get a taxi parked on the street. Couldn't get that to fly for whatever reason, but telling the girls ""let's go wait inside the bar because it's cold outside"" worked. And luckily again this guy didn't follow. (3rd AMOG attempt foiled)
Waited for uber, and it took us back to the girls place. Right now I'm really nervous because many times these poor girls will just use you for the free uber ride home, hop out, and then won't let you come inside.  Again this time lucked out and there was little drama at the front door; I just went straight up (I had the ""I just need to use your bathroom real quick etc lines ready though"")
Inside when my target was in the toilet, I made out with the friend. She seemed pretty into it. I prob could have banged her right then but I was trying to set up the 3some and I didn't want the target to get weirded out that I'm going caveman on her friend until both girls had equal buying temperature. We chilled and I got a kiss out of the target.  We were all 3 on the couch and I was giving both girls a massage…. But long story short, the target just didn't get attracted enough to be DTF. And I couldn't get them to kiss each other &amp; that's usually the required little spark  which leads to a 3some. So we all went to sleep.
Still, waking up in between two hot Russians this morning was pretty nice. The target seemed pretty adamant about meeting up in the future for the whole ""you teach me english, I'll teach you russian."" So we'll see!
Debrief: Pretty proud of myself for mostly following the textbook: leading, especially when other guys come in. 
Man that was painful last summer in Romania learning that lesson OVER and OVER again: if guys come up to you while you are with girls, and act like they are interested in you. MAKE NO MISTAKE. They are NOT interested in you, they are just trying to STEAL YOUR GIRLS. Ignore Ignore Ignore and move your girls ASAP!
My biggest slip up was not leading harder for the venue change as soon as we met the friend. If that other guy would have had better game and brought in a buddy, that would have been the end of the set.
Not sure what I could have done to build more attraction in the target to get the same night lay. Generally SNL aren't allowed in Russia so there just might not be anything I could have done.
Note: I don't speak Russian so most of the above story was done via google translate.  I never realized how powerful google translate; this 2 minute video really explains it https://youtu.be/XcfnzTDm7Ps
",pickup
Does anyone know why RSD tyler has 2 names (is it a fight club reference that I missed?),,pickup
The DOOR open again,"We've opened THE PRIVATE SUB up for a second TIME . If you want to join the rest of us INSIDE Type Yes.

You must be an old and not a new member. Should you have to contribute a product has not shared Before.

WE JUST accept 37 member not more Thank you badass.",pickup
"You are still too nice to women, especially with pickup","My duty as a man is not existant. My duty as a human being is not existant. Everyone who claims otherwise is not worth my attention.

If a woman requires me to go down on her, to adore her 24h, to do long foreplay, none of that do I have to do. I don't enjoy licking somone's pee-hole and catching all kinds of diseases. I don't enjoy waiting for her to finally get wet. The more women want me to do that the more often do I jerk off and make them leave.

And pickup? Pickup pressures men into giving women exactly that.

It is all about pleasing women. Men spend so much money just for women to be happy. To be satisfied. They derive their self-worth from pleasuring women. If a woman enjoys it, he gives himself permission to love himself. If he ""loves himself"", he does it because it makes women happy.

This is the real reason men actually resent women because the more they do pickup the more they realize that they became women pleasing robots. 

Going to clubs to have fun? Stop lying to yourself.

You go out to please women, you put women before you by not putting them on a pedestal.

Because this is what women want. They don't want to be put on a pedestal, so you don't do it. Even if you would love to do it, you don't, so the woman is happy.

All you do is for women. For them to be happy. You even risk fights and misery, just for them to be happy. Like a male bee or male mantis that dies after sex.",pickup
A good Program to master small talk?,anyone knows about a program or book that focuses on that topic?,pickup
Women’s Default Response,,pickup
How to Meet A Girl in Stockholm - A Beginners Pickup Story,,pickup
[Request]BitSeduce invite,"Does anyone have a Bitseduce invite? I was there a member for like 6 - 8 months and i was unactive for a month and my acc has been deleted, i wan't to join in again. If you can invite me i would give more in return!",pickup
6 Tips for How to Cold Approach Girls - beginners pickup,,pickup
go get em,,pickup
Funny Review: The Universal Hot vs Crazy Matrix - a Man's Guide to Women =D,,pickup
First instadate!,Had my first insta date today from asking a girl if she was waiting for a chem class at 9am. We had an hour long conversation that lead to us going to barnes and nobles and the mall. Date didnt go anywhere but I am improving leaps and bounds by just going out every day. Crazy when I first started two months ago I couldnt tell 5 random people hi.,pickup
Live stream answering pick up questions,"22 year old graduate student who studies sport psychology. I have been in the community since my freshmen year of undergraduate and i decided to take a study break and give back a bit. hope this helps people. although i have 100+ youtube videos on my life and philosophy, this is my first time livestreaming so hopefully it works out well. if you have any questions just drop them below. if you like what you see then subscribe. cheers

https://www.youtube.com/user/Pentakilleer/live

https://www.youtube.com/channel/UCy3ePDH7zTufd80mZ8Z5hXQ",pickup
Good Beginning Pickup none RSD?,Hey guys just wondering who are some good pick up artist I can learn good fundamentals that isn't RSD?,pickup
Request: Dan Bacon's Get your ex back Super System,Does anyone one have it? I would like to watch the program.,pickup
Alex &amp; Luca On Chasing And Following Through On Your Leads To MAXIMIZE Your Results!,,pickup
How To Kiss Girls (Sensual),,pickup
The Only Advice You'll Need To Attracting Beautiful Women...,,pickup
Anyone in Seattle?,Moved to Seattle for work a few months ago. I don’t have much experience cold approaching but if anyone in the city wants to day/nightgame I’d be down.,pickup
The Three Rules for Beginners in Game,,pickup
Gaming for Skillset vs Gaming for Results,,pickup
Russia: Botched 3 some attempt - Field Report,"Went out Solo. Walked into a bar and saw a cutie with a big smile. I said hi, she said hi and hugged me. She went to dance on stage with a friend. I just kept approaching other girls but I kept my eye on her. She went outside to smoke and got separated from her friend so I made my move again when she got back on dance floor. We danced, then I started running basic comfort game: what's your name? what do you study? Where do you live? Who are you here with? Show me your instagram photos. Oh you're a singer? That's so cool!!!!!! Etc. After enough comfort I said find your friend, let's go to the bar next door. We found the friend, but then then they wanted to buy drinks at this bar. I have recently made a rule: I never buy drinks for a girl unless she is willing to venue change. This has been such a great rule to follow!! I don't know why I've never seen it proposed before.
Anyway, the friend was pretty drunk by now so kept getting distracted by other dudes hitting on her. I should have been more of a LEADER and said NO, LETS GO NOW. But I agreed to wait 10 minutes while this guy spit his game. Luckily his game sucked and I got the friend's attention back and got them to get out of there and down to a quieter bar where the guys don't pick up.
Bought them cheap beers, and sat in a far corner where no one would bother us (any time guys hear English they always use that as an excuse to come in and fuck up my set, saying whoah where you from, bla bla bla). Ran standard comfort game again getting them to talk about themselves most of the time, and answering their questions with as few of words as possible (to stay mysterious and not accidentally start qualifying myself). Also kept the vibe up by joking/singing etc. 
Another guy did finally come sit down with us and try talking to them, but I just ignored him and told the girls we should go dance, so we stood up and he fucked off.
Out on the dance floor I finished getting logistics, I tried getting them to come to my house with lure of cigarettes and alcohol, but they seemed hesitant so when I found out one girl lived alone and we could go to her house I latched onto that. Only token resistance was that ""my place is messy"" my reply was ""it's ok we're drunk we won't notice anyway."" The logical excuse to go was there was a song that I wanted her to play me but our internet wasn't working inside the bar.
Ordered Uber. On Saturday night it was taking forever. After 15 minutes the first one canceled, and then had to wait another 15 minutes for the next one. A guy outside tried coming in and stealing a girl again. I knew this was dangerous so I told the girls fuck the uber lets just get a taxi. Couldn't get that to fly for whatever reason, but going back inside the bar to wait worked. And luckily again the guy didn't follow.
Waited for uber, got back to the girls place. This is always a nervous moment because sometimes these poor girls will just use you for the free uber ride home and then won't let you come inside, but again there was no drama; I just went straight up.
Inside when my target was in the toilet, I made out with the friend. She seemed pretty into it. I prob could have banged her right then but I was trying to set up the 3some and I didn't want the target to get weirded out too much. Long story short, the target just didn't get attracted enough to be DTF. And I couldn't get them to kiss each other so I could never get the that little spark to ignite which leads to a 3some. So we all went to sleep.
Still, waking up in between two hot Russians this morning was pretty nice. The target seemed pretty adamant about meeting up in the future for the whole ""you teach me english, I'll teach you russian."" So we'll see!
Lessons learned: Pretty proud of myself for mostly following the textbook: leading, especially when other guys come in. 
Man that was painful last summer in Romania learning that lesson OVER and OVER again: if guys come up to you while you are with girls, and act like they are interested in you. MAKE NO MISTAKE. They are NOT interested in you, they are just trying to STEAL YOUR GIRLS. Ignore Ignore Ignore and move your girls ASAP!
My biggest slip up was not leading harder for the venue change as soon as we met the friend. If that other guy would have had better game and brought in a buddy, that would have been the end of the set.
Not sure what I could have done to build more attraction in the target to get the same night lay. Generally SNL aren't allowed in Russia so there just might not be anything I could have done.

Note: most of the above story was done via google translate. this video really explains how useful it is: https://youtu.be/XcfnzTDm7Ps",pickup
If you’re in Montreal let’s go practice together.,PM me for info :),pickup
DAYGAME FUNDAMENTALS! Forgetting What's Important (+Infield),,pickup
The BEST Pick Up Lines?!,,pickup
I did game and I made a comic about it. It comes out Valentine’s Day!,,pickup
Pickup,Well been daygaming for the last month or so and I decided to document my progress here in this forum,pickup
Despacito or a Russian song: which works better to pick up girls?,,pickup
"[Question] What are the sources for healing? Especially past. Also How to process feelings ""correctly""?","I think I have some healing needs to be done. 

I went to psychiatrist and clinical psychologist.

Psychiatrist gave me antidepressants which I don't think I needed that. This also shows quality of medical profession.

But I had lots of anxiety ( fear of getting hurt, intimidation )

I am taking medicines (no anti anxiety) since 6 months with no difference in mental state.

I had memories coming suddenly in 2017 due to wrongdoings of ""friends"".( verbal and psychological abuse). I later found out most of them were very toxic as per theory. [ Few of them were textbook narcissists} 

So how do I process these feelings coming out from my subconscious mind?

I am thinking Chakra healing is good. 

Also Waking The Tiger book helped me.



",pickup
Alex Introduces Frederico! 4WN Hvar Graduate from Germany,,pickup
Alex Introduces Luca! 4WN Hvar Graduate from England,,pickup
Best aprouch at bus,"Im in bus after school, i see a cute girl at the same age of me what do i do. (17)",pickup
REQUEST Crushing It by Gary vee,,pickup
"""Nice Guy"" vs. BAD GUY! - Troll Chicks to Disqualify Yourself as a Normal Guy",,pickup
Do women lose attraction when you ask them to go dutch on a date?,"Ok so i'm getting killed financially on my first dates.
I really can't afford to drop 40-60 every time I meet a new girl...  

But i'm worried that the girl might lose attraction if I just come out and ask at the end of the date if she wants to pay for her own stuff. 

what do you think?",pickup
How to (specifically) use a female wingman.,I have an attractive female friend who is completely open to helping me meet women.  I know that just hanging out together is social settings is a plus because of social proof but what are some specific ways we can optimally use this partnership? ,pickup
How to you capture a girl's interest on twitter?,It's easy when she's interested in you but how do you start? ,pickup
Night club pick up?,how to pick up Hot STRIPPERS? has anyone tried?,pickup
Who actually did an approach today?,Just curious I didn't get a chance to do any the last two days. Tell us how it went if you did one. LETGO REddit!!,pickup
"[Question] Hi Guys, What are good resources for weight loss? I heard Kinobody is good. Any other resources or some YouTube channels for further guidance? Thank You.","I am currently fall in obese category. What plan do you recommend for me?

I will prepare my own meals.I will do exercises.

I also think I am low in testosterone( few months back I had tested it, It was in normal range but I don't remember exact value as I lost the report).

I think ketosis and IF combination will be very good.Any very good researched resources ( books, YouTube Channels)?",pickup
Gym pick up?,Tips on picking up girls at the gym? ,pickup
How to start pickup?,I'd like to have more women in my life how should I start pickup. I have been folowing rsd and some other guys for 1y now and have few successes but I want to get out of my comfort zone. Any essential things you would recomend? Your expiriences? What are some good places to find a wingman (online or real life)? ,pickup
Many people who do game have found meditation very useful. Join the server if you want to indulge in the spiritual side of things,,pickup
Exactly How To Know FOR SURE If A Guy Likes You,,pickup
How to Use Positive Feedback Loops To DEEPLY Connect With Girls!,,pickup
Captain Jack - Titan Gaming,"Hi all, did anyone ever get (and still have) this program by the great  Captain Jack? If so, please PM me - I'd love to ""discuss the programme"" if you catch my meaning. Read into that what you will...I'm desperate to ""discuss it"" and I'm very generous ;) ",pickup
How To Get Any Girl | 5 AWESOME Tips,,pickup
Social Circle Blueprint doesn't come out until June LOL,"Heard this from some of the RSD guys from socializing at the last freetour. 

If you guys ask the RSD customer service when it's coming out (from the chat box on their forum) they always say 'a couple of months'. And then they push hard to pre-order before the price goes up. 

I don't think half a year counts as 'a couple of months' LOL.

Btw, the RSD workers love to talk about all the bullshit at RSD. It sounds like it's never ending. ",pickup
"Touch em early, touch em often",,pickup
Help,so i there was 3 girls who were pretty fine and i went up and introduced myself wound up having lunch with them and then left..... later that day i was asking my friend (whos also a girl) for advice and then she sent me a picture of the same girl who i was wanting to talk too before i even hit her up........ where do i go from here,pickup
(request) SNAPCHAT SUCCESS SYSTEM,"Can anyone share this with me? Please, send me a pm! Thanks guys!",pickup
What To Do When Sets Are NOT Going Anywhere,,pickup
(request) Can any of you gentlemans pm me Dominance by JC?,will bless you with my big D.,pickup
How to Master Social Circle,,pickup
"""You're just a player.""",,pickup
What To Do On A First Date | Step By Step Breakdown | Online to Offline,,pickup
[Request] Latest RSD Masterminds,"They're on a new website new, anyone have access to the new site?",pickup
Anyone here from central europe east europe???,"Anyone here from central europe east europe???
what do you guys things about those numbers from last Owen's freetour

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=VO9VA8QVHYc  
maybe i am not top alpha male and member of high society -
but is not what I've seen in our culture, a girl with 55 dicks at 22 age - will be total whore - even amongst other woman mostlikely

what do you guys think ?  
those numbers seems outrageous for me
looks like different reality/worlds/culture
or maybe Tyler just using fear(the feeling of missing out the party) to sell more courses and his ideology  
another thing I have notice is that those women saying whatever is on their mind, changing their mind in a blink of the eye, it doesn't matter for them is it truth, they try to adopt to the social situation, trying to fit in and looks cool - whitout even thinking of it, so who the fuck knows what is the truth, even her friend is saying she is delusional

last girl I dated was 21 and she claimed to be virgin, I didn't find out is it true (i don't think she lied) - but it was my fault - she was about to comeback home for school summer break, and I said so let's make a break, because I want to game more, and when she back, she was full of resentment, so it didn't work out at the end.

btw I guess Owen is the last person you should ask for advice if you aiming for long term relationship",pickup
Looks like we've been had with the whole Papa suing over Reddit posts.,"One of my sources says that the stories a hole in it. If you get banned, you are unable to view messages, so no way he could have seen a message from Papa after he got banned. He says RSD does a ton of shady shit but he doesn't see this happening. They just do an IP ban and get  it over with. 

I asked the guy claiming he got sued for proof of it claims, but as of right now It looks like we've been had by a crazy person. ",pickup
Get HER Qualifying Herself to YOU- Attraction Tip [Day 6],,pickup
Forget Tinder! This App Makes Girls Chase YOU- Quick Tip [Day 5],,pickup
Pick Up Swedish Girls - 3 Openers for Daygame in Sweden - Stockholm 2018,,pickup
Any good programs about photography?,For improve my online profile,pickup
Mindset Loophole- Attraction Quick Tip [Day 3],,pickup
[Day 2] Attraction Quick Tip: SECRET SAUCE,,pickup
"Latest RSD Intel: Luke is not allowed to release any videos until Tyler has reviewed it. Any why you should keep watching RSD videos. Any the insidious cult tactic they use on their live programs, that REALLY fucks a lot of people up.","First off, a lot of people have been using my posts to stop watching RSD videos. 

I don't recommend that. The RSD instructors, are hypocritical, have exaggerated numbers, and overall shitty people, but most of the time their advice is spot-on. 

If they're advice isn't spot-on, then all the other PUA companies would be able to attack them on advice. But they don't because they can't. They are very attackable as people, and their programs are super attackable, but you can consider their advice as legit. 

On the exaggerated numbers, you have to keep in mind that very high numbers are not sustainable, even for good looking millionaires with great game, a lot of the time their numbers are under a hundred. A lot of the time they get a rotation of really hot girls, with great personalities. And then they mostly use their social circles to get even more hot girls. 

None of the instructors really go out that much anymore except Madison and Ozzie. A lot of them have main girl(s). There's only so much cum you can give out every week. 

Also, a lot of the instructors are old, fat, and not traditionally good looking. I don't want to make this into a looks matter debate, but when considering the impressiveness of any instructors numbers, it should be taken into account. 

You might have noticed that RSD does not give the super absolute truth on looks matter. But most people aren't capable of understanding it. If you are, then you probably have a very advanced insight to human psychology and you could probably make 7 figured in a year through marketing. But for 90% of the population, what RSD says is closer to the truth than what is in the mainstream media. 

Until you've seen in person really short guys, fat guys, ugly guys, poor guys, guys from middle east/india/asian courties totally crush it with women, then you probably won't have the foundation to fully understand the full picture of what women respond to. 

I see a lot of 'does race matter' threads on rsdnation. Most of their problems can be solve by simply watching a guy of their race crush it with women. Hell the simple pickup guys have pretty decent game, go watch them. 

RSD doesn't need to go into too much depth in looks matter. For an ugly guy, they more than enough know about the limitations, To the point that their reality is negatively distorted. RSD doesn't need to give any advice which would further negatively impact his reality. 

So yeah, even if Tyler's numbers are very exaggerated, they are still impressive to me considering what he has to deal with, and when it comes to pickup advice, he knows what he's talking about. They all do, except Luke. 

Anyone who knows Luke knows he has no game. He has a great social network, but most of the time he has to use his girlfriend to close to deal. And his cold approach game is virtually non-existent. Though he's a total fatso so that should probably be taken into account. But often he says the wrong thing so much, that he's not allowed to release a video until Tyler has personally reviewed it. All the other instructors do whatever they want. 

Tyler actually cares about his legacy, and making sure that any pickup advice given out is actually legit. He cares that his advice can't be criticized by other advanced guys. 

-----

If there's any major criticism on their advice, it's how much they emphasize cold approach over social circle game. Although they actually covered how much more powerful SC is compared to CA during the social circle blueprint launch, they pretty went back to the same afterwards. One reason for this is that their business depends on cold approach bootcamps. There's no such thing as a social circle bootcamp. Another reason is that a lot of the instructors tried social circle when their understanding of women sucked, totally failed at social circle, a lot of times got weird and creepy reputations, and did not get their first results until they did CA. 

CA is a great tool to not be totally dependent on your SC. But most of the times, a persons bests results come from SC, or warm approach at the very least, even for good looking high status people. And ESPECIALLY for the very not traditionally attractive. I've seen 4's and 5's date 7s and 8s a lot from social circle/warm approach, very rarely from cold approach. 

Again, what I've just said if stuff that RSD has actually said in their videos. The problem is, it's just not emphasized a lot. 

I remember being at the NYC freetour a few year back. A dude from Princeton was asking some sort of question, and Tyler gave him more advice of doing CA outside of princeton. I thought it was horrible advice. This is a guy who is on the nerdy side, but he wasn't a total retard case. He would be pretty happy with having a 7 or 8 girlfriend, and he's going to school with some of the best minds in the country. If he just spent more time socializing and meet girls through his friends, he would have gotten way better results. And Tyler was telling him to do more cold approach. 

The reason probably is because if the guy just socializes more, he'll probably finally get a girlfriend. If the guy does more cold approach, he'll get frustrated. But he'll want a return on all the time he invested into CA. But he'll hit a wall. And that's when he buys Tyler's bootcamp. 

Tyler had no financial incentive to strongly tell guys to do social circle game, so he never did. He finally told guys to, when he had a financial incentive (Social Circle Blueprint, and accumulating criticisms for his lack of social circle game talk  (now when he's criticized, Tyler can simply point to one of his social circle videos) ). Don't believe his bullshit that 'he had to wait until he could find a guy who really knew social circle game'. It's bullshit. It's not rocket science to make friends, and if you apply the stuff in blueprint decoded/10game that eventually a girl is going to be into you. 

**Yeah a lot can benefit from doing CA on the side, in some cases it's totally necessary because they need a medium to fail a lot without the consequences you'll get in a social circle, but even for those guys, when they get better, the majority of their results are still gonna be from social circle.** 

I've actually known a lot of guys who gave up great college experiences, full of friends and getting laid a lot or having and awesome girlfriend, only to bang their heads against the wall doing cold approach on stupid unaccomplished community college idiots. 

If you want further info and this, look at Bradock's love system interview about going from intermediate to advanced game, and his social circle mastery product. 

----

Finally, be very careful about when Tyler talks about his 'media scandal'. First off, 'media scandal' is an Orwellian term that he's using to subconsciously take the blame off themselves, and onto the media. As if it was the medias fault that Julien and Tyler gave advice that many guys have interpreted as sexually assaulting or in some extreme cases, raping women. 

Julien did give advice to take advantage of Japanese women's politeness to force their heads onto his crotch. Tyler did give advice to use physical force to subdue a women into having sex with you. This was actually advice they have given in the past, because this was actual advice in the dark spots of the seduction community back in the day. The darkside was that some guys found out that when using physical force, a lot of girls don't have the mental capacity to effectively resist, and they keep hoping that the guys would 'pick up the signals' and stop. 

I don't want to get into too much details on the psychology of sexual coercion, there are people who can explain that a lot better than I can. But theres no doubt in mind mind that Jeffy, Julien, and Tyler have all been very physical and forceful with women and coerced them into sex they didn't want. The women felt violated, and it's something they'll have to deal with for the rest of their lives. There's actually a leaked video where Julien forces himself on a girl twice. The first time he grabbed her head and force kissed her. The 2nd time he pushed her against the wall. She tried her best to push Julien away by pushing against his neck and head. She told him she's engaged and she kept saying 'no no no no'. You can see her give up. A lot girls don't scream and kick like you think you would see in the movies. The fear has a paralyzing effect. 

So when you hear Tyler talk about the main stream media (and believe me, there's plenty to criticize in the mainstream media). Keep in mind that what he's doing is what Tyler Durden did in fight club (it's not a coincidence that owen's pickup name is from Tyler Durden). Tyler found guys who were brainwashed by the mainstream media, broke them free of it, but they all turned out to be brainwashed into his cult. In the end, all the men were still sheep. 

What Tyler ( and Trump) are trying to do his use legitimate criticisms of the mainstream media brainwash you into accepting their own cults.

And one of the most used and most powerful tactics cults use is breaking your sense of morals. They make you treat other people badly. This happened in fight club, where they made their recruits do a bunch of shitty things to people. I also believe this was in the movie School for Scoundrels, where the instructor makes them pay 5000 to take their class, but in order to advance they have to do shitty things to people like instigate a fight, or they won't get their refund back. 

The reason for this is that for any normal person, a main part of their identity is to treat others as you would want to be treated. It's normal empathy, and it's a strong part of any healthy individual. So if they can take that away from you, they have effectively destroyed not only your sense self, but also destroyed the filters you have in place to resist being manipulated. You are now susceptible to having your sense of self rebuilt under their $influence$.

Some of the RSD instructors do this in their program by making you harass women. I'm serious. http://manwhore.org/forum/content/review-vegas-immersion-program-includes-straight-criminal-stalker-activity

Alex also did this on one his bootcamps, by making a guy punch a tranny in the face after the student kissed her. This was in a gay bar. Alex said that it was the only way to claim his masculinity. 

RSD and other cults make students do this by making them believe that it's the only way they'll get success. Think about this, you've planned the bootcamp months in advanced. Not only did you pay for the bootcamp, often you paid for the flights and hotel and you took time off of work. You've been looking forward to this program for a while. You know that the instructors are very smart and give great advice, you hold them in very high regard. Any you finally go on bootcamp, and they make you harass women. The women don't like it. Your sense of empathy kicks in, because you're not a psychopath. But the instructor tells you it's the only way. They withhold giving you any other information until you harass the women. All the information you've been looking forward to for months, that you paid several thousand dollars for, is being withheld from you. They further coerce you. They bring up your shitty luck with women. They convince you that your lack of success is due to your inability not to harass this poor women. This brings up a lot of bad emotions, a lot of sadness, and a lot of fear, and they use this to over ride your sense of empathy. 

Madison also talked a variation on this tactic when he was talking about pimps in one of his videos. The don't make the prostitutes do bad things, but they 'break' them by giving everything they own to the pimp. She's giving up anything that reminds her of his past and identity, effectively damaging her sense of self. 

So keep in mind that Tyler not only picked his pua nickname Tyler Durden to resist social conditioning and be a cool guy who can get women, but also his ability to brainwash and manipulate others into a cult like following. 
",pickup
3 Steps to Take Girls Home,,pickup
Biggest mistake guys make,,pickup
Breaking rapport confusion," Hey
Guys I have been learning from Roger love
 And he says to go onto high pitch whenever there are commas or periods 
That is so the audience's attention doesn't get diverted as when u use high pitch they know that there is more to come where as low pitch at the end means the sentence is over 
 But pickup says use breaking rapport
 That is lower your tonality towards the end of the sentence
 I am really confused",pickup
5 semesters of failure,"I’m truly failing at school with the opposite sex. I never had a girlfriend in my life and nothing has changed by going to school. I feel like even though I have friends, I’m not exactly finding females who like me. I’ll never have a girlfriend and I’ll be lonely regardless of how happy or sad I am. ",pickup
jason capital dominace,"is this program good.

guys who have it what is your review",pickup
Crypto Academy,Anyone have a mega link for this? Message me.,pickup
And now RSD Max just made a video with the exact SAME title as one of Todd's most watched video (Before getting deleted).,,pickup
Justin wayne shittalking on rsd and backstabbing Todd,"https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=FJwnF-Q9ZIA

found it today  
1. why even Todd wanted to make collabartion with him? if he talks trash on him, wierd  
2. he made acutally good point about rsd - its A LOT OF MARKETING, way more marketing than actually resluts and transformations  
3. anyway looks like a poor attemp of getting the scraps where 2 other fight,
i don't know him but it makes me suspicious, he might be fake, with paid girls",pickup
How To Get Laid,,pickup
Simple Question for Anyone who Actually Goes Out,"How do you afford it? Assuming you only go out 3 nights a week, and clubscost about 20 bucks to get in, that would be over 3 grand a year! I'm a college student! How is this possible?",pickup
Opinion of JMVL courses,"What is your opinion of JMULV material/courses?
 i.e. http://ultimateseductionsystem.com/ Is it worth the $$? 
",pickup
QUESTION - Did Tyler release missions for Mastermind?,"Note: I have login for Mastermind best version, but there's no new content that Tyler promised. Is it the same for everyone or just a problem with my account? Thanks.

He promised to put out missions like a year ago.",pickup
How to Talk to Girls &amp; Keep a Good Conversation,,pickup
UPDATE: Alex Meeting Up With Todd V (Latest Info On Alex North America Tour),,pickup
"Valentine v. RSD - RSD Responds, Alleges Embezzlement",,pickup
"[SERIOUS] This subreddit may go down too. We have just received intel that RSD is trying to take us down too, by posting links to their own pirated content, then serving notices to Reddit.","Papa is trying to delete this subreddit because we continue to be a platform for the former pickuptorrents mods to release their intel on here. 

They had no legal basis to ban us, so what they're doing now is posting links to their own pirated content, and serving reddit notices. 

If a subreddit receives too many notices, the subreddit gets deleted. 

The thing is, they can post links ANYWHERE. Even a random comment from a thread made 8 years ago. 

We have no idea how to handle this war. We are reaching out to reddit's legal team, but in the meanwhile, if you have any ideas, please post them here.",pickup
How alphas deal with emotional women and how to avoid being pussywhipped?,Hello! I’m looking for some resources on ways on how to psychologically understand and deal with the mood swings of emotional women. I’m tired soothing my gf like she’s a baby and I want to wear the pants in our relationship and put her in her place.,pickup
Latest RSD Intel: Why Tyler bails on his bootcamps and lets his assistants run the whole program.,"From those you didn't follow my posts on the last /r/pickuptorrents , in one of my posts I mentioned how Tyler often bails out on his bootcamps, letting his assistants run the whole thing. He maybe shows up for an hour or two to do some recording and then peaces out. 

Well I have some new information, on why he does that. People close to Tyler said his philosophy to that because it's for the greater good. This gives him more time to work on his free youtube videos and on his next paid products. It also gives some much valuable training time for his future RSD instructors. Right now Maze is definitely being trained, and there may be 1 or 2 more future instructors being trained. Luke is stuck in his quasi instructor/assistant role. 

Tyler feels it's the best way to get instructors trained, since otherwise people wouldn't buy their bootcamp since they're new and unknown. Although that doesn't explain that if they're being 'trained', why isn't Tyler there training them???

Btw, this isn't new, Tyler had pulled this shit off with Julien, Max, and Madison when they were all assistants. People would sign up for a bootcamp and then surprise! Max bootcamp. 

Another antic Tyler does is sometimes he allows up to 12 students on his program, breaking the '3-to-1' instructor ratio promise. But he's technically not breaking the promise because he also counts his assistants as instructors (he has up to 4 assistants). Not only Maze and Luke, but the also the fresh newbie assistants. It's possible Tyler may have had up to 16 students since he has 4 other assistants, but he's definitely had at least 12 on one bootcamp before. 
",pickup
"Alex Meeting Up With Todd V: Programs In NEW YORK, TORONTO, &amp; CHICAGO! (North America Tour)",,pickup
Valentine v RSD - Forgery is bad,,pickup
In this video I explain the secrets of how you can get laid every night and have multiple girlfriends,,pickup
How to start the year off fresh and powerful: 2018 New Years Resolution Meditation,,pickup
(REQUEST) Jason Capital status unleashed,"Hello, could someone share this one with me please ? :)",pickup
Trying to go clubbing New Year’s Eve,I want advice on how to bring a girl home to fuck from a club. I’m awful with women but I can get some to grind on me in a club. But that’s about it. Please help. ,pickup
[REQUEST]JULIEN TEN GAME MISSIONS,"I have tengame, but only first 4 missions, the rest i don't have. Could someone share please?",pickup
What questions are good and relatable to keep the person hooked in.,Post some question in the comment thankss,pickup
[Request] Girlfriend express by Jesse charger,Pm me if you have it for trades,pickup
New subbreddit (private),"Hey guys I’m making a private subreddit for sharing pickup stuff ..... I have conversation God and stuff.... if you are interested leme know.... Il add you because I don’t want this subbreddit to get banned
To get inside the group 
1) what kind of unique program you can share
2) how active are you 
3) are you Gona stay loyal with us 
4) Pm me",pickup
Discord group-shares,"For everyone still looking, we’ve started a discord group. If you’re down feel free: https://discord.gg/ydhJF37

❤️",pickup
[Infield uncut] DAYGAME in BERLIN (English subbed),,pickup
Please do not ask/share products on this subreddit!,RSD already got 4 subreddits banned because people were sharing products there. Please do not get this one banned. ,pickup
Valentine v RSD - Motion for Restraining Order / Temp. Injunction,,pickup
Jon Sinn Attraction Mastery Product,"Does anyone have the new Jon Sinn product Attraction Mastery. Willing to trade for it. I have ALL of his products and many others, pro PUA coach but love seeing what he puts out. Still all great info. Thanks",pickup
Why dont we turn to telegram groups?,,pickup
[REQUEST] 'The High Value Man' - Min Liu,"I have this book, but in a AZW3 format and I can't convert it into pdf or anything else. Here is the book and if someone can convert it, post it here. Thanks! :)

http://www.mediafire.com/file/ghcqdx24ny42m8x/The+High+Value+Man_+Principles+-+Min+Liu.azw3",pickup
conversation super star by Min liu,"If u have seen it plz make a short review for me
thx",pickup
Not a Discord Server where content is definitely not being shared,,pickup
Conversation God,Can any one share Conversation God by Jason Capital please?,pickup
[request]Ultimate seduction system JMVL,I would highly apriciate it. Btw i havent been here for a while and saw pick up torrents has been banned. Why is that?,pickup
[Request] Could any one please share with me Mind Of Mystery and The Vault Collection,I would be grateful for the share. I have been hopelessly looking for it without any success.,pickup
I have every rsd program to date any community where I can contribute?,,pickup
where can I find programs now?,"any sources ?
the one i'm looking for is not straight pickup, but general self-help",pickup
Picking Up Girls on Christmas,,pickup
"Latest RSD Intel: Papa's current tactics against Todd, Max caught shit-talking Todd again","Interns who work for Papa have it in their normal duties to defend him online. Recently, he made his interns post pictures of him and his wife to show her off, until she found out, and then she got PISSED, then Papa made his interns delete all the pictures. 

If you're curious, here's one of the places it was posted on one of the now deleted RSDnation threads

https://www.google.com/search?biw=1280&amp;bih=649&amp;tbs=qdr%3Aw&amp;ei=57k_Wpy0L8WM0gKu56aoDw&amp;q=%22papa+and+his+beautiful+wife%22%2C+site%3Arsdnation.com&amp;oq=%22papa+and+his+beautiful+wife%22%2C+site%3Arsdnation.com&amp;gs_l=psy-ab.3...8068.8794.0.9369.3.3.0.0.0.0.98.277.3.3.0....0...1c.1.64.psy-ab..0.0.0....0.Ub8RQdzqIT4

If you're curious to know what she looks like. . . she's about as good looking as Papa is . . . that's all I'm going to say about that. 

I'm not going to release her picture into the public, because even I know that's going too far since she's not a public figure, unlike her stupid fucking idiot husband of hers. But if you're someone I trust you can PM and I'll send it to you if you're very curious to see it. 


--------

Papa is claiming that Todd embezzled a shit-ton of money from RSD, and that it was RSD who is suing Todd. Papa is linking this page as proof

https://www.pacermonitor.com/view/3YGZ3UA/VanDeHey_v_Real_Social_Dynamics_Inc_et_al__nvdce-17-02230__0023.25.pdf

This is actually 1 document from the lawsuit Todd initiated on RSD. Google the case number on the document, it leads this

https://www.leagle.com/decision/infdco20171005i22

The lawsuit Todd initiated. Fucking Papa. Did he not think people wouldn't google the case number?

I haven't read it all the way, but geeze a lot of it is garbage. He talks about 'Todd is living off the reputation he got from Vegas Immersion'. No, it was actually Todd who make Vegas Immersion so reputable, and it is RSD and Luke who are living off it is, by not doing any work on it, and letting their unqualified free interns do all the work, as mentioned in my previous posts. 

A lot of this contains new dirt on RSD. Like many major credit cards refusing to do business with RSD, probably because of all the scam bootcamps and immersions, and they had to create an front-LLC just to process payments. 

That being said, Papa has some strong points of his own, at least in the context he puts them it. Interested to see how Todd responded. This was filed on 9/6/17, so Todd probably responded a long time ago. There's probably a reason why Papa is releasing only this document, and nothing else. 

----

Max caught shit talking Todd again.

People are leaving comments about Todd and mass disliking all RSD videos in response to all the dislikes Papa purchased for Todd's channel. In response to one comment on this video https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=MnYlzPf1rmg

Max replied with 

""I don't know what ""RSD"" did to Todd, I don't know what kind of argument there is between Todd, Nick and Owen. I'm just tryna pimp and give value. I'm not 100% familiar with the details and quite frankly I'm not interested in it.

I'm distancing myself from shittalking back and forth, I don't want to associate my channel with that kind of negative energy and prefer hustle and game over gossip and negativity. 

I personally wish **Todd all the best, apparently he had been involved in some illegal activity - but ey, I smoke weed, that's illegal too in some countries, so who gives a damn and hope to see him in a good mood next time our paths cross!**

For this channel: I will continue to post (hopefully) good shit on my Youtube, IG, Snap, FB and Twitter. I believe in value, fun and hot girls and hope you guys can profit from it!

That being said, take action and GG,
Max﻿

""

This is a hilariously weak attempt to shit-talk Todd without seemingly like he did. He's trying to use a tactic of insinuating something damming against Todd, then coming up with a justification of why it's not a big deal. Max is trying to manipulate his readers into making it look like he doesn't care and that he doesn't think lower of Todd's character, while disparaging Todd character. It's a poor-man's version of what Tyler did in this video https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=BpwTmbd00VY&amp;t=284s . A very poor-man's version. 

And this all came after the line ""I'm distancing myself from shittalking back and forth, I don't want to associate my channel with that kind of negative energy and prefer hustle and game over gossip and negativity."" Directly after. 

Btw, he sure seems to know what Todd did in this video 

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=YsLQpf6QcEc

Max seems to be in full lick-papa's-asshole mode. Max's character definitely dropped several notches after the first time he hung out with RSD-Derek. He's in 'being an evil is cool' mode, which happens to a lot of weak minded people when they hangout with RSDDerek for the first time. To his credit, Derek makes being evil seem really cool. 

Other strong minded people, like Manwhore (has criticized his garbage principles), do not fall into his frame. 
",pickup
The Gold Diggers Guidebook - my eyes were just opened.,"So i stumbled across this book just now and it's been one helluvan eye opener. The title is ""HOW TO MARRY A MULTI-MILLIONAIRE"". It is as the title suggests, a guide book for gold diggers to ensnare unsuspecting husbands with.

 There are excerpts in the google books link below and you can find it on Amazon: https://books.google.co.uk/books?id=E63WFktpMIoC&amp;pg=PA139&amp;lpg=PA80&amp;redir_esc=y&amp;hl=en#v=onepage&amp;q&amp;f=true

In truth this opened my eyes after reading such gems such as ""have his children (whether he likes it or not) - his kids are your key to cash""... And ""Mastering the 'inadvertent' pregnancy"".... Oh and the favorite ""retrieve the condom from the garbage... Hold against vagina...turn it inside out inside you and slosh around until all of the sperm has rubbed off inside of you""...

Guys it's war out there. Beware!

edited for typo 25/12",pickup
"Interesting, the pickup community is rebelling against RSD, massive dislikes on their newest videos, and all the comments are about Todd",Here's one example https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=MnYlzPf1rmg,pickup
lmao at trending hashtags #LeaveToddAlone and #MeToodd (for others who have been scammed by RSD),,pickup
Staus unleashed question,"Is status unleashed and higher status same or different programs.
Has anyone attended Jc live seminars.
Upvote to answers.",pickup
[QUESTION] Best Pickup program?,"I've thought about buying RSD Max, The Natural because it covers every area of pickup/dating, is it the best course? Thanks!",pickup
Post from /r/selfdevelopmentshares before it went down,"Recently Tyler made this post

""I've been with maybe 2 girls in my life that were even slightly on the bigger side. And they were both really hot.

My past several GF's were social media influencers who you can look up. Alexis Felix and CJ Sparxx were my last 2. Alexis was a petite model who weighs about 103 pounds and CJ was a 7X Playboy model.""

http://www.rsdnation.com/node/875987?page=1#comment-1609045

Anyone whose in Tyler entourage can tell you he's been with A LOT more bigger girls than just two, and some of them were pretty big, not just slightly on the bigger side.

He actually used to bring one of these bigger girls to his hotseats back in the day. All the students were like 'wtf' cuz they were expecting some super model. Don't get me wrong, she she had big boobs and big hips, but she also had quite a tummy, and didn't have a particularly good looking face.

I don't mean to demean or objectify her (which my post IS doing), but I'm calling Tyler out on his hypocrisy and lies, using the same language he and the other RSD instructors use to describe women.

People close to Luke are telling me that he owes a shitload of money to a lot of people: his associates, students, and even other RSD staff.

For a lot of his students, he makes them pay a 1000$ deposit to live in 'his mansion on the strip that is 24/7 parties' (it's 30 minutes driving away from the strip, in the middle of fucking nowhere, often girls freak out and want to go back if you pull them there because it's in the middle of fucking nowhere, not even a mansion just a big house, that Luke doesn't even live or visit maybe 3-5 times a year, throws a party there once a year so he can show students a video to convince them to go there), and doesn't give them their deposit back. A lot of the students have had to contact him 100-200 times, or even get RSD involved. Most of them give up. That's right, MOST. That's because the majority of the people who get scammed into going in the first place and not ask for a refund, are big pushovers.

Another way Luke scams people is have them back 300$/hr for a private 1-on-1 session, and never shows up. After countless no shows. After a while a student may ask for his money back, luke never gives it back. Again, most simply let him have the money.

He also does this to many RSD employees. He make an arrangement like marketing or video editing for pay. And then he never pays them.

People close to Luke says he probably has scammed at least $80k from people this way, and Wouldn't be surprised if it was way into the mid 6 figures.

He even bails on other important people. Last year, a few weeks before launch, Tyler found out that social circle blueprint was going to be a disaster. He knew that infield footage always sells well, he talked to Luke and they made arrangements to shoot infield on his birthday. That's right, Tyler was willing to spend his fucking birthday to fly out to Vegas to help his friend salvage the disaster that turned out to be social circle blueprint. Tyler goes to the night club early to the night club, and then waits. And waits, and fucking waits. Luke never showed up. Tyler was FUCKING PISSED. And social circle blueprint turned out to be a disaster.

If you didn't already know, Luke has a cocaine addiction (he may have stopped since his baby has been born), and has many habits of a untrustworthy deadbeat addict.

How did /r/pickuptorrents get banned? RSD went back to all the posts where people were sharing mega links with RSD materials, and sent legal notices to reddit for that. RSD already took the MEGAs down, so technically material wasn't being shared, but RSD sent so many notices and I guess Reddit thought it was cheaper just to delete the subreddit than to respond to each of the legal notices. We tried to stop RSD posts on the subreddit but RSD could flag any post, even 2 years old.

People close to Papa think it had more to do with the bad publicity we gave him rather than the actually sharing. Papa is very sensitive about his reputation.

Fun fact. Tyler, the other instructors, and the higher ups at RSD at the time had to have an intervention to force Papa to stop teaching bootcamps and hotseats. Papa had AWFUL reviews on his programs, and a very high refund rate despite the pushover demographic that usually buys the bootcamp. But Papa was still convinced his programs were the shit. Papa was extremely butthurt, and came up with the story that his business skills were so good that it was better for the company to focus on that than teaching.

Tyler also did something brilliant to help alleviate Papas feelings. In his freetours he always talks about how he 'should' stop teaching and focus on business (like papa did), but he continues to teach because he loves it so much. That is bullshit.

Sure, if Tyler, Julien, or Jeffy feel that the student is a pushover and they can get away with bailing out on the bootcamp and letting the assistants do everything, they will. But they all have extremely high teaching abilities too. And their ability to market that is why RSD is so successful, and why other companies like Mystery and Love System is only making a fraction of what RSD is doing.

Todd vs Papa court case. I still don't know anything. Nobody is willing to talk to me about it since it's an ongoing court case.

RSD just took down Todd's backup channel.

from his fb

""So it looks like the backup channel got taken down also. So far I've been going out of my way not to repeat any old concepts, but now I guess I need to. So that said, what are the videos you think are most essential for me to put out in order to give a full understanding of what ""Todd game"" is?""",pickup
RYAN DAYGAME INFIELD BREAKDOWN: Meeting a Swimsuit Model on the Street,,pickup
Tyler hate,"after the emtions calms down, I'm wondering why Tyler got some much hate

there is no evidance he did something wrong againts Todd, obviosly Papa is the one who using fake viewers to his channel and mostlikely disliking bots, and obviously only Nick name was on those ridicules accusations.

Maybe Tyler didn't nothing about it - obviously at this scale of RSD is impossible to monitor every micro move of your partner,
so I think the only one Tyle'sr fault might be that he is offical leader - and couldn't manage nick kho properly,
I hope to we will see more facts,

but the first reaction of the herd was outrangous, I feel like he took all the blame from guys who didn't get laid despite of RSD's teaching, 
is that the place where that anger and pain coming from?
I don't know him from reality, but when you look at his seminars he is there to help guys.

peace",pickup
Discord group,"Think it’s time we move from reddit and just start a groupchat, pin the programs that we wanna share. If you’re down feel free: https://discord.gg/ydhJF37

❤️",pickup
New subreddit for refugees of the greatest sub that got banned recently ;),"hi all, /r/NutBustingMaterials is where it's at.

I created it so that Gayson Crapital and continue to share his knowledge and wisdom on all things pick up.

see you all there!",pickup
Talmadge Harper having a sale,"A lot of his products have rave reviews but most of his stuff isn't stuff you can find for download elsewhere. If you want something that people haven't shared yet, now's the time.
[here's his website](https://www.harperhealing.com)",pickup
Valentine v RSD - The Initial Complaint,,pickup
GAMING WITH PRETZEL GIRL (+CATS),,pickup
Rip thebestsubsinthehistoryofreddit,"Man! I am sad that everything is gone. learned so many things so early(my coward brain would have taken more than 10years to understand)also overcame my addictions.i have a bad feeling that this sub is also gonna go down.so thanks everyone for sharing.i think every share helped someone in some way.and sorry to hear about letseatwater getting banned.

if you think, it is similar to julien controversy.sharing fsd programs and also discussing their secrets out in the open was a lil too much for the insecure greedy ceo much like that feminist chick.he got banned like julien in australia.letseatwater is gonna come out even stronger from this with his own Debunk fakemastery.   lol",pickup
Todd's latest video shows how pathetic RSD is,"https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=JeiAyy_W_A8

When Todd separated from RSD I thought it was over but seeing how low RSD can fall I now hate RSD Papa with passion.",pickup
Todd V. &amp; RSD dispute,"Has anyone else looked at the lawsuit records? There is so much info on the public record it is a bit absurd. 

Phone records, banking records, credit card records, email records, business records, RSD instructor contracts, tax records, licensing agreements, sworn affidavits, court hearing transcripts, transcripts from phone calls, and it just goes on and on and on. 

Did you know that RSD was accessing Todd's ""personal"" gmail account after he left RSD? That is pretty aggressive stuff right there. 

There is so much info about RSD out there now it is going to take days to just get through it all and comprehend what it all means, in terms of figuring out what the legal disputes are, what evidence supports each side, and what the likely outcome appears to be heading towards.",pickup
[ALERT] TODD VALENTINE'S CHANNEL,"Man it's crazy. Todd's videos are full of dislikes. Man that is proof enough of RSD manipulations, after Winner Game clarifying the truth. After that, you can't tell me they are the best at game. They are just marketers, not real PUAs. If they can fake dislikes, they can do it with views and likes as well. THINK FOR YOURSELF!",pickup
Megapickup is gone now also?,I guess there is some truth to the rumour of an rsd intern here in our midst wreaking havoc. ,pickup
New Community,"Since there are a lot of refugees here first i'd like to point out that you are welcome at /r/megapickup. But I expect that we get banned to I think we have to think about a new website for our sharingcommunitys. If anyone has an idea just post... what do you think about kik? 


EDIT: Is this the revenge for taking Todds side? Did we got on RSDs Radar for that? Because this is the kind of censorship RSDPapa would pull of isnt it? -.-",pickup
Official refugees of /r/pickuptorrents thread,"This is just a thread for refugees of /r/pickuptorrents to find each other again. No sharing allowed here. If you want to share, make arrangements to share on another subreddit ",pickup
"Due to recent events, do not post any public links at this time. However, I'll be making a separate thread for refugees of /r/pickuptorrents to find each other and mingle",,pickup
Approach anxiety and the worst that can happen,"I got into game and did my first real approach back in the 3rd of March 2017, I can vividly remember ""her"".Clear skin, red soft lips and those intoxicating eyes, which will draw you in."" hi, I'm Austin"". We shook hands, ""I saw you in chem100 class, and I don't know why but I like you, we should hang out sometime. Can I have your number ?"" She looked at my eyes, ""Maybe next time, I have to go to class, nice meeting to you."" With that she left. Instead of feeling pain, trauma, sadness, I felt this euphoric ""high"". I felt happy. At least I asked her out, and there was this quote playing in my head ""every rejection is one step closer to success"", from the book Alpha male by john alexander. It was a great feeling, a new high. I would talk to girls in bus stop, train, streets. I got few phone numbers and then came the downside.

 I went to a book store and saw this pretty girl and talked to her using opinion openers, she was quite chatty and laughing, at one point I asked her out, she rejected me. I told her "" have a nice day, left the store and went outside to smoke a cigarette. After about five minutes, two mall security guards and came and started enquiring about my whereabouts, where I was ?  did I talk to anyone in the bookstore ? Then they told me the lady whom I talked earlier complained against me for disturbing her. I was perplexed and decided to go inside to confront the lady, turned out she was gone. The guards were puzzled as well and told me I was lucky enough that she left or else they would have issued me a trespass notice, like I wouldn't be able to go there for one month, If I go within one month I would be arrested.
 
Now that rare and extreme incident was the worst thing that could have happened to me, yet only my ego was injured. The meaning of what happened could be of what I wanted it to be, negative or positive. I might as well go positive. I could let one girl change my life, ending my journey to be a player right then and there in that bookstore OR I could charge through that failure to reach the next achievement- which I was one LARGE step closer to success. Hours later I left that bookstore I started to approach girls again without fear and hesitation.
If the worst that can happen from approaching a girl is embarrassing but sad story, maybe getting a trespass notice isn't so bad. Now you don't have to get a trespass notice to be successful with your approaches, but you must have the belief that everything happens for the sole reason of improving your game. The last thing you want to do is let a rare incident affect your behavior.
Have no fear and approach !! 

",pickup
"before my account gets banned, just wanted to share this conversation I had with Julien.","Edit, should have just done this in the first place, but screen shots

https://snag.gy/jsfyVD.jpg
https://snag.gy/9HhJLf.jpg
https://snag.gy/pkfvJb.jpg
https://snag.gy/avNLh5.jpg
https://snag.gy/DSadBs.jpg
https://snag.gy/bnA47y.jpg
https://snag.gy/5PBKDy.jpg
https://snag.gy/eOr7zy.jpg
https://snag.gy/DCR3ux.jpg



BeardLaw TenGame
expand allcollapse all

[–]from BeardLaw sent 1 year ago

Hey man, TenGame is great. I just got divorced. i think you have original access to the product, i hope I can always get update new videos and i won't lose important files. i want to send you $40 ;) . Is that ok?
permalinkdeletereportblock usermark unreadreply

[–]to BeardLaw sent 1 year ago
no need just torrent it check my post history!

permalink
[–]from BeardLaw sent 1 year ago
You are a hero. Can you keep update when the new videos come out? I will donate for that. What's your PayPal brother?
permalinkdeletereportblock usermark unreadreply

[–]from BeardLaw sent 1 year ago
Do you have TenGame the best version?
permalinkdeletereportblock usermark unreadreply

[–]from BeardLaw sent 1 year ago
You're the best! What's your paypal? I want to donate money.
permalinkdeletereportblock usermark unreadreply

[–]to BeardLaw sent 1 year ago
I didn't put it up haha.
Were you able to get past 85%? A bunch of us are stuck here.
permalink

[–]from BeardLaw sent 1 year ago
I'm stuck here too haha. I think you have access. I just need you keep sending these beautiful links. I want to donate, whatever. Where can I donate?

permalinkdeletereportblock usermark unreadreply
[–]to BeardLaw sent 1 year ago

I just pass on whatever else I see lol, donate to the guy who actually purchased it
permalink
[–]from BeardLaw sent 1 year ago

We have your activities logged. We can request reddit provide your your IP address at 8:43 PM GMT, to reveal your: name, email address, home address, and other evidences.

Under the Criminal Code of United States Of America , Section cc. 380.(1), you are implicated of an indictable offense that is punishable by a term of imprisonment up to 5 years and $250000 per offense.

You have 12 hours to delete all infringing posts and content that you have uploaded. We will call the police referencing your reddit name to initiate investigations AND contact the Intellectual Property (IP) Program of the Financial Institution Fraud Unit of the Federal Bureau of Investigation. www.fbi.gov/ipr

http://imgur.com/a/EPHKX . People who love you will lose you. If you're continue doing this, that day WILL come. It's just a matter of Time.

permalinkdeletereportblock usermark unreadreply

[–]to BeardLaw sent 1 year ago
LMAOOOO
permalink

[–]to BeardLaw sent 1 year ago

lol olololo lmaoooooo
permalink
[–]to BeardLaw sent 1 year ago

LOLOOLOLOL
permalink
[–]to BeardLaw sent 1 year ago

LOLLLLLLLL
permalink
[–]to BeardLaw sent 1 year ago

HAHAHAHAHAHAHHAHHHHHAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA
permalink
[–]to BeardLaw sent 1 year ago

I can't tell if this is actually RSD or just someone trying to make RSD look bad.
I wish I did give you a paypal account, just so I could get your info and and sue you for blackmail.
permalink
[–]to BeardLaw sent 1 year ago

the photo album was the icing on the cake btw.
permalink
[–]to BeardLaw sent 1 year ago

No, you're definitely from RSD.
Probably a free intern, no way someone who has skills they could actually make money with would be stupid enough to this.
On the other hand, Julien did post an instructional video on how to get away with molesting girls in Japan.
hmmm
either way LOLOLOLELERRRRLOLLIIIIILOL

permalink
[–]to BeardLaw sent 1 year ago
BHWHAHAHHWAHHAHAHHAAAAAA ALL THIS PATHETIC WORK JUST FOR NOTHING
permalink

[–]to BeardLaw sent 1 year ago
No Julien and stay away from Japanese girls you rapist.
permalink

[–]to BeardLaw sent 1 year ago
Well, at least you did make another sexual assault instructional video
permalink

[–]to BeardLaw sent 1 year ago
How about you donate your cock to Tyler's butthole.
permalink

[–]to BeardLaw sent 1 year ago
Do you ever feel remorse for all those women you molested in Japan?
If so, how does it feel?
permalink

[–]to BeardLaw sent 1 year ago
You know, those videos of you molesting those women are still out there.
If your self dev ever gets too big, they're going to resurface.
How does it feel?

permalink
[–]to BeardLaw sent 1 year ago

Even Jeffy said in one of his videos 'There's something wrong with Julien'.
Julien, what's wrong with you?
permalink

[–]to BeardLaw sent 1 year ago
How much did it hurt you?
How many hours did you spend drinking alone in your room, trying to escape the world?
permalink

[–]to BeardLaw sent 1 year ago

If you're continue doing this, that day WILL come. It's just a matter of Time.
Ever thought about the day when all your molesting will come back to haunt you? Thousands know what you did, and what your are really like. As your channel grows people are going to pass on the information.
We know how it affected you. Look how skiddish you are in all your videos now. Like some hurt animal.
permalink

[–]to BeardLaw sent 1 year ago
What's the matter?

Did I scare you off?
Maybe I triggered some unwanted memory? Unwanted fact?
Perhaps like, how thousands of people know, what you did to those women in Japan?
permalink

[–]from BeardLaw sent 1 year ago

What I did in Japan was a joke.
You will regret it.
permalinkdeletereportblock usermark unreadreply

[–]from BeardLaw sent 1 year ago
what happened in Japan = joke. You're really stupid.

permalinkdeletereportblock usermark unreadreply
[–]to BeardLaw sent 1 year ago

Sure it is. No cognitive dissonance there. I see absolutely none when you're trying to explain away your assaults.
It's just a big bad MEDIAA scandal.
permalink

[–]from BeardLaw sent 1 year ago

FUUUUCK YOU!
permalinkdeletereportblock usermark unreadreply
[–]to BeardLaw sent 1 year ago

Then why not release longer version of your clips to prove yourself?

I know why, it's because it'll just make you look worse. You took advantage of their politeness and you know it.
I think your biggest mistake was including the cash register girl, who was clearly scared shitless.
I bet I know what you think. You think sexually assaulting women is actually a joke, it's just that 'mainstream society' is too uptight on what it considers a joke, I have no doubts you actually believe what you did was a joke.
permalink

[–]from BeardLaw sent 1 year ago
Why are you watching my product? I'm your Master!!!!
permalinkdeletereportblock usermark unreadreply
[–]to BeardLaw sent 1 year ago

Dude, is this really you or some zealous assistant?

If it's really you just write 'limited TENGAME bonus' with tengame in all caps on your next forum or blog post and I'll remove the links.

This is only for a private audience for /r/illegaltorrents and I actually want you to make money on your products.
But I got set off but your entrapment and fake FBI posts were just so fucking pathetic. SO. FUCKING. PATHETIC. WTF.
What would you have actually done if I gave you a paypal?
permalink

[–]from BeardLaw sent 1 year ago
Where are you living? what's your name?

permalinkdeletereportblock usermark unreadreply
[–]from BeardLaw sent 1 year ago

Are you scared of me? If you're not. Let's meet.

permalinkdeletereportblock usermark unreadreply

[–]to BeardLaw sent 1 year ago
hmmmm?

permalink
[–]to BeardLaw sent 1 year ago

Sure, where are you living?
permalink

[–]to BeardLaw sent 1 year ago
You still offer value

permalink
[–]from BeardLaw sent 1 year ago
I asked what's your name? Are you scared?

permalinkdeletereportblock usermark unreadreply
[–]to BeardLaw sent 1 year ago

My name is Krinnin Smooth
I'm not scared
permalink

[–]from BeardLaw sent 1 year ago
Ok. If you will keep doing this in the future, someday you will end up sitting in jail.
Just ask yourself one question, you don't need to answer me : Is it worth it?
permalinkdeletereportblock usermark unreadreply
[–]from BeardLaw sent 1 year ago

Ok Krinnin Smooth. I think this is a fake name. If you're not scared , shoot me a picture of your ID.
permalinkdeletereportblock usermark unreadreply
[–]from BeardLaw sent 1 year ago

Your address?
permalinkdeletereportblock usermark unreadreply

[–]to BeardLaw sent 1 year ago
sureeee
permalink

[–]to BeardLaw sent 1 year ago
first prove to me this is Julien. You could just be some pedo.
permalink

[–]to BeardLaw sent 1 year ago
I'm over there
permalink

[–]from BeardLaw sent 1 year ago
Mother fucker. It's clearly - you're scared. Just don't keep doing this. I will end it here.
permalinkdeletereportblock usermark unreadreply

[–]to BeardLaw sent 1 year ago
Why are you so scared of me? I saw your message to the mods
RSD Real Social Dynamics Inc here. Please removes these comments (9+ comments) from this user, because we're working with the police right now http://imgur.com/xEHMSeG

I'm right here just talk to me nothing to be scared of

permalink

[–]to BeardLaw sent 1 year ago
Did I scare you off? You know what to do for the links to be removed and thanks for making the product.
permalink


BeardLaw What this you?
expand allcollapse all

[–]to BeardLaw sent 1 year ago
Were you guys behind the deletion of /r/illegaltorrents?

permalink
[–]from BeardLaw sent 1 year ago
Sorry, we warned you. We deleted /r/illegaltorrents . We had to. Please buy the product to support the authors.
permalinkdeletereportblock usermark unreadreply

[–]from BeardLaw sent 1 year ago

And if you will repeat it again, we will find you.
permalinkdeletereportblock usermark unreadreply

[–]to BeardLaw sent 1 year ago
lmao no you didn't.

https://www.reddit.com/r/Piracy/comments/4ncz20/rillegaltorrents_has_been_banned/?st=iqpnar3k&amp;sh=12b3a8dd
Just for that lie, I might make a video montage of your japanese sexual assault instructional video, that video encouraging guys to stalk women to their houses, the video of you encouraging guys to physically restrain cockblocks, saying racist shit to an asian girl and telling a girl she's too fat, mouth raping one girl after you picked her up physically restrained her and she cried out 'noo noo noo noooo', and kissing a 17 year old.

I have it all on my hard drive. I'll link the montage to the youtube accounts of everyone you ever did a collaboration with, using multiple video accounts including bideo, liveleak, and youku, so it'll take forever for you to take them out. They'll see the real Julien Blanc.

I won't do it though if you politely ask me not to.

permalink

[–]from BeardLaw sent 1 year ago

DON""T DO IT.

permalinkdeletereportblock usermark unreadreply
[–]to BeardLaw sent 1 year ago

Beg for me not to do it.

permalink
[–]from BeardLaw sent 1 year ago

This is too much now kid.

permalinkdeletereportblock usermark unreadreply

[–]to BeardLaw sent 1 year ago

Say, 'Daddy, please don't do it'
permalink",pickup
Did torrentspickup get banned also?,,pickup
I’ve failed,I promised myself that I would get better with women this year and I’ve failed massively no matter what I’ve learned and tried. I’ll never be happy and I’ll always hate myself. ,pickup
How to find love without internet dating!,,pickup
Secretly recording on a Tinder Date and then telling her about it - Newbie Pickup,,pickup
(Request) Kezia Noble How to Make Her Want You ebook,Wondering if anyone can share this ebook. ,pickup
"Asking a girl out I saw 7 months ago, working in the grocery store",,pickup
Richard La Ruina - Stealth Attraction,aHR0cHM6Ly9tZWdhLm56LyNGITlISUFEVHpUIVA0b2pkQlZrMnp4aTU0Y2hNU1JzcVE=,pickup
Twitch Pickup Self Amusement Compilation #3,,pickup
Asking singing girl out - Stockholm Pickup,,pickup
"""I don't know what to talk about."" Do it like this... [INFIELD]",,pickup
[Trade] Shogun method,"These are the products that I have

-shogun method
-texting on steroids
-conversational seduction
-seduction on steroids
-boyfriend destroyer system
-dark rake method

I wish to trade with any JC's products or any other derek rake's latest products. Please leave a comment!",pickup
"Heads up, /r/selfdevelopmentshares and /r/torrentspickup are replacements to /r/pickuptorrents",,pickup
[REQUEST] Black Book Volume Two,"Does anyone have the new Derek Rake product, Black Book Volume Two?",pickup
My favorite first message gets Venmo'd five bucks by me.,,pickup
"Request the business folder,",,pickup
All 3 courses mega tb,"So there were three links for the full 2 tb mega links, one for pickup, business and then misc, trying to find the misc self development course. It had shae matthews mediations as one wondering if anyone has this one?",pickup
Audiobooks Max has been listening to,"Shared via Snapchat:

    The Millionaire Master Plan: Your Personalized Path to Financial Success by Roger James Hamilton
    The Social Organism: A Radical Understanding of Social Media to Transform Your Business and Life by Oliver Luckett &amp; Michael Casey
    Hooked: How to Build Habit-Forming Products by Nir Eyal &amp; Ryan Hoover
    Pitch Anything: An Innovative Method for Presenting, Persuading, and Winning the Deal by Oren Klaff
    Disrupt You!: Master Personal Transformation, Seize Opportunity, and Thrive in the Era of Endless Innovation by Jay Samit
    Superintelligence: Paths, Dangers, Strategies by Nick Bostrom
    Levels of Energy by Frederick Dodson
    80/20 Sales and Marketing: The Definitive Guide to Working Less and Making More by Perry Marshall
    Genghis Khan and the Making of the Modern World by Jack Weatherford &amp; Jonathan Davis
    Losing My Virginity: How I Survived, Had Fun, and Made a Fortune Doing Business My Way by Richard Branson
    Rework by Jason Fried &amp; David Heinemeier Hansson
    Reden wir über Geld by Conny Bischofberger and Niki Lauda
    Flow: The Psychology of Optimal Experience by Mihaly Csikszentmihalyi
    The Willpower Instinct: How Self-Control Works, Why It Matters, and What You Can Do to Get More of It by Kelly McGonigal
    Think and Grow Rich by Napoleon Hill
    On the Shortness of Life by Seneca
    What Doesn't Kill Us: How Freezing Water, Extreme Altitude, and Environmental Conditioning Will Renew Our Lost Evolutionary Strength by Scott Carney
    Mastery by Robert Greene
    The Millionaire Fastlane: Crack the Code to Wealth and Live Rich for a Lifetime by MJ DeMarco
    Steve Jobs by Walter Isaacson
    MONEY Master the Game: 7 Simple Steps to Financial Freedom by Tony Robbins
    Magicians of the Gods by Graham Hancock
    The ONE Thing: The Surprisingly Simple Truth Behind Extraordinary Results by Gary Keller &amp; Jay Papasan
    Ego is the Enemy by Ryan Holiday
    Rich Dad Poor Dad: What The Rich Teach Their Kids About Money That the Poor and Middle Class Do Not! by Robert Kiyosaki
    Rich Dad's Guide to Investing by Robert Kiyosaki
    The Subtle Art of Not Giving a F*ck: A Counterintuitive Approach to Living a Good Life by Mark Manson
    Russian Level 1 by Pimsleur
    Elon Musk: Tesla, SpaceX, and the Quest for a Fantastic Future by Ashlee Vance
    You Are the Placebo: Making Your Mind Matter by Dr. Joe Dispenza
    Homo Deus: A Brief History of Tomorrow by Yuval Noah Harari
    The Intelligent Investor: The Definitive Book on Value Investing by Benjamin Graham
    UNSCRIPTED: Life, Liberty, and the Pursuit of Entrepreneurship by MJ DeMarco
    Aleksander Vitkin Sales Manifesto - Beggar VS Business Owner - How To Be A boss On Sales Calls
    The Lean Startup: How Today's Entrepreneurs Use Continuous Innovation to Create Radically Successful Businesses by Eric Ries

",pickup
Pick up artist in Essex,"Anyone following, are you gaming at all in Essex.
Particularly in havering? I normally game in central London but would prefer to meet local girls. 

Hoping to find some wings!",pickup
[Share] The 1.93 TB Mega drive of Pickup,"#My best share ever is over forever




I thank all of you who couldn't keep the link to yourself and shared it openly so the link got taken down too many times this year and finally my account got down too. 




I lost all my drive with it's 1.93tb content. 




If some of you did import it all to your drive and wish to help, thanks and contact me, if not, farewell dear friends, no more shares in open/ not private Subreddits






 https://imgur.com/gallery/eDJcf",pickup
[REQUEST] Audiobook: Levels of energy by Frederick Dodson,"Yea, that book that Max put in his snapchat story today. Been looking everywhere but can't find it, other than audible or itunes. ",pickup
Leo Gura - The Ultimate Life Purpose Course,"**Leo Gura - The Ultimate Life Purpose Course**

Become A Creative Force!
25+ hour video course 100% focused on how to design your dream career.

- Rocket Launch
- Meaningful Work
- Do Your Art
- Creative Control
- Financial Freedom
- Wake Up Excited
- Transform Yourself
- Become A Leader
- Impact The World
- Lasting Self-Motivation

Love Your Work!
Learn the psychological principles vital to creating a meaningful career.
Here's a HUGE secret: Your mood isn't determined by your position, but by your trajectory!

This means you can start feeling good about your career right now!

You don't need to wait for years until you get a new career or earn 6-figures to feel a renewed sense of optimism and relief.

By learning and starting to align your life with the right principles, you can start to feel good RIGHT NOW because you are taking action.

Feel alive again by tapping into your innate creative potential!

Who Is This Course Good For?
Professionals considering a career change
Aspiring entrepreneurs
Seasoned entrepreneurs seeking more meaning
Aspiring artists &amp; creatives
Those stuck in wage slavery
Those stuck in a rut or funk
Those going through a mid-life crisis
Those lost in life, wandering aimlessly
High school and college students
Self-help junkies
Aspiring leaders who want to change the world
Those frustrated with inconsistent motivation
Stay-at-home-mom's re-entering the workforce

Unprecedented Features
The most comprehensive video course about finding your life purpose!
35 Core Concepts

In-depth discussion of all the advanced theory you need to know to design your dream career.
25+ Hrs, 90 HD Videos

Massive amount of video content streamed in 720p. 90 individual videos cover every concept in great detail.
200+ Gigabytes

Uploading all this content took 2 months! The most comprehensive video course on life purpose.
Free Lifetime Upgrades

Even more content coming! As this course expands in the future you will get all the upgrades for free.
90+ Exclusive Content

The theory and techniques discussed in this course are nearly all brand new, never before released on Actualized.org
Worksheets &amp; Exercises

Not just theory, but actionable techniques for creating results. A dozen worksheets and dozens of exercises.
Guided Visualizations

Over a dozen guided visualizations that start to drip on your subconscious mind, creating emotional shifts.
Instant Online Access

No waiting. No shipping. No downloading. Buy now and start watching in minutes in your browser.
Well-Researched
Life purpose strategies gathered from world-class experts.

I spent years reading books and taking notes on the best advice on life purpose that exists. This course is full of insights from exceptional people:

Self-made millionaires
Marketing experts
Best-selling authors
Entrepreneurs
Academics &amp; PhD's
Psychology researchers
Self-help gurus
Spiritual gurus
Coaches &amp; therapists
Visionary creatives &amp; artists
World leaders

**aHR0cDovL2Jlc3RnZngub3JnL3R1dG9yaWFsL3Byb2dyYW1pbmctdHV0cy8zOTA2MzktbGVvLWd1cmEtdGhlLXVsdGltYXRlLWxpZmUtcHVycG9zZS1jb3Vyc2UuaHRtbA==**

* *HOW TO GET LINK DOWNLOAD:
Go to base64decode.org (or another website with a base64 decoder) and decode the string. You then get a link*",pickup
[REQUEST] The Pickup Artist VH1 Show,"Are there anybody have this show torrent or megalink etc. ? I always wanted to watch.
Thank You",pickup
The Only Advice You'll Need To Attracting Beautiful Women...,,pickup
Interviewing hot girls at Tailgate,,pickup
"Why is it that I am naturally smooth once I realise the girl is digging me but start and stop, and have to force myself to continue to begin with each girl?","it's not approach-anxiety, because i got over it...mmm, i guess maybe I am impatient. I have learnt that it is easier if you show empathy and genuinely just want to talk/get to know the girl. like it is scary how ""natural"" i become once i see she is into me...just that the start of a convo sometimes is like stopping short or not changing gears enough xD hope that made sense and if anyone can help, thank you",pickup
[Request] Anyone got NYRNE by Alex Social?,"Hey all, If anyone has a quality copy of NYRNE they could share that would be amazing.",pickup
How to Pick Up Women in a Bar,,pickup
Pickuptorrents got killed,"Hi guys I opened a subreddit where we can go on with our buisness! 

/r/megapickup",pickup
Cold approaching a girl on the train 6AM in the morning - newbie pickup,,pickup
Pickuptorrents got banned,"But we can rebuild here!! If you know any active members from /r/pickuptorrents or other awesome subreddits, tell them to migrate over here and join the party!!

Also if you’re a pickuptorrents refugee, please offer value in this sub by sharing. I’ll be sharing myself in the hopes of getting more nice ppl to join.

Here’s to a new beginning!",pickup
Overcoming FEAR and PROCRASTINATION | PRODUCTIVITY HACK,,pickup
"I made a quick, informative, 8 minute, animated video explaining society's conditioning and how it affects you getting laid","I made a quick, informative, 8 minute, animated video explaining society's conditioning and how it affects you getting laid https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Y0CjtBa01_o",pickup
The Double Ds of destruction that kills relationships and even other parts of peoples lives.,,pickup
rawr,I made a video summing up concepts in game,pickup
The Vault Collection 7 4 Tips,,pickup
Asking random girl for a fika - Stockholm Pickup,,pickup
"How To Get Back Into Game After Taking A Break (Your Magic, The Spark &amp; Rhythm)",,pickup
"PUA JMULV's story. ex-RSD associate, had a following for skills and coaching. Day before lauching his own company Vegas Immersion (before RSDs version existed), was falsely accused/arrested, by a scheme by RSD (Manwhore and Derek). RSD then proceeded to start their own vegas immersion program.",,pickup
Eye dilation being an indicator of interest - body language,,pickup
"Lesbian Picks up HB9 Model, FAILS. Man AMOGS.",,pickup
Picking Up Girls in NYC,,pickup
DAYGAME in STOCKHOLM,,pickup
The ultimate attraction formula: the twin forces behind relationships (Connection + Chemistry),,pickup
"[Question/Request"" Julien NSFW video","I'm looking for a video that was posted last week with the description 

""First off, here's one of Julien's deleted RSD videos that starts off with him fucking a girl nsfw and then an infield of him emotionally abusing a girl on her weight.

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=svbuuqT5v0k""

Did anyone save this that can reup or send this to me please? Thanks! ",pickup
Brent Smith - Lifestyle Advice Program,"**Brent Smith - Lifestyle Advice Program**

Brent Smith was originally one of the inspirations for David DeAngelo's dating system and his eBook. Brent also appeared later in David DeAngelo's seminars and interview series as ""Brent"".

Program contains Video of Mastermind Group where he interacts with Clients and give them life style advise.

How to Attract Hotter Women by Breaking All The Traditional Dating Rules

* Brent's rules include the following

* Don't ask her out.
* Don't get her number.
* Don't stand around searching for ""targets.""
* Don't dress like a fool.
* Don't keep talking to her.
* Don't hit on her at all.
* Don't compliment her.
* Don't try to get her to like you or want you.
* Don't text, IM, email, call, or FB message first. Even sending a FB friend request is off limits.
* Don't over communicate.
* Don't booty call.
* Don't think about her when she is not around.
* Don't buy her anything.
* Don't pick her up for dates at her house.
* Don't take her to dinner.
* Don't take her on any traditional date.

************************
**aHR0cDovL2Rvd25hcmNoaXZlLm9yZy9lLWJvb2tzL3ZpZGVvLXRyYWluaW5nLzQxNjc0LWJyZW50LXNtaXRoLWxpZmVzdHlsZS1hZHZpY2UtcHJvZ3JhbS5odG1s**
***********************************

Go to base64decode.org (or another website with a base64 decoder) and decode the string. You then get a link download.",pickup
[4 The Dudes That Love Details]Infield Breakdown: Step-By-Step: HOW TO PULL a Hot Blonde Home from Daygame,,pickup
[Video] Unleash The WARRIOR How To Get More Results with the Power of Meditation &amp; Mindfullness,"Man.Up guys, i recorded a video in barcelona with my friend Martin Mezei, talking about Meditation, Mindfullness, Masculinity, and How To Let It Go, the struggles you had on the past, hope you guys enjoy it. Peaaaaaaace Xx
[Link] https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Qfe__owO9T0&amp;t",pickup
Good books to start learning game?,Hey guys so what are some good books aside from mystery method and the game?,pickup
[Sharing]Abracadabra-A.D.,done ,pickup
Justin Wayne's pick up mastery,"Hello i was wondering if anyone has Justin wayne's latest program called pick up mastery, or at least where to find a torrent for the program? I would greatly appreciate it",pickup
"Looking at RSD, what are the programs about /how do I chose the best one for me?","I'm trying to pick while the 50% off sale is going on
Should I go with the Natural? Pimp? Blueprint?
Madison looks good too.


How do I pick? ",pickup
Asking for interviwes - and a date! Rejection Therapy,,pickup
It's in the glass!,,pickup
"My karma is to low, can u guys help me out so I can post on here?",,pickup
What To Do When He Comes Back After He Left You,,pickup
Talking to girls on the subway? - Being Your true self,,pickup
Exposing Fake coach and scammer Frank Haro (Franknightgame from Pickup Decoded),"Hello guys it's hotseattribe, today I'm going to expose this fake coach &amp; scammer [Frank Haro](https://www.youtube.com/user/RSDFrankHaro/) (Frank nightgame from pickup decoded) 

As many of you know I've shared some stuff to this community, this time I want to share this bad experience I had... all this I'm putting out there, is to prevent others so they don't fall in the same trap I did, by trusting this guy. :(

**Proof1:** https://i.imgur.com/MPA5Zne.png **2:** https://i.imgur.com/MktlodT.png **3:** https://i.imgur.com/uYxzXUH.png 4: https://i.imgur.com/Wp0UKJx.png 5: https://i.imgur.com/t1XxNgc.png

Finding Frank's youtube channel is probably the worst thing that has ever happened to me since I got into game. I found him and liked some of his videos, he seemed to be a trust worthy and honest guy, or that's what he presented himself to be. After going thru many videos, and watching him ""supposedly expose RSD"", I thought this is an honest guy I would like to learn from. But guess I was wrong, probably found the most fake guy in the pick up industry (I have to admit he is very good at putting the trust worthy guru mask). Today, I'm going to unmask Franknightgame. A person who has no ""Integrity"" and ""Honesty"".

So this is the story... I paid to take a Bootcamp with him. First I hit him up at his personal phone, we talked and he was very nice and attentive to me (only while trying to sell me on a bootcamp), after talking to him a couple times, I  was sold on a bootcamp with him (how stupid I am haha). He said to make a deposit, It took me less than 5 minutes and I sent him the money thru venmo as he said to do so (Up to that point he was the most responsive person).  I was almost pretty sure I was going to be able to take the bootcamp and did everything to try to make it happen. A few weeks later for personal reasons and shit that happens in life, I realized I wasn't going to be able to take the bootcamp. I contacted Frank (after being very attentive, this is where he went very cold on me), I told him I wasn't going to be able to take the bootcamp, after that he did not reply (before he would reply a minute or so after I texted him), messaged him a couple days later and told him I had requested the deposit payment I had made for the reservation through Venmo (Money transfers are instant there), he did reply, and told me ""he would call me sometime next week to talk"", told him ""it was okay but I would still need the money back"". He never called as he said he would and also did not reply back. I texted him a few days later, asking him when I could expect the refund on my deposit. He personally told me 30 days from the day received.

He tried getting me to lean the payment into skype coaching. I told him I was just going to proceed with the refund. he replied ""ok will do so"". So I went a few weeks with out worries and no contact, I knew I wasn't going to get my money for the time he said, I texted him a few days after I thought I would have my money back,  he did reply but told me  ""I would get it on the 30th day from when I requested the refund"" (I thought it would be from when I made the payment). I did get a little frustrated because it never takes that long to process a refund,  but accepted in my mind I would have to wait a little bit more to get my money. So days passed... I texted him a couple days after the 30th day had past because I was surprised I didn't get the money as he said I would, got no response from him at all, a couple days later after not hearing from him I tried calling him a few times, he never answered his phone nor tried calling back later. Left him a text asking when I would have my money and if I could please get a response from him. He replied and said ""on Monday"", I waited patiently and Monday came through and I did not receive my money or nothing from him, I did text him at the end of the day telling him ""I would really appreciate my money back today"" I got no response from him whats so ever (I really did need the money, I've been going through a hard time lately and I've waited long enough). I did get frustrated not hearing back from him and sent him some other texts in the following days, he finally replied saying he sent the money already, to let it process for 1-2 days to get it (wtf, venmo's money transfers are instant, money doesn't need to process there, when I sent the money it took me less than 5 minutes to send it and he got it instantly).

Many days have passed and I still didn't receive the money he supposedly already sent. I've been very patient with this fake guy, and I know it just takes a minute to make the transfer and me to get the money through venmo, that's what it took me to send the money right after he told me to do it back when I did the deposit. And even knowing how fast it is for him to send the money, I accepted to wait the 30 days he said, but way more than 30 days have passed, and every time he says another day, that day comes and nothing not even a response, text or call... he has no integrity and is not a man of his word, or even has the shame to answer the texts. I have to say this again... It took me less than 5 minutes to send him the money, and now 2 months later and I can't get my money back, what sucks is at this time I could really use that money, currently going through a hard time. Before this I thought this guy was different and trustworthy and that's what made me contact him in the first place, I deposit my full trust in him, I thought he was a person of integrity and that's why I was going to do a bootcamp with him, but I guess that's just his fake front. 

**Update:** Since his last text, that was weeks ago, when he supposedly sent the money back, He has not replied deleted me on FB, and delets my comments on youtube when I try to expose him.  I will continue to expose him through a video with all the proof I have, and online. Be careful guys! On which coaches you trust, most of them don't care about their clients, they just care about the money. They want to get rich at the expense of others, that phrase he uses keeps coming to my head ""Look beyond the surface"". I didn't look beyond his scam mask, trusted him and here I am now. :(

P.S. Sorry for my bad grammar and bad English, I'm learning.
Peace to you all, wish all of you the best.

____________________________________________________________________________

**Update:** He blocked my number after I called and told him I would proceed to legal action if he did not return my money.
Last thing he said was: ""You can do what ever you want, I already have the money there's nothing you can do about it. Just drop off."" Fuckin scammer! I can't believe I even trusted this guy, makes me question the whole community, you can't trust no one now days. Most of this guys only care about money and themselves.  ",pickup
Todd is back! Nearly...,,pickup
How to be more influential through understanding relationships.,,pickup
Sleep learning,"Does it help if I play audio files of products while sleeping,  like will I actually subconsciously learn all of them and be able to adapt it or is it just useless 
Pls let me know ",pickup
Guess who's back.,,pickup
Women and manipulation,,pickup
[SHARING] Marv Serman - Milf seduction,aHR0cHM6Ly9kcml2ZS5nb29nbGUuY29tL29wZW4/aWQ9MUxvU2pMMkZuY1VHSEtGbXNLNGtpb0RnMHN1Q09oa1RD,pickup
"[Daygame Infield] ""Epic Instant Date &amp; Epic Fail""",,pickup
[SHARING] creating and maintaning open long term marriages,aHR0cHM6Ly9kcml2ZS5nb29nbGUuY29tL2ZpbGUvZC8xVDQtdXZOcGRhTDlxMGVxY2tyck1VV0VhSm9XZEpTUk4vdmlldw==,pickup
Shogun method or girlfriend express?,Would anyone be willing to share the shogun method and/or girlfriend express? I'm interested in both and would like to see if either would work.,pickup
How to Date over 45: 5 Mind Blowing Tips,,pickup
Message check,"Ignore this message fam, I'm having my posts blocked by bots",pickup
Pickup Girls On The Street Daytime. Help?,"Has anyone got any experience in this kind of pickup? Tinder isn't working for me and I'm not interested in any other online dating source. 

I can't get myself to talk to girls on the street, it just feels socially unacceptable. Any tips? How do I get the courage to interrupt girls while they're walking/talking/listening to music and tell them they're cute?",pickup
Any one interested in Talmadge Harper - 5 Minute Orgasm Experience?,"If you would like to have it, kindly upvote the post!",pickup
(REQUEST) SQUIRTING TRIGGERS 2.0,"Does anyone have this one, (not the Marcus London one) ? 
The sales page is
https://www.schoolofsquirt(dot)com/160-discount-x5-mobile/  
(sending from my phone, hence the ""mobile"" in the link) 
I've gotten the other School of Squirt/Squirting triggers program offered on here which has  Marcus London in it, but it appears to be totally different from the one on the above sales page by Laura and Axel. If you watch the video until the end, more details of the course will appear on the page. If anyone has it I'd really appreciate it if you shared it. Thanks in advance.",pickup
Pickup Japanese girl in clothing store (infield video),,pickup
Best places to sarge,"Where are the best places and countries to sarge and the best open minded women for the game?
",pickup
Best program for Tinder game,"So I've watched ETP which covers Tinder, is there any other info out there on increasing success with Tinder that you'd recommend?",pickup
"Lessons from 1,000+ approaches","So I used to be a Daygamer in London. Kept a counter - did 500+ cold approaches. Had training from Jon Matrix, Tom Torero, Street Attraction, to name a few.

On top of that, I used to do night game too (although I never kept a counter for that). I have easily approached over 1,000 women since first learning about Game.

**3 key lessons I learnt:**

* Lesson #1: You really don't need Game.

* Lesson #2: Real confidence is the ability to speak your truth and be unaffected by the outcome.

* Lesson #3: Game is hard work; it's much easier to just be you.

Wrote a longer article about my journey if y'all interested:
[https://www.nickhatter.com/single-post/2017/11/11/Men-heres-why-you-dont-need-game](https://www.nickhatter.com/single-post/2017/11/11/Men-heres-why-you-dont-need-game)

**I accept I may well be down-voted into oblivion for posting this, but even if you disagree strongly, understand this:** At least I have gone out there, put the time and effort in, gone through the pain of doing cold approach after cold approach, and I am not talking from some theoretical point of view.

Thanks all, and I wish you luck on your journeys!",pickup
[Sharing] Some texting &amp; phone game products/pdfs,aHR0cHM6Ly9tZWdhLm56LyNGIWxQaG1oSzZCITRacDNobFc2NndLR1dlUl92WmpJVGc=,pickup
PICK UP MASTERY and Pulling Mastery,"Pulling in less then 30 minutes.
For intermediate who want to advance to expert level!

Sick and tired of all those times where you failed to pull at last second?
Or when you actually do it, you take alot of time and you didnt even know what you ve done right?
Im doing a group buy of the  program and i am only willing to accept an exclusive group of 4, who really want to master this skill. After that, the group is closed

PICK UP Mastery
Legendary justin wayne and ben baker just launched a mega product, covering all the areas of the pick up. Inner game, outer game, text game. All that fully explained. Also doing a 4 man group buy


",pickup
How To Get People to Listen To You (+Twist),,pickup
[Sharing] The Flinch by Julien Smith,"Upvote and then comment for share

EDIT

Base64 link added below, just upvote if it gives value 

aHR0cHM6Ly9tZWdhLm56LyMhbGJweW5DQlIhNDQzSG15bmFLVF9UMnBhRFFOeDVCTTlDdmZlYVB0Mkp4RU56dU1senhuOA==",pickup
[Question] Improv programs or something similar?,"Does anyone know any programs that help develop improv skills?
",pickup
(request) Gabrielle Moore programs and David Shade programs,"Hi I am looking for the different programs from Gabrielle Moore, and then specially the Naked U series. I am also looking for the different books and courses from David Shade.
If anyone has this, I would be soo glad, as I'm so eager to learn moore.
",pickup
"Products for releasing trauma, fears and past situations","The methods i discovered and tested over the years are.

body oriented: TRE, EFT, Prana Healing, whim hof method, breathwork

mind oriented: The Work, Releasing Technique, ho'oponopono, meditation (forgiving)

For long time, i thought these techniques are only part of the esoteric scene but after i tried some of it, i found the benefits. 
After every release i felt more and more relaxed. 
Social conversations with persons and thoughts about past situations changed and it helped me a lot in the game. More than any pickup method. I am even more relaxed around woman. The results are often not instand but you see the progress over some days and weeks. 
The body oriented release techniques work best for me because my mind can relax and the body can heal itself. 
If you are new - try TRE. With mediation and breathwork, it is part of my daily routine.

-
What are your best methods and products to release trauma, fears and past situations and what are your results?",pickup
(trade ) sonic seduction by derek,anybody can share mega link for this product? i have other products to trade if anyone need sth in return thank in advance,pickup
(Request) GIRLFRIEND IN A WEEK by Jonathan Green,"It's a bit older, but if anyone has this program and can share it, that would be great...especially with it's accompanying videos, but even just the pdf's would be appreciated",pickup
(REQUEST) CALIFORNIA METHOD by Matt Cook,Hey does anyone have this program and can share it? Does anyone know if it's any good?,pickup
Best Daygame teacher/program??,"Who and what do you guys think is the best or most effective teacher or program for daygame? I know of Magic Leone, RSD, Yad, Justin Wayne, Deepak Wayne, Sasha Daygame, etc. Even though naturally we've all practiced daygame from grade school when we pursued girls in school , but until now I never realized there were systems or strategies to be more effective at it. ",pickup
Anyone got Pickup mastery by Justin Wayne?,Is it any good?,pickup
"[Full Infield] Natural SITUATIONAL Opener, Comfort + NC (Deutsch/English subs)",,pickup
Just a reminder that rejections are part of the game and how you will never know if she likes you if you don't approach,,pickup
Project Royalty,"Hey guys!
Someone have a Project Royalty it's a Greg Greenway program.",pickup
"request - rsd julien pimp, full version",[ Removed by reddit on account of violating the [content policy](/help/contentpolicy). ],pickup
Picking up girls with a pornhub t shirt,,pickup
(Short advice),"What makes people attractive is the amout of fun they are having in a social environment. 

The problem is having fun because as soon as your try to have fun you are not having fun and you start to leach on other people fun and therefore you are unattractive and people dont want to stay with you.

Until i discovered from david tian that instead of having fun, if u use the side effect technique you will find your self having fun in no time! So basically you just focus on what is fun for you like for me; i like talking about nothing to serious just blabbering bullshit and it gets me to the fun and another thing that works for me is doing awkward things like act like a nerd and that gets me to fun so quickly i realised it was so attractive! I found myself the center of attention and where people want to talk to me and they want to be around me in no time i am standing there with like 5 girls! Asking goofy question then thry want to hang out with me.


If you find this helpful let me know guys, i wanted to share my experience and i am sure this will help you because all my wing man are now hanging with pretty cool girls and one more thing the fun has to be real not fake.

Peace :)",pickup
"This Girl, My Social Life, and Crashing a Quinceanera","I am currently a Junior in HS, looking to expand my social circle and understanding of relationships with both men and women. Thursday during lunch a cute girl walked up to me and asked to feel my beard, it was just a funny experience and moved on from there. Friday I decided to go talk to herself and her friends during lunch I did fine with her friends they accepted me and didnt try to skrew me over, but the target girl was a challenge to converse with. We got a few words here and there and established some conversation, but she looked at me very little and breifly. I got her snapchat and continued from there... That night we had a band concert and I taked to her a bit about sports and music, but once again she chipped in occasionally, I did most of work.
Its now Saturday and I ask her if she is going to a Quincenara that will be happening that night. Me and a freind take some people in our cars and head out, as of now I have been initiating all conversation with this girl, but she looks at me a little, almost like she is intimedated, but she doesnt avoidme; more like uncomfortable eye contact. So anyway some Spanish music is being played and danced with her, we talked a little during the dance, but I never approacher her when we were not on the dance floor, I danced with her once more, and then her friend asked to dance with her. The second time we danced she didnt even look at me, she is quite short, but I dont know what that means. My question is, could she just be shy, and I may have been to forward with her and made her uncomfortable and a bit shy? Also, she did respond to my snaps, she is high value girl, now its Sunday and she hasnt replied to my last text, should I lay off a bit and try and work it slowly rather than keep on pouncing at every oppurtunity to talk to her? Should I keep talking to her friends and neg her, or just keep going at it like a battering ram, I guess we havent really had a formal conversation yet and I would like to know how I should go about it now that I have danced with her and her fiends know about me... She has alot of options and I am trying to make her pay attention to me, but I'm afraid if I double text it would look needy, Im confident and make many moves... I will update what happens in this comming week.",pickup
Facing Social Fears: 20 Minutes of Flirting In 4 Hours,,pickup
Why guys breadcrumb! What is breadcrumbing and how to stop breadcrumbing?!,,pickup
How to dance with girls?,"Hello, I got into game recently and it's going pretty well. I was at a party yesterday and physically danced with 3 different girls which was really cool. It still felt kinda awkward though, as I'm unsure where to hold them, how to move (on my own im a great dancer) etc. Is there a good video guide anyone can recommend? I'm an RSD guy but they dont have any content on dancing.
Cheers!",pickup
Original RSD CREW Pics (many left) and main pickup artists who paved the way.,"The link below will show you a picture of the original RSD crew. You'll notice there are many people whom you may not heard of, and that's because many have left the game. Also, some quality 9s and 10s they use to mention in their infield reports or books have also been showcased. Tell us what you think?

https://web.archive.org/web/20100911014639/https://forum.bodybuilding.com/showthread.php?t=1232811",pickup
Mystery - The master itself :),,pickup
How to pick-up chicks; the old fashioned way.,,pickup
Tired of Tinder? 4 steps to working the Bar Scene,"Step 1 Dress Like an Adult
Make sure you look like to have a job. It doesn't have to be a good job, just one where you have to leave your house and shower occasionally

Step 2 The Art of Seeding
This is a new term that I’ve coined. The essence of it has to do with catching a woman’s eye and having eye sex with her.

Step 3 Conversation Basics
- The essence of carrying on a conversation is to make her engaged by asking her questions. What questions? I’ve answered that in my book.

Step 4 Close with Class
This part is actually the easiest part if you have take the first three steps seriously.

Learn the steps in depth with Mastering Magnetism at masteringmagnetism.com

",pickup
"How to be MORE Effective &amp; Successful With Women (Sexual Expressions, Range of Emotions &amp; Being CRAZY)",,pickup
Street Pickup &amp; Relaxation || Daygame Pickup (Infield video),,pickup
(SHARING) SECRET ORGASM TIPS BOOK.,"I'm new here so I hope I'm doing this correctly. I think it's by David Snyder.

https://mega(.)nz/#!tnQRQB7Z!88k0h-V_gAZwVmAL9lQQvDYs0MjkT9q2Ad442d5g-CI",pickup
Approaching 7 Girls: Trying to get a Date Climax,,pickup
How To Tell If Your Boyfriend Is A Narcissist,,pickup
HOW TO SAVE MONEY ON YOUR FIRST DATE?,,pickup
Jason capital (Request ) webiner the most powerful signal for Man,"Hi BROS army , if you sharing  the webiner Thank You , u just amazing 
Pickup love u.",pickup
Group buy for Pickup Mastery by Justin Wayne,"Anybody who wants to join, PM me for more info.",pickup
The Best Pickup Line (UNCUT Infield),,pickup
"Attn: Sean Larson didn't get his product stolen, this is just a marketing ploy to get attention for his shitty product.","/u/seanlarson  is a failed pickup artist.

https://jezebel.com/osu-basically-chases-creepy-pickup-artist-off-campus-1455302975

His bullshit marketing campaign is the only way for anybody to pay attention to his garbage product.",pickup
asdf,"
Okay here's the thing - you're welcome. I've been in game for 6 years and am super into this shit. Message me if you want to talk about it please. I love talking and expressing different ideas and opinions. and to the mods - This is straight from RSD so don't remove
3 Girls:http://realsocialdynamics.ontraport.net/c/s/snL/eiBWGV3Z/s/F9/v8XT/6RjPSC/ZgqkrzdMQ/P
Attraction: http://realsocialdynamics.ontraport.net/c/s/snL/eiBWGV3Z/v/FV/v8XT/6RjPSC/z50GYEGFlR/P
daytime: http://realsocialdynamics.ontraport.net/c/s/snL/eiBWGV3Z/z/Fc/v8XT/6RjPSC/vUCfsaB3Yl/P
text and dates: http://realsocialdynamics.ontraport.net/c/s/snL/eiBWGV3Z/U/FX/v8XT/6RjPSC/c6qxdlW8u/P
VU: http://realsocialdynamics.ontraport.net/c/s/snL/eiBWGV3Z/j/FI/v8XT/6RjPSC/vNbrvfEgV6/P
Women: http://realsocialdynamics.ontraport.net/c/s/snL/eiBWGV3Z/5/qQ/v8XT/6RjPSC/z5LItyRnC3/P
Daytime accelerator: http://realsocialdynamics.ontraport.net/c/s/snL/eiBWGV3Z/r/qD/v8XT/6RjPSC/sEHApIcTwH/P",pickup
[request] get your ex back super system - dan bacon,hey could anyone share with me get your ex back super system by dan bacon?,pickup
[Sharing] Tai Lopez – Yellow Belt Mini MBA – Entrepreneur Code,"[Sharing] Tai Lopez – Yellow Belt Mini MBA – Entrepreneur Code

Upvote   me!!

https://   drive.google   .com/open?id=0B4jfFxwAwwUkVnRmeUEwTFNpY0U",pickup
Approaching 7 Girls: Trying to get a Date [Part 6] - Facing Fears,,pickup
[REQUEST ]David de angelo s products,,pickup
Secrets From A Dating Coach [VIDEO],,pickup
Fat chicks Theory,"So I personally don't mind thick girls and I think I know why. The fatter a girl is, the more she is used to giving orders instead of taking them. Men genetically don't like fat girls because we can see them as dominating versus a skinny girl who is used to being bossed and directed around. Just a theory prove me wrong.",pickup
[Selling][Verified] Women by Todd Valentine,"This is a repost.

Selling Women by Todd Valentine

30$ for /r/pickup regulars

35$ for reddit regulars

40$ if you made a brand new account and just make an account to buy it.

[Verified] means that I have shown my Mega file to a mod, and they have confirmed all the files are in there. 

If you feel it's too much risk, for 0.10 cents (just confirming that you have a working paypal account) I'll give you 3 of his infields, for free. If you feel the product isn't for you, you are not obligated to make a full purchase. ",pickup
Approaching 7 Girls: Trying to get a Date [Part 5] - Facing Fears,,pickup
Addicted to validation,"So after getting to the point where I can sleep with girls within a few hours of meeting them, and having girls hitting me up through the phone etc., I'm having a hard time staying on my path and focusing. The solution sounds obvious but it literally feels like I get dragged into talking and waiting for the next piece of validation. I get these moments of clarity-like oh, put your phone away. Then I get a text and might out it off for a couple minutes while I do my thing, but I keep checking every few minutes because there's always something new.

I feel like a hot girl must get the same kind of shit and the reason they don't always respond is because the ones with some sense put their phone away and silent and only check it after a while-since there's always something there anyway.

Bottom line is: I'm trying to get straight As this last semester in university, and I'm getting distracted by sexy bitches. Looking for someone to relate with who can give some perspective. 

This kind of success is relatively new to me so I'm not sure how to manage it. 

I'm trying to remember to use texting for meeting up more than for conversations--but only because the latter is time-consuming.",pickup
How to be happy in relationships by being more authentic!,,pickup
Approaching 7 Girls: Trying to get a Date [Part 4] - Facing Fears,,pickup
Looking for outer game programs,"Need your help, im searching for outer game programs like mini routines mini cold reads just to make conversation interesting and going. Any new programs that you know and you would recommend me?",pickup
My theory on why a girl doesn't want to be seen as a slut.,"We all know girls don't want to be SEEN as a slut, but WHY? This is my RSD showerthought. No one has really said it in words so i'm gonna try and explain my theory. In a 50-100 person society there are limited resources. Females use the OPTION of sex as a resource. If she is SEXUALLY AVAILABLE for many males, those males will MORE WILLINGLY DONATE THEIR RESOURCES. SHE IS USING SEX TO GET RESOURCES. THIS only works if she is not labeled as sleeping with a lot of guys. The second she is known to sleep with many guys, the guys WILL NOT WILLINGLY DONATE THEIR RESOURCES. TLDR: FEMALE GENETICS ARE MEANT TO ""PLAY"" MEN FOR THEIR RESOURCES. A FEMALES REPUTATION IN THE TRIBE IS IMPORTANT BECAUSE SHE IS ABLE TO GET MORE RESOURCES FROM OTHER GUYS. ",pickup
My theory on why girls wear high heels,"Just an rsd shower thought buuut i've heard high heels make a girl accentuate her assets - push her butt out and breasts forward, but I think there are products that would do that without the height. So I questioned - the girls who didn't wear high heels didn't get their genes passed on as well as a girl who did wear high heels - why is that...? And my conclusion is - A female wears high heels to make herself taller. A taller female passed on her genes easier - WHY? A taller female passed on her genes easier because the man who believed he deserved her reproduced with her. The man who believes he deserves her most likely has more resources than the man who doesn't take the opportunity to approach her. Conclusion - a girl wears high heels to TEST your manhood. The men who weren't phased by her intimidating height had the proper resources available. TLDR: HIGH HEELS ARE A TEST TO SEE IF YOU ARE MAN ENOUGH TO DESERVE HER",pickup
At a nightclub should i dance or sit and game?,"So I'm not good at dancing, pretty bad actually, is it then a better idea to stay away from the dance floor and look for girls sitting and having a drink?",pickup
How do i cope with rejection?,"Okay so I know this has been asked a million times before, but is there some advice that has actually helped someone get better or maybe some video that you can share. I'm a normal guy so I get approach anxiety but I get over it and talk to girls, only problem is if I get rejected, that makes me think about it too much and my game goes down from there.",pickup
[Infield] 4 Steps to master Indirect Daygame - 50% NCs/no flakes - You'd never believe it's that easy!,,pickup
Validating,"So you should be careful how much you validate her, but I heard it's possible to give compliments without validating and validating without giving compliments? 

Does anyone know how to get the knack of what this ""giving validation"" thing is all about? 

If it matters any, I've had some success with sex a few hours after meeting them, and had multiple medium and long term relationships before. So I'm not new to game. I just don't quite get this validation thing. Anyone have some examples?",pickup
Reacting to myself picking up,,pickup
How to be More Mysterious and Exciting on Dates,,pickup
Approaching 7 Girls: Trying to get a Date [Part 3] - Facing Fears,,pickup
Cold Approaching 7 Girls: Trying to get a Date [Part 2] - Facing Fears,,pickup
MAN THE F*CK UP! Are You Too Emotional? Challenge Yourself Or Be Sad,,pickup
"This is how a free man, who doesn't care about the social norms, look like. This what I think the ultimate aim of the game is- to me.",,pickup
[suggest] best resource for Physical Escalation,"guys what are some good  resource for Physical Escalation. video/product/book etc.
thanks in advance :)",pickup
At the dance bar should I make the first move and just go up to a girl and start grinding no hesitations and get down in front of her I'm afraid I'll get slapped but they like men who take control am I right,,pickup
The Positives of the Pickup Community,,pickup
Wing San diego,Looking for a wing around pb area lmk,pickup
[Daygame] What to do with a girl meeting a friend - Infield Madrid 2017,,pickup
Approaching 7 Girls: Trying to get a Date [Part 1] - Newbie Pick Up,,pickup
Mysterys lessons still working?,"Hey guys I can't figure out how to properly start with the game. I've often red about real social dynamics in here and I've watched them but I think they are so pathetic with this acted up adhs shit i don't mean to judge anyone who likes them and does what they do but I wouldn't want to be like this 
I also dealt with many '' ways '' about the game for example with mystery richard la ruina and so on and I really think the more natural way is my way to got but I wonder if for example '' the mystery method '' is as natural and as effective as he preaches. 
And is the mystery method outdated by now or can you learn to become good simply by doing what he does?
Do you have other good recommendations? But please nothing stupid like rsd 
I'm actually not a looser when it comes to woman I've always had natural success but I want to step up my game. So I don't need help with confidence etc. 
I just want to have a psychologicaly well thought out method of this whole thing. 
English is not my native tongue so I hope you understand what I mean. 
Thanks",pickup
"Infield CUTEST GIRL YOU'VE EVER SEEN ""Marrying proposal after 5 minutes"" Prague 2017 (English/German)",,pickup
Pickup Korean girl at bus stop &amp; Approach Anxiety,,pickup
Trying to get at Date: Flirting with The Cashier - Facing Social Fears,,pickup
Signs you're not happy in your relationship..,,pickup
watch blueprint by tyler,This shit is gold,pickup
Feel tired of not having sex so any advice?,"Is it okay if i start hitting on a girl that i like? i feel so out of the game so any advice, stories, would help a lot. ask me things and i will try to answer to come to a solid conclusion. Should i be hitting up clubs and bars? or can i just straight up tell a girl during the day that i would love to go out with her? i feel i am coming close to becoming comfortable tho ever since i discovered more of what i loved about myself. cheers",pickup
How to be more Interesting in Conversations,,pickup
Former RSD Alex Social Officially Retires From Pickup,,pickup
Cold approaching a girl with the bicycle - Newbie Pick Up fail,,pickup
4WN NEWS FROM HVAR!,,pickup
Selling Madison's Bootcamp @ home for only 5$. Verified over at /r/pickuptorrents,[ Removed by reddit on account of violating the [content policy](/help/contentpolicy). ],pickup
"Approaching 2 Random Girls, trying to get a date - Newbie Pick Up",,pickup
Best products/programs for social skills?,"Hi everyone,

I'm a very social guy but I want to improve my social skills especially around flirting and being playful. Also around being less outcome oriented i.e. if I'm talking to a girl I'm attracted to, being more playful/cheeky rather than nice and accommodating.

Thanks!",pickup
Do you think being bald is a handicap?,"Hi there,

do yo think being bald and not very tall (172 cm)? Can anyone give tips? Thanks",pickup
Subtle ways to let her know you're interested in her body?,"Hi, I was wondering if you guys can help me find the answers to the question: What could be the subtle ways to tell her you wanna f her besides the following question I came up with.

1. You look fit. Do you work out?
",pickup
[Tinder] Use this Bio and Girls will text you first!,,pickup
Lloyd tells the Evil Stifler story about why you should be NICE to girls (story begins at 1:28),,pickup
"""Od teraz jesteś moją dziewczyną!"" czyli sposób na szybki podryw w galerii handlowej",,pickup
Date with Chinese Girl (hong kong) || daygame pickup (Infield Video),,pickup
3 Things NOT to Do on a Date (Avoid these at all costs),,pickup
#daygame #guttergame #wing #sydney #australia,"

Before you go ahead, what is daygame?

daygame is the art of cold approach pickup for meeting and attracting beautiful, hot, young and tight girls during the daytime and without stepping foot inside bars, pubs or clubs.

Hey, I have started this page to find a daygame wing or for a daygame wing to find me, if you are interested to go out and daygame then get in touch by sending PM/DM, I usually reply back within a day or two…

Looking forward to daygame with you…

Cheers,

Michael pua 

 

 #daygame #coldapproach #guttergame #streethustle #coldcalling

",pickup
Facing Fears - Day 1: Asking A random girl out,,pickup
"HAVE YOU SEEN NEW RSD INSTRUCTOR?, REPLACING TODD - lol",,pickup
Going on LDR. What is the best program for Relationship Management And Relationship Texting ?,,pickup
[QUESTION] About pickup age,"So I will cut it off quick. I'm 18 yo and living in a 3rd world country. I have many excuses to not go out but I will tell the biggest ones.

SHORTENED:

3rd world country, sex seen as a big thing (most girls keep their virginity for first husband), half of the clubs dont take men without a girl.

Daygame problem: Girls are selfish. Doesnt even dare to reply. Thinks as they are gods (comes from age I guess?). They think pickup is a dirty job (pimp?)

Nightgame problem: Most girls on the club are much older than me. What do I do with older girls?

LONG:

I can go daygame or nightgame.

Daygame problem: As I told you, I live in a 3rd world country. Even sex is seen as a big thing. They want their virginity taken by their husbands. I'm 18 and the girls around my age are just selfish, thinks herself as a diamond and basically they think they are god. When someone approaches them, they just answer cold blooded and sometimes dont even bother to answer. I think thats because of the age. They are not mature enough.

Nightgame problem: AGE. I literally dont know what to do in a club. And again as I told, 3rd world country and half of the clubs dont take men without a girl. So thinking as I went into a club. I'm 18 and thats the legal age. I think I'll see a little portion of girls that are at my age. So the age comes problem here. What do I do with the older girls?",pickup
For all the people struggling with PU,,pickup
Instagrams,Talking to this girl today got her instagram no number basically told her she's very beautiful. No reply how badly did I messup,pickup
Need Your Opinion,So I been starting to see this girl I really enjoy being around and i haven't been gaming.So should I stop gaming? or should I keep gaming but just build a social circle with different girls or quit and see where if goes? just curious on your guys opinion ,pickup
[REVIEW/QUESTION] Jason Capital's Devoted Girlfriend,I Just got this program am I would like to know if it's worth it for relationship management,pickup
You have value!,,pickup
how to get back in touch with a girl i've walked away from.,"So, first off, let me just say that English it's not my native language, so if I screw up a little, sorry. The thing is, basically, that I was in the middle of getting over a girl, had a mayor crush on her idea idea.. when I met another girl, on tinder... we hit it off, had the best sex I've had, makes her cum a lot, yada yada (again) we have similar interest, both really like music, the same music, both have bands, stuff like that. some things I want to make clear: *i've never said that I really liked her, (while fucking me did say that she was beautiful and stuff, of course) *i did say that I missed her a couple of times. *i told her that if she wanted to know what I feel (she asked) she just had to pay attention. *we live a little far away, she lives in another city, and works in my city, so the way of talking is trough whatsapp, and social media (which I don't deem so important, but is the only way to get in touch)
The thing is, she just started to disappear, the first time, I asked her if she was going to do that a lot (needy, I know) the second time I went a little angry and erased her number and Facebook (again, I don't think they are massively important, but they are the way to talk and arrange a date) The day after I did that. I knew it. I'm fucking now. the day after that one (today) I'm in the BEST FUCKING MOOD EVER. I feel right for walking away and taking everything away from her, all the attention and such, and is the best feeling I've had in months, (after the other breakup which killed my soul.)
so...to the point...i'm not going to talk to her right now, nothing like that...but i really like her, and would like to get back in touch in some time, when i feel like it...
any suggestion? any moves?
thanks for reading =)",pickup
How to get her back,,pickup
"Too much RSD content, there are other great teachers!","You guys focus so much on RSD, I wanted to give some alternative coaches/content.


1. Zan Perrignon (My favorite, his don Juanisque tactics are at my hearth).
2. Mode One (direct game at it's finest).
3. 60years of challenge(his hand holding has single handed upped my game).
4. Sean Messenger (Old Pickup101 coach) his content is hard to find but golden.
5. Mark Manson(Entropy04) runs an amazing self-dev website, his old and new content(subtle art of not giving a fuck) great shit.


I probably forget some, but I learned a lot more from them then RSD with their woo-woo half of the time.",pickup
"Best books to get back on track, motivation(general)","So the last years have been very apathic for me, I was huge into the game when I was 18-22 and had minor and major success.

Lately I have been feeling very apathic, and I am looking for resources to pull myself out of this. Because the last 3-4 years(28 now) have been kinda... flying by with little eventfull stuff happening.

Not to mention I severely abused weed and I am now 2 weeks off from it. 

I used to be a decent powerlifter, but after my injury i got so unmotivated.

Anything that might help me get my motivation back, and/or get rid of my apathy would be great.


",pickup
Chode therapy,"Hi guys, long time lurker here. I think I was born chode. When I adopt alpha male behaviours I feel unhappy. Thing is I want to attract girls with my chody behaviour, is that possible? ",pickup
Anyone from Stockholm doing pickup,"Hi!I'm currently in Stockholm for a few months and would like to find some people who do pickup in this place! 

Hit me up/pm me if you're in Stockholm and is interested in sarging. 

Cheers!",pickup
Fighting For Fun?! 4WN Alex &amp; Ryan on Mentally &amp; Verbally Sparring,,pickup
Would you share your smooth kino move stories?,"Here is mine: Some guy was shaking this girl's hand, she said to him ""Wow, your hand is warm"". I was standing next to her and straightaway I told her, ""Isn't it normal to have a cold hand in this weather?"" and then I showed her my hand. She grabs it. (Making hand grabbing VERY NATURAL)

Of course, I'm not bragging about touching a woman's hand. I just wanna hear some other people's smooth story because I think it's an important first step to escalate. What was your one of the best smooth kino moves? Would you please share?",pickup
What to do if a guy wants nudes and tries to rush a relationship.,,pickup
Asking Random Cute Girl for a Date - Newbie Pick Up,,pickup
Best products for deep level change?,What's the best program you've watched/listened to/read that has allowed you to make deep level changes?,pickup
"Went and Recorded Some Clips in Miami Beach, thoughts?",,pickup
Newbie question about a bad bar experience,"Ok I'm new to pickup and am working on myself and my presentation. I ran into a really strange problem though and I've never heard of this happening before. None of the videos or books I've seen have covered this. Hope someone here can shed some light on this and advise how to handle it.

So I'm opening sets and doing pretty well w some girls I know from the bar when this woman comes over. I've never met her and never seen her before ever. She rudely barged in and dragged the girls I was chatting with away. I objected, said hey...but She waved a hand w/o looking at me and said We don't want to talk to you go away. 

I went to talk to another girl. Same thing. I found the first girls again and asked what that was about and they had no idea. They didn't know this woman either. She tried to take a group of three Argentinean girls away too but they told her they were fine. She asked if they were sure and they said it was ok. She went off glaring. I ran into the woman directly and all I got was I don't like you go away. No explanation nothing. She tried it again w another girl I was talking to before I got frustrated and left.

I've seen her a couple more times and gotten the hostile Go away thing and no chance to talk but she hasn't tried to directly sabotage me again. She clearly isn't after my attention or giving me a test. She just has taken against me for no discernable reason. I've never met her before and none of the girls knew her either. It's weird. I'm content never to see her again but If like to know how to deal w that if it happens again. 

",pickup
Two pillars of game - Leadership and Acceptance,"There are two pillars to successful game: leadership and acceptance. 

**Leadership**

Leadership is a broader and more complex concept than just choosing where to eat dinner. The man must set the emotions of the interaction, make decisions, guide conversations, and even determine the nature of reality itself. 

**Why do women want leaders?**

Women want leadership because of a bug in human programming. Apes in the jungle are more likely to survive if they stick together, and they are more likely to stick together if the tribe follows one alpha male. Therefore, the women and the beta males of the tribe evolved a strong, subconscious, desire to follow the alpha male and obey him, no matter what he does. Worse yet, humans feel an incredibly strong anxiety whenever they feel they may do something to upset or offend the alpha male. 

This desire for leadership is a “bug” for two reasons. It makes sense for apes to follow a leader because apes are not capable of rational thought. But now that humans have the ability to think rationally, it would be better for an educated man or woman to do what is rationally correct rather than blindly follow the alpha male. 

Furthermore, the desire for leadership does not include the ability to discern a “good” leader. The alpha male of an ape tribe needs only the ability to deploy violence against his enemies to be a successful leader. A successful leader in the human world, however, needs a much broader range of skills, but humans are still evolutionarily attracted to the ape alpha male, i.e., the tough guy. During presidential campaigns, pundits and talking heads endlessly debate complex policy topics, but in almost every campaign for the last 60 years, the taller and more “manlier” guy has won the presidency. Humans evolved to follow a leader, but we did not necessarily evolve to follow the best leader, but rather the person that the tribe has selected to be the leader and the one who is most successful at deploying violence and controlling resources.  

As an aside, religion solved this “bug” in an interesting way: it created an imaginary alpha male known as “God” who had the ultimate power to define reality and deploy violence. By forcing people to worship God, people’s desire to follow an alpha male is satiated, so they could elect humble, reasonable leaders on earth. Democracy has “worked” in the West partly because of Judeo-Christian religions; in many Eastern cultures without an alpha male God the populace still follows dictators, tribal chiefs, kings, or other strongmen. 

**Defining reality**

Apes evolved to follow the alpha male no matter what the rational facts about the world are. Now that human beings have evolved to be able to think rationally, however, one would think that we are less likely to follow the alpha male. That is true to an extent, but the alpha male also the power to actually define what we know as reality. 

Imagine this: A newborn baby knows nothing about religion, politics, art, philosophy, or even the basics of reality. But like all humans, the baby has an inherent desire for answers to these questions to quell its existential dread and fear of the unknown. Its evolutionary biology may predispose it to certain explanations, but it is generally very malleable and will believe almost anything unless and until somebody more convincing and/or powerful convinces it of something else. Humanity’s view of reality has been crafted by the alpha males of history, and the conformist masses have relied on these individuals for the “truth” to quell their fears.  

A man need not constantly redefine reality when hanging out with women, but he should be prepared, if necessary, to take any leadership position, including the ultimate leadership position of defining reality. If you make her feel like there is a “reality” that can hinder your goals, the woman will subconsciously feel like you are not the alpha male. Further, if you bend your opinions to please a woman, you become terrifyingly weak because you show that you know less about reality than she does, meaning that you are both cold and lone in this terrifying world with no guidance.  

If you take leadership on the ultimate question, logically you must lead on everything else. If she challenges you on a moral question, your preferences art or food, or how you choose to live your life, you must stand your ground and make it clear that her opinion will not sway you or make you feel any anxiety about your course. Of course, if your stance on these issues is stupid she may leave and follow a more powerful alpha male that offers her more comforting answers. 

**Leadership, hypergamy, and confidence**

Leadership is related to confidence. Confidence comes from the Latin root “con” (with) and “fidens” (faith), and means faith that you will succeed. A leader must have confidence because a person who is hindered by outside forces is not a leader. 

Of course, as a practical matter, no human being can do anything. At the very least, the laws of physics, the laws of our society, and more powerful people can stop us. But a man can create the illusion of being able to do anything, and make the woman “feel” like he is the leader. Humans have a bug in their wiring, which is that we do not intuitively understand which aspects of reality are unchangeable and which are made by human beings. Throughout history, charismatic alpha males have capitalized on this bug by successfully transgressing the rules created by society, convincing their followers that they are the tribal alpha male, and therefore “tricking” their followers into believing that they can change the fundamental rules of reality itself. This is why kings and dictators are often ascribed divine or supernatural powers by their followers: the followers literally believe that their alpha male can change the fundamental laws of reality because he had previously successfully changed social rules that the followers had previously thought were unchangeable. 

Understanding this immense power to change societal rules will help give you the confidence to approach women and take the lead in interactions with them. Many men are afraid to approach because it appears “creepy,” “weird,” or “socially unacceptable.” And it is true – most people see approaching strangers as violating the unwritten rules of society. But as a man who can create and redefine reality, if you approach with confidence, you can bypass her social conditioning and go straight to her emotions. Of course, most women will not let a stranger redefine reality for them, but you can create enough of a glitch in the matrix, you can get her intrigued enough to listen to you. Many men are afraid to take the lead because they have a natural impulse to reject any man trying to take a leadership position, but women do not have that same impulse. Women want a leader, and their problem is that most men do not provide that. 

Leadership is similarly related to hypergamy. A woman will not want to follow a man who is beneath her. If she can defeat him in any way, intellectually, physically, or in terms of success, then she can hinder him, and if she can hinder him, then he is not a leader – she is the leader. 

Women often try to hinder men to determine if the man is a leader or not. This is a “shit test.” Most men do not understand what a shit test is, so they accede power to the woman, which causes the woman to lose attraction to them. How can she view you as the leader able to change the fabric of reality itself if she can hinder you from doing what you want to do? 

**Most men are not leaders**

Most men fail miserably at the leadership pillar. They do not understand women’s deep, primal desire for leadership even when women beg for a man to take charge. Modern feminism has also convinced men that there are no meaningful differences between men and women, so the idea that women have an emotion men do not have sounds blasphemous to most men. 

Second, men do not understand that the desire for leadership is a subconscious emotion. When men see intelligent, successful, confident women with a good job, they cannot fathom her need for a leader. Nor does the woman – in her conscious brain she wants to be independent and control her own life. Her desire for a leader is a subconscious emotion that undergirds her rational thoughts. Imagine a CEO of a major company that goes to a dominatrix and acts submissively before her – he doesn’t rationally want her to control his life or make the decisions for his company, but he does have a subconscious desire to act submissively and then go back to his regular, rational life. 

Men also fail at leadership because they supplicate to women because they feel scarcity. These men subconsciously believe that women in general, and attractive women in particular, are “higher value” than them, and therefore must be obeyed, followed, and submitted to. But the truth is that a high-value man who displays leadership is much more rare, and therefore valuable, than an attractive woman. I would guess that at least 30% of all women are somewhat attractive, but a much, much, smaller percentage of guys are high-value AND display leadership. 

**How to be a leader**

You don’t become a leader by convincing others to follow you. In fact, you disqualify yourself from being a leader in the alpha male sense by asking anybody for anything. 

Instead, you become a leader by simply following your mission joyfully and confidently. ips with good people, help others, stay healthy, and have fun. Many people have a vision of the type of life they want to live, but are crippled by their feelings of anxiety and conformity because they evolved to follow the alpha male. The alpha male, however, can live his ideal life so the better life you live, the more people will want to follow you. Because of their anxiety and conformity, most people would rather live an awesome life vicariously through the alpha male rather than actually live their own awesome life. Remember, women want you to create reality for them, but they will leave if somebody else creates a better reality. 

As a corollary, you should do whatever you want rather than what you feel like you should do to be accepted. Do you want to dance? Do it. If you don’t want to dance, don’t. Do you want to sit? Sit. Are you bored? Go home. Are you at a huge party and feeling hungry? Leave and get something to eat. Is somebody being annoying or rude? Ignore them. Did somebody say something stupid? Don’t pretend what they said was smart. Do you feel like talking about dinosaurs? Talk about dinosaurs.

This will be a huge mental shift for most people and will feel counter-intuitive and “wrong” at first. Because most people see themselves as the inferior people in the tribe, they are wired to want to please others and follow the tribe in conformity. But if you break this mindset and instead do what you want to do, people will “feel” like you are the alpha male and become attracted to you. 

Humans have a subconscious wavelength by which they communicate with each other, and doing what may superficially seem “selfish” oftentimes subconsciously communicates that you are the alpha male. The disconnect between rational actions and subconscious emotions explains most men’s failure at understanding women. 

**Acceptance**

The second pillar of game is acceptance. 

Humans have an intense desire to be accepted into the tribe and become resentful and angry if they are rejected. Your leadership means nothing to a woman if she is not even part of the tribe. If she does not feel accepted, she will leave and find a tribe that will accept her. For acceptance to work, a woman must view you as a high-ranking individual. A lower-ranked ape cannot “accept” a higher-ranked ape into a tribe. Acceptance is also an emotion, so the rational meaning of your actions is not important: what is important is that she feel warm, welcomed, and accepted. Your acceptance of her must escalate as the relationship escalates – at the beginning you need only smile and talk to her but as the relationship escalates you must be willing to listen to her secrets, delve into her thoughts, etc... The more of her that she feels like you “accept” the more comfortable she will feel around you. 

Most of what regular people recognize as “game” is acceptance because they know nothing about leadership. Furthermore, most guys confuse acceptance with supplication, so they go out of their way to buy the girl things, do her favors, and generally demean themselves to show they “like” her. But women don’t like supplication and in fact, are turned off by it. They just want acceptance. Approaching a girl, talking to her, touching her, and calling her are all just ways of showing acceptance. That’s it. When girls say they want a “nice” guy they mean that they want the guy to make them feel accepted, not for the guy to bend over backwards supplicating to them. 

As explained earlier, women’s desire for acceptance is a subconscious, irrational emotion, so I cannot describe it in words just as I cannot describe “love,” “confidence,” or “happiness” in words. Women often act in bizarre ways and go cold without explanation and they themselves cannot articulate what you did “wrong” – they just “feel” like they are no longer accepted. 

I can, however, try some metaphors. She must feel like your “door” is open to her. She must feel like the “bridge” between you is solid. She must feel like the “portal” between you and her is open. Etc... These concepts are useless as mere words and only really make sense until you’ve been in a relationship with a woman and “felt” them. 

Acceptance does not require grand gestures or heartfelt expressions of your “feelings” for her. It can be quickly communicated with a few simple gestures: a big smile, a warm hug, and a genuine, heartfelt tone when you speak to her. A “natural” at game will quickly make women feel accepted and comfortable, causing her to accept your leadership. 

Your acceptance must be consistent. If you feel hot and cold, she will feel rejected and leave. You must constantly exude positivity, no matter what the circumstances are. If she acts badly, you should not “call her out,” instead, you should direct your attention elsewhere. Your subconscious message should be “you are still a part of the tribe, but the tribe is moving on with or without you and you must run to catch up to it.” Of course, some women are genuinely shitheads and must be rejected, but once you reject a woman, you cannot expect to “game” her after that anymore. 

**Dread game**

An experienced red piller may ask “what about dread game? Isn’t dread game ‘rejecting’ her and making her feel like she has to get her act together to be accepted back into the tribe?” In my view, dread game is not about “rejecting” her. If you outright reject her, she will become resentful and find somebody else. Dread game is more about making her feel like she is accepted, but the tribe will move on without her if she doesn’t do her part. 

Dread game is only appropriate when she is testing you to determine if you are an alpha male. Imagine the tribe moving through the desert and you and the woman are part of the tribe. The woman shows some interest in you and is talking to you. The woman, however, sees another man she thinks may be the tribal leader so she goes to talk to him. The moment the woman begins to speak to this man, however, you get up and leave and take the tribe with you. At that moment, she realizes that this whole time YOU were the tribal leader and the other man was not. She quickly realizes her mistake and runs to rejoin you. THAT is dread game. You are not rejecting her from the tribe, but you are making it clear that you are the leader and you will leave without her. 

If a woman, however, is constantly testing you, she probably does not really think you are the leader of the tribe, she is on the lookout for a better leader, or she is broken and can no longer follow anybody. If that is the case, you must reject her and move on with your life. 

**The balancing act**

I believe that balancing these two pillars is the fundamental challenge of game. A man must confidently and joyfully pursue his mission while simultaneously making the woman feel accepted as a follower. Many men either focus too much on being “alpha” and make the woman feel unwanted and unaccepted, or they focus too much on acceptance and veer into supplication and following. 

People on TRP sometimes say that a man has to some “beta” things to keep his relationship going. Perhaps I have a different definition of “beta” than these guys do, but I do not think a man must do “beta” things. Instead, I think the man should emotionally invest in a woman and do things for her only to the extent that she emotionally invests in him. If a woman does things for you, it is ok to do things for her to make the relationship at least somewhat equal. I think the man should always have at least a slight edge, but you should not act unfairly or in a way that would make her resentful and angry. However, a man should not do things for a woman if she is not reciprocating. 

At least in the early stages of a relationship, the man must take the lead in approaching, initiating conversations, etc..., and these actions may make a man feel “beta” because he is opening himself up to rejection. And although women like to feel like they have the “power” because they are the ones being approached, in reality women’s fear of approaching makes them the weaker ones. In human psychology, the lower-ranked individual will never want to approach the higher-ranked individual because they fear rejection. This is why many guys have approach anxiety and most women never approach at all. The man, therefore, is the powerful one because he has the courage to approach and push the interaction forward. 

The alpha male must also approach because his self-esteem is more secure. Most peoples’ self-esteem is tied up in whether they are accepted by the tribe – if they are rejected by the tribe, they feel worthless because their only value is “assisting” the powerful ones of the tribe. The alpha male, however, dictates the social rules of the tribe, so his self-esteem is secure. Extending this logic into approaching, if a woman approaches a man and gets rejected her self-esteem is shattered because biologically her only value is assisting the man. Her hotness, sexual attraction, submissiveness, etc... is useless without a man to enjoy it. The alpha male, however, does not need any particular woman, so if he gets rejected his self-esteem is fine because it is not dependent on a woman’s approval. Therefore, the man must approach.   

**Charges of misogyny**

A neutral observer may read this and think I am sexist or misogynist because of my insistence that women desire a leader. And they would have a point – many men have used the idea that women are naturally “submissive” as justification to abuse women badly and to try to control them. But I am not making the typical “women are submissive” argument. Instead, I am saying that women have an irrational impulse towards submissiveness, but that impulse only exists if the man is the alpha male and is successfully leading. A lot of men are not alpha males and cannot lead but nevertheless demand submissiveness from their women. These women obviously resist, and the men are forced to threaten or coerce the women into submissiveness. That’s bad. 

Furthermore, as I have made clear, I think that women’s tendency to follow an alpha male is “bad.” A woman who can think rationally should do what is rationally best for her life rather than blindly follow some guy who gives her emotional tingles. Many women are very intelligent but make bad life choices because of their evolutionary impulses (just as men do). If I have a daughter, I will tell her that her desire for a leader is a bug that must be controlled and channeled correctly.  

Finally, the desire for a leader exists in men just as in women. Most men are not alpha males and also subconsciously desire to follow some stronger, smarter man. A few select men can break out of this mental prison and become the alpha male, but it is very rare and very few men can do it for long periods of time.  

Go to my website: http://www.woujo.com 

Like me on Facebook: http://www.facebook.com/woujonation 
",pickup
Date with Korean Girl || daygame pickup (Infield video),,pickup
How to Enjoy Every Moment of Life,,pickup
The Reasoning Why RSD Todds Youtube Had To Be Deleted Also RSD Papa Fakes His Views/Likes/Subs,"Many people are here bitching and complaining how RSD Todds youtube channel was removed and how all the value is gone and Papa is the worst etc, but have failed to take the perspective of RSD's business side.

If they are severing business ties between RSD and Todd then they have to think into the future. RSD Todd has 106K subscribers, a very large number and one of the largest from all the RSD youtube channels.

Todd has used RSD to build his brand. Todd has many of the same followers that also follow other RSD instructors. If Todd wanted he could easily start his own rival pick up company and use his pre existing audience of RSD customers as his own customers. This would take away business from RSD, as many of the followers are also follow other RSD instructors. This would cause such a negative impact on the business that Papa removed his channel, and probably has it contracted that he has legal grounds to do so.
The issue is, the majority of you will get over this in a few days and the backlash will die down, and then from a business perspective it would have been the right decision.

Also as a side note RSD Papa buys all his views and likes on his videos. The views are fake, his subscribers are fake, his likes are fake(the majority at least).

Check this video for example: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=coz9J5wCoec

9 likes, 35000 views, 1 comment. He forgot to add likes to this video, he will probably add them once he sees this post to balance out the ratio between views and likes. Imgur just incase he does that: http://imgur.com/a/5K9Hg

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=J_UxEjlSXH0 - 163000 views, 3753 likes, 42 dislikes. and only 36 comments 

I guess Papa does this to show people that he actually brings some ""value"" to the company and to trick people into thinking others like him.

Here are a bunch of other videos which clearly have faked views/likes.

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=NbXGVshOgN4 https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=5vk3Q4zMsWQ https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=EYFhR9XzNxQ https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=9ZVJZYIjEig",pickup
"Have trouble ""getting it in""... Please help","So, this is a bit embarrassing, but here is the deal. I have ZERO problem getting hard. My dick gets rock solid hard, but I have a hard time actually getting it IN. My dick is 5 inches btw so it's not a size issue. You would think you would just slide it in in like 2 seconds, but not the case. I can do everything else fine, but when it comes time to put it in, I have trouble. I have a hard time finding the right spot at first but once I find it, I have a hard time putting it in. It doesn't just effortlessly slide right in. There's like some shit blocking the pussy (I think pussy lips, I'm not sure what you call it) in the way and I gotta get past that and work it in, like wiggle it back and forth and gradually get it in more and more. My dick is also pretty sensitive to touch which makes it difficult to wiggle it in sometimes since it is sensitive and all. It's a pain in the ass. I wish it would just slide in in like 2 seconds. I don't know if anxiety has anything to do with it. I'm a pretty anxious person in general, but my dick stays rock solid hard the whole time. When the moment comes, I worry if I'll be able to get it in or not since it's pretty hit or miss. I just want some feedback from guys or girls. Is this normal? Has anyone else experienced this? Thank you.",pickup
there are so many programs out there. which one to start with?,,pickup
RSD EXPOSED! The Real Reason Why Alex Left RSD,,pickup
4WN Alex &amp; Ryan on The 3 Stages of Game (Plateau and Dark Age),,pickup
PICKUP IN PARADISE,,pickup
4WN Ryan on INNER GAME: Stop Seeing Women As TOO GOOD For You!,,pickup
Here is why you are not RIPPED and RICH yet! (you are not gonna like the reason why),,pickup
Best product,"Hey guys just wanted ur 2 cents on some good pickup products that have infield 
I was looking for some products that show lots of infield examples and also products that are primarily infield products for example the yad show pls help me and if possible pls share the mega links also 
Thanks in advance 
Pranfernape",pickup
Are You an Air Headed beat Slut How This is Powerful,,pickup
"4WN Alex on How to Pull HOT Girls on Holidays (Hvar, Vegas, Party Destinations)",,pickup
What's the best program to start with.?,I'm new to pickup and would like to know which program would be best to go with first.  ,pickup
[QUESTION]Best Inner Game Program?,What is the best program on Inner Game for a Newbie who is just starting out?,pickup
[QUESTION] Shogun Method,"Is anyone here an advanced shogun method practitioner? 

If so then please hit me with a DM because I got a couple of quick questions and I just need a short answer :)

PS: ONLY PEOPLE WHO HAVE USED SHOGUN METHOD ON A GIRL (STRANGER, FRIEND, CRUSH ETC). This is serious!",pickup
Former RSD Alex's FINAL Pickup Bootcamp Program,,pickup
Subliminal Confidence,"Anyone here recommend any good subliminal confidence or hypnosis audio with good results?
I have used Paul Mckenna and BrainSync in the past which have helped a lot.
Thank you",pickup
lookin fer a new truck,"hey guys looking for a new pickup, im a fan of chevy's or toyotas. no fords, lookin for something around 2008 or newer. what do you guys recommend?",pickup
The Awakening Body- Somatic Meditation,If you liked transformation mastery then this book will help you a lot. ,pickup
Asking Random Girls For a Date - Rejection Therapy Week 12: GIRLS,,pickup
How To Approach A Girl - 3 Tips (+Plot Twist),,pickup
How sexual attraction works in both men and women.,,pickup
What the fuck was that all about?,"I'm not going to bore you with details. I went on a date with a woman i find attractive. We went for a walk around the lake and it got really hot so I took off my jacket and threw it over my shoulder. She asked me:"" Shall I carry that for you?"". I was like, yeah sure thing. She carried it for like 30 feet and then asked me to take it back.

What was all that about then? 

We made out later

Please explain reddit",pickup
How to pick up a new girl at the gym?,,pickup
Asking Cute Girl for her Phone Number - Newbie Pick Up,,pickup
Magnetic messaging,[DELETED],pickup
How to Pickup Korean Girl || How to Start a Conversation,,pickup
Anyone who has gotten pimp have results,I recently got pimp and I like it.  But I'm curios if anybody has gotten results. If so please let me know how it worked for you  and how I should tackle this ,pickup
How To Become More Attractive To Girls,,pickup
What Really Changes When You Get Married,,pickup
"What ""Really"" Matters When Approaching Women?",,pickup
"[Attention, Puas in Delhi, NCR, India] looking for pua flatmate to sort out logistics, inner game and wingman issues.","25, Male, recently moved into South Delhi, India. I'm beginner but feel i'm moving into intermediate level. Taking a place that is walkable to Select city walk.

Its a 2bhk and i'm looking for a decent pua to live with. Mainly, to remove all possible bottlenecks, and convenient access to a trust worthy wing and accelerate learning through each others reference experiences.

I'm a motivated guy and this is a good offer for those who are in Delhi. If relevant to you or your friends ona
 reddit, fb, wa, sc, in, tt, wherever, please share and ask them to pm me.

If the person is good, we can maybe arrange a subsidy on wifi or something like that.

Please share asap, because if i dont find someone decent, i found this other great single flat which looks neat itself and would also help me make pulls.

Thanks.",pickup
"To compliment; or not to compliment? I don't really get the ""Don't gas them up"" theory. Can somebody explain it please","Some guys, actually many guys seem to say that you shouldn't compliment. I wonder though. Complimenting them has seemed to work for me, but those guys also seem to get more guys than I do so I wonder if I should not compliment? Any advice/discussion appreciated in advance.",pickup
Girl's problem,I girl i am dating is having family trouble. Should i listen to her or should i try to find a different topic ?,pickup
[Question] Who is your role model in pick up or life?,"Hi everyone, and just like the title says, i like to know  who is or are the persons that you learn the most. And why of course, thanks.

PD: Sorry my terrible english, i'm still learning.",pickup
number close &amp; daygame advantages,,pickup
[QUESTION] TRANSFORMATION MASTERY BOOKS,"Hey guys, upon which books Julien built TM?
I don't understand him sometimes, a specially the process, resistence and sensations
I would like to look at it from different perspective, maybe it's better explained elsewhere, Thanks",pickup
How me and wingman beat approach anxiety in 3 days.,"We decided to take on a 30 day in row approach challenge in order to improve our game since neither one of us has ever tried gaming before. Day one we just focused on talking to only guys and basically saying high to people in about 2 hours time we got what we considered to be about 5 approaches with the first one taking about 45 mins to get. 

Day two expanded it to approach five woman and say anything but not before taking 15 to 30 warm up approaches of guys and just randomly saying high to people. I shut you not the warm up apporaches are key to anyone who has fear of talking to woman or people in general. It normalized the process of talking to girls.

Day 3 we focus on just trying to get rejected 5 times by girls. Wingman actually had two apporaches who were interested in him during his attempt to get rejected lol but was so surprised it worked he forgot to ask for the number even though it was clear as day they wanted him to ask for it. This is the point where pickup starts to become enjoyable and not something we dread doing now just in case their are other first timers reading this. It's also the point I got my first number.

Day 4 we let go of the 5 apporaches concept and actually pulled out a timer and you had to do an approach within two minutes of your previous aproach. No idea how many we did but I finished the day with about 4 numbers. The stop watch method keeps you from chickening out idk if anyone else has suggested this I just came up with it on the way to the mall where we day game. We all know that thinking about how an approach is the worst think you can do prior to doing it. This kept us from thinking about it and in the process I stopped caring about what people said. If one of us was close to the 2 minute mark we would scream at the other person from down the other side of the mall to let them know they were running out of time. One of my pulls during this I actually told two girls what we were doing and after giving me the number they suggested we do something similar this weekend.",pickup
Recommendation for Story Telling courses?,"Hey guys, can anyone please recommend a good story telling course product? I need to improve this part of my game.
At times I can be fantastic and I can see how this creates a lot of value &amp; attraction. But at other times I try to do it and fail so miserably that it creates ""weirdo/creep"" vibe.
I need to be better at crafting the stories in my head before telling them, somehow I don't plan them very well and they come out confusing or rather disinteresting even when they are about smth truly remarkable.
So, what are your recommendations?",pickup
How to approach a woman,,pickup
What are your favorite books about alpha male body language and Nlp and why?,"I want to level up my game but I don't know where to start. there are so many Nlp books mostly about concentrating about yourself but I want something that is based on a pickup context of Nlp
Thanks for recommendations",pickup
How to Make a Guy Fall Absolutely in Love with You,,pickup
[ Request ] Bioenergetics: The Revolutionary Therapy That Uses the Language of the Body to Heal the Problems of the Mind,"hi, can someone share the book "" Bioenergetics: The Revolutionary Therapy That Uses the Language of the Body to Heal the Problems of the Mind ""? Thanks in advance.",pickup
Detaching from your mind,"as the title says, anyone knows how to detach from your mind completely ? because in transformation mastery it is required to detach from your mind and be in your body ",pickup
Best bootcamp in North America?,"Which bootcamp has the best value for the price? Im considering a 3day weekend bootcamp with RSD, or a one week immersion witb Rsd Todd Valentine, or a 4 week program with 4 week natural Alex.

My goal is to never have to worry about not knowing what the next step in a pickup is. Which one provides the most thorough understanding of Game?
Thoughts?",pickup
https://youtu.be/JEptbIHCfP0,,pickup
Anyone have a guide for the pranic breathing techniques used in transformation mastery ?,"hello guys, is there any resource about the Phranic breathing technique which is used in the guided releases and SubsConcious Guided releases section of the transformation mastery? I keep feeling stuck when i am inhaling to the count of 6 to my stomach area and feeling forced and uncomfortableness. Is This what supposed to happen ?",pickup
Approach Anxiety Mindset || daygame pickup,,pickup
How To Approach Family Sets,"I'm a 16 year old doing daygame for hours everyday this summer, and the most common set I see (9 times out of 10) is a beautiful stunning girl my age, however she's with her family. Sets like these really throw me off, because no pickup instructor talks about how to approach these kinds of sets. I even tried googling information about family sets, however there was absolutely nothing. Additionally, I feel like it's disrespectful to approach a girl with her father or brother watching. Any help would be very much appreciated. ",pickup
best rsd program,please share which rsd program gave you best results,pickup
Biggest secret to get better in pick up,GO OUT !,pickup
push through comfort zone,have tried many ways to get through comfort zone. But I found it helps when I am in a place I know very well or a an activity I enjoy doing. What works best for you?,pickup
Newbie Pick Up Week - Asking a Girl for a Kiss,,pickup
eating very spicy foods,This helps me as well to take more risks right after i eat it somehow and push through comfort zone. Anyone else tried it?,pickup
(New) Higher Status Video Course (Free),http://go.highstatus.com/hs-video-webfomercial?utm_content=LandingPage1Variation2,pickup
Picking Up A Model - COMPLETE Infield (Eren Vs The ENTIRE CLUB),,pickup
Approach Anxiety,"Quick Tip that helped me a lot.

1)Focus on amusing yourself, not the girl
2)No mental filter. Say whatever you want, even if it's retarded or not politically correct
3)Be willing to lose the girl

This is good in a club setting. This is good at the start of your journey or whenever you have really bad aa that you can't approach. ",pickup
Newbie Pickup Week - Going on a Tinder Date,,pickup
Best pick up company?,What do you guy think of RSD in term of the product quality? It's good as it promoted or just overrated?,pickup
TRANSFORMATION MASTERY IS LEGIT AF,"I just realized that transformation mastery is like a sequel of TenGame. TenGame talks about 10 rules of game but the most important stuff is from rules 1-4 (Get Out Of Your Own Way, Offer Value, Make Yourself Feel Good, and Be Real) But the thing that doesn't get me results because I just find it hard to do the first rule which is the Get Out of your own way.  Until TM came out. Until then it just became effortless for me. My life just became better and lighter and I never thought game would work best with authenticity and being honest to yourself first and then to others. Humans crave humanity. They crave authenticity. You yourself crave authenticity. And until you re-own the things that are part of yourself that you hate, you won't be happy and unless you are happy authentically, you can't offer value, you can't make yourself feel good, and you can't be real because in the first place you do not even know who you are. The point of this post is that i'm just telling you all that Transfomation Mastery is the Rule #1 of TenGame so if you could check this both out your problem with game, girls and happiness is over. It's not easy though, but it's worth it. Cheers. ☺️",pickup
Страх подхода. Как преодолеть. Часть 1. Как соблазнить девушку.,,pickup
Approaching Random Girls &amp; telling them they're cute - Newbie Pick Up,,pickup
I have always struggled with dating...,"I am writing this to talk about the one main problem I have always struggled with: Dating. This problem goes back as long as I can remember. 
 
Those who know me know how much of a great guy I am on the surface. I always enjoy conversation and listening. I am very physically fit. I am a successful career man with a job, salary, and benefits that I love. Whenever I am not working or training, I am doing charity work with friends, doing bible study, and helping out at church. Outside of all of these, I have very good friendly relationships with peers from work and church and with my family. I understand that women want a man who is confident, proactive, and fun, and I believe I fit all of these qualities very well. 
 
But for some reason, I have been very unsuccessful with romance and dating. I just do not have that “edge” that taps into female instinctive attraction. Throughout my life, most women have never really respected me. They see me as a friend and as a good guy, but never as a man to be respected. Even though I do consider myself pretty confident. 
 
I was diagnosed with Asperger’s Syndrome at age 22 which explains why I’ve been socially awkward for most of my young adult life. I used to be a “nice guy” but I’ve slowly been overcoming that over time. I’ve been gaining more confidence and I’ve been taking initiative more. I have also gotten much better with honesty and catching myself when I’m being awkward. 
 
What else hurts is that on some occasions, the woman will make posts on social media about a new boyfriend. While I do not get too obsessed or depressed, I often wonder what is it that these guys have that I do not. Even still, I constantly wonder what I could have done or should have done to help change what a person thought of me before asking the girl out. Whenever someone rejects me, I blame myself most of the time. I get stuck when I wonder what I could have done better. 
 
I never seem to get past the first date, or past the asking out. I don’t get any luck on speed dating events either. 
 
I have heard every response on the book. You’re a nice guy, but I don’t see you as boyfriend material. I just don’t see you that way. I’m not looking for dating right now. I’m too busy with work. You name it, I’ve heard it. 
 
As funny as this sounds, I seem to connect better with women who are either much younger than me, or much older. I am 29, and I’m looking for someone who is 24 to 34 years old. I hope that’s not too much to ask. 
 
I have spent hundreds of dollars on books and dating materials. Nothing seems to work right now. I don’t know if it’s me who is not applying it properly. The thing is, most of these books cover dating in bars and nightclubs, and I hate such venues. The noise is too much for me. I prefer to have a good conversation over dinner or lunch or coffee. I also enjoy an activity here and there. I have learned some very important things like the power of honesty and body language, but I get stuck wondering what to do. 
 
I have success with substantially every other facet of my life except for this one. It feels like there’s a hole in my life. Sometimes, it’s made me feel that there is something wrong with me or that I’m not looking in the right places. I know there is a lot for me to learn, but trying to become the stereotypical “perfect man” would be both exhausting and futile. And I know women are looking for a strong man, but I won’t become the stereotypical “bad boy”. 
 
What I’m looking for is a stable relationship. I’m not looking for a quick fling. I’m looking for someone who is a Christian and who appreciates chivalry and traditional values. It’s also essential that she respects herself and me, and does not see me as a dollar bill. 
 
As I said, I won’t be giving up on this, but I feel like I have to talk about this. I will keep putting myself out there and going on speed dating. Perhaps eHarmony might be a good choice. At the end of the day, I don’t want people to feel sorry for me, but I still feel like I had to talk about this to get it out of my chest because it’s been bothering me. I know there are plenty of women out there, but it feels bad to make so many attempts and to be 29 years old and never been in a relationship. I used to get all kinds of insults in high school and in the military because of it. 
 
Thank you for reading. 
",pickup
Desire,"Accomplishing your goals comes down to four things. Your beliefs, environment, actions /habits and level of desire. If you believe you are on attractive man, you will subconsciously adopt the habits of an attractive man, which will help you get laid but, it is hard to believe you're attractive, if girls are not attracted to you. If your surrounded by attractive men, you will naturally adopt their behaviors, which will make you more attractive and help you get laid but, it is hard to surround yourself with greatness, if you, yourself are not great. You can take massive action, spam approach and use different techniques but, it is hard to change your habits that you've had for years that have kept girls away from you. Here's the good news. The more your habits, environment and beliefs have kept girls away from you, the stronger of a DESIRE you have to attain success with women. If your struggling in this area, your desire is your most powerful tool. Focus on increasing your desire for women and you'll figure out a way to overcome the obstacles of attaining the right beliefs, environment and habits.
",pickup
How to not become emotionally invested in women,,pickup
"Модель соблазнения. Как соблазнить девушку. Провокатор. Фильм ""Метод Хитча""",,pickup
Как соблазнить девушку. Клубное соблазнение. Атрибутика в клубном соблаз...,,pickup
Please share your Spotify playlist for pumping your mood before you go out.,,pickup
"Worrying you'll look retarded when you approach, watch this",,pickup
Модель соблазнения. Как соблазнить девушку. Провокатор.,,pickup
Newbie Pickup Week - Telling girls they're cute &amp; asking for a date - Part 4,,pickup
[Question] Body language program,What do you think is the best program about body language? And why?,pickup
Модель соблазнения. Как соблазнить девушку. Весельчак.,,pickup
Модель соблазнения. Как соблазнить девушку. Джентельмен.,,pickup
Anybody familiar with Carlos Xuma?,"I have a lot of his stuff from way back in the day, and it seems like he had a lot of stuff figured out way before RSD",pickup
Pickup advice for young people,"Marhaba, I'm a teenager that's been doing pickup for about a year now, and I was wondering if anyone has advice for pickup for young people. Also, I wanted to know if pickup is any different for adults and teenagers?",pickup
Модель соблазнения. Как соблазнить девушку. Приз.,,pickup
"The 10 Get Laid Commandments, puts things in a different perspective",,pickup
(Request)How2TextHer,"Anyone have how to text her, i would really appreciate the program",pickup
How to seduce your girlfrind every day - in spanish,,pickup
Модель соблазнения. Как соблазнить девушку. Джентельмен.,,pickup
[REQUEST] Hotseat @ Home evolve,"Please share Hotseat @ Home evolve if you have it.
Thankyou!",pickup
How To Increase Your Social Status: Julien &amp;amp; Tyler's Advanced Secrets To Becoming High Value!,,pickup
Newbie Pickup Week - Telling girls they're are cute and asking for a date,,pickup
Модель соблазнения. Как соблазнить девушку. Приз.,,pickup
(Question) did repeating frames help you improve your game?,Like the frames that come in rsdmax the natural and fearless.,pickup
Check out RSD Madison's beginner series for any serious noobs. it helped me. good place to start.,,pickup
Модель соблазнения. Как соблазнить девушку. Альфа (мачо),,pickup
How do you deal with Alphas bent on showing off without getting into a fight???,,pickup
"No more NLP, Hypnosis and Magic?","Out of the game for some years and  now i see, many things changed. I never had real problems with girls but pickup helped me a lot to improve my life and to meet new friends (and nice girls).  Because I saw results before, I never got to technical with game and relationship between men and women. Many of my friends studied the technical side and sometimes it seems to me that this blocked them in the real game (still great players). My game was all about body language and vibe but products about NLP, Hypnosis and magic worked great for me, also the challenges. 
Hypnotica (Hypnosis), Rob Brinded (magnetic Bodylanguage), Cory Skyy (Hypnosis) and demonic confidence (great challenges) helped me a lot. And NLP in general (mirroring). Now it seems that it is all about RSD and JC. Are you guys still use Hypnosis and NLP products? 





",pickup
this man BayuJibrael is just awesome! I have got it within seconds... thank you bro,,pickup
I am a noob gamer help pls,how can i become normal and make everyone like me. I am so shy and have 0 self esteem how can i become like brad pitt. Do i need money? Do i need to be tall and jacked? I am willing to do everything to get a 10 as girlfriend but i dont know how,pickup
Do you think this is really Julien from RSD? I know he got in trouble before but this goes against the advice he gives,,pickup
"Cool Guys Get Laid, Not Weirdos",,pickup
Модель соблазнения. Как соблазнить девушку. Романтик.,,pickup
Taiwanese girl - getting her phone number,,pickup
Insightful cartoon exposing the true nature of our ego,,pickup
Is there any program for physical escalation?,,pickup
Cold showers and pick up,How exactly does this help with picking up girls? I really don't get the connection. Can someone please explain to me how this affects one's pickup skills? Thanks in advance.,pickup
Модель соблазнения. Как соблазнить девушку. Романтик.,,pickup
How to be more grounded?,,pickup
How long does it takes to become an advanced?,"Please share your experience.

Also please upvote post- I need karma points to participate in other groups. ",pickup
How to Approach Group Sets,"I've been struggling with approaching group sets, anyone got advice?
 
Also upvotes would be appreciated, cuz I'm trying to improve my karma to be able to participate in other reddit pickup posts without getting my posts deleted by a mod.",pickup
Does anyone get results doing NOFAP?,"Some people say that NOFAP could improve your game. Is it true? I friend told me that he's been doing NOFAP for 3 months and he gets laid easily. He also told me that he doesn't even need to speak when he go out, he just opens the set rolling in the floor, grab the girl's hand and BOOM.",pickup
RSD programs and reviews,"Hey everyone, I have a couple of programs from RSD including Boss by Madison, natural and fearless by max, tengame and making a shift by Julien, and foundations by tyler. 

Does anyone have any personal reflections on the above programs and what they think of them? also, which would be a good program to start with? I am a tall skinny white guy with absolutely no game skills. the few results I have are from women gaming me. Need help please.",pickup
What do you think of Daniel Blake? Is he legit?,,pickup
Do you know PUA books that changed your life?,"Please tell me if you know some books, I just learned English 10 months ago and I think I'm ready to go out and be the next Mystery.",pickup
"Guys, what programs are suitable to get started with pickup &amp; can anyone share them below this post?",,pickup
Taking Action,"As much as I want to, I know that I'm really way to young. And I'm not using this as an excuse to avoid action taking, but it's a serious dilemma for me.
A little help would be appreciated!",pickup
Anyone know what good programs to start with when new to pickup?,,pickup
When your in the bedroom,"Hey guys, i noticed there are tons of resources out there from approaching to attraction building and so on and so forth but is there anything out there that explains being smooth (transitioning) in the bedroom. For example the last two girls I had in an actual bedroom alone (back when I was single) there was resistance. Either I wasn't smooth or something went wrong from the approach to the bedroom. Fast forward to now, I have a girlfriend and we have sex all the time. I tell her I want a break so I can go pimpin again but I'm really rusty. She says ""okay seduce me then. If I was some girl you had in this room how would you seduce me."" I fuckin froze because I'm so used to her just taking off her panties and having sex. I realized I wouldnt know what to say to a new women and that I've been lazy (and spoiled) with my current girlfriend as far as being smooth in the bedroom. Any pointers or programs you can recommend?  ",pickup
Where do i start?,"In the torrent's section i watched the link with a 1 TB, wich one is better to star with?",pickup
Any newbies here,anyone new to this?,pickup
Модель соблазнения. Как соблазнить девушку. Альфа (мачо),,pickup
Модель соблазнения. Как соблазнить девушку. Провокатор.,,pickup
Asking for Girls Phone Number - A Week of Newbie Pick up: Rejection Therapy,,pickup
Модель соблазнения. Как соблазнить девушку. Свободный художник.,,pickup
Hot California Girls eating Oysters,,pickup
Resonator Link,,pickup
Free Skype Coaching For Approach Anxiety,"Hey guys - first-time poster so I hope this is cool.

Just putting this one out there because I'm not sure who would be interested. I also posted this in the /r/approachanxietyhelp subreddit fyi.

But I know that when I suffered from approach anxiety, I would have loved an opportunity like this.

My name is Moose and over the past two years I've not only managed to overcome my own approach anxiety, but I've managed to help my friends overcome theirs too.

They suggested coaching others guys but I wasn't too sure. So, I'm putting this out there to see if I'd be any good at this by offering free coaching lessons over Skype. Maybe one day I'd be able to do it properly.

For now, these coaching sessions would be 30min or 1-hour chats. Depends on what suits you. I'm in London so a BST timezone. But happy to accommodate.

If this is interesting to anyone - or you know anyone who would be interested - reply to let me know. And only if it's okay with the moderators, I'll share my skype name.

Take it easy guys,

Moose",pickup
"Transformation Mastery (Confused, I need help!)","Ive completed the program and have allready gone back a secound round, but I am still confused.
First of all, Im very confused in how the process works, Julien did't make it clear in the program I felt. He claims you have to let go of your ego first, and then you have to unbury the things youve stored in your subconcious. But how do you do this if you still beleive what your trying to disprove, is real? I ask myself ""why am I afraid of what others think of me"", and I keep asking why, and I get down to the conclusion that I do it for happiness / completeness. OK, I understand that, but then theres this thought that ""its real, you need to fix this to feel complete"" and then I have to ask myself the ""whys"" again, I get to the same conclusion that i do it for happiness, but the voice doesnt stop that keeps telling me ""I have to fix the problem to feel complete,"" is still there... and its a cycle... I dont get how you get away from it.

Also, how do you differ scarity from abundance? How do you know your in scarcity or abundance? How do I know if Im acting on inspiration or desperation? Very confused to how Im supposed to know if im acting on which of the two. I ""question everything"" like Julien says to do and its hard to tell if Im doing my actions from a state of needniness or inspiration... Everytime I ask myself ""why am i doing this"" I always get down to the conclusion of, ""to feel happy and complete, "" no matter what it is

Any response and Im grateful for it! ",pickup
What are de best pickup courses out there ?,"If you had to choose only 3 pickup courses for the rest of your life, what would they be and why ?",pickup
Модель соблазнения. Как соблазнить девушку. Альфа (мачо),,pickup
Модель соблазнения. Как соблазнить девушку. Свободный художник.,,pickup
Has anyone tried Elixir of Eros?,,pickup
A week of Newbie Pick up - Warm up round: Trying to get 5 Random Girls to Laugh,,pickup
JC trade,"Trading any product I have (everything else) for millionaire DNA, 7 figure accelerators, cash flow king, and the new products on the go.highstatus site (charisma and higher status video program).",pickup
How to Get Any Girl You Want (Not What You Think),,pickup
The best life changing program?,"Hello. I'm wondering which is the best program? I find myself always searching for new information when it comes down to pick up, because I am a shy guy with zero experience and also having social anxiety. I always tell myself that I have to change and have to take action, but when I do it for a week or two I just come back to my old habits - staying at home (I am introvert) watching TV and spending decent amount of time on the computer... I need program which can help me to push harder, because the years pass by really fast and here I am - eighteen years old with zero experience, knowing what I have to do but don't have enough motivation. Can anybody help me and sorry if there are any mistakes. :/",pickup
Thoughts on Street Attractions Programs,,pickup
Made some dumb ass fan art you players might like:),,pickup
Singapore girl - daygame pickup inside a clothing store,,pickup
Certainty VS Empathy (+Infield) Pulling a Model on the Street,,pickup
Any recommendations for a text game product?,"Hey guys! Can anybody recommend me a text game product except for the RSD ToDD textgame?
thx",pickup
any products on what to do on dates,"what products are out there to help you on your first date like how to act, how to sit where to sit, and how to escalate
",pickup
Epic Infield Rampage - One Night With Eren Social,,pickup
Method I Use To Talk To Girls,,pickup
How To Draw Boundaries And Still Seem Grounded,,pickup
Seoul's Best PICK Up spots + Infield,,pickup
"Newbie Pickup - Approaching Girl &amp; telling her she's ""awfully cute""",,pickup
Newbie pickup - Telling a girl she's cute and asking for her phone number,,pickup
RSD Todd - How To Learn Anything 10x Faster &amp; More Effectively,,pickup
Student Infield Breakdown - What It's Like Learning On The 4WN With Bradicus,,pickup
8 Minute Daygame Same Day Lay INFIELD BREAKDOWN(+POV),,pickup
The Secret Way To Handle Rejections: Feeling Alive,,pickup
THE 4 WEEK NATURAL BOOTCAMP EXPERIENCE -With Ryan,,pickup
Changing Your Beliefs - Rewiring Your BRAIN For Better INNER Game,,pickup
stepbacks in game,"how many stepbacks did you have in game? 
I mean like go out + take actions for sometime than drop it, and come back agian? share you experience.

I went out about a year - year and half - mostly night game - (i feel really awkward doing game during the day).  Approach at least 3 set per night -3,4 times a week, but pull a little - many times struggle just to open, and sometimes crush it (but it was rare) the change was hard, like something always pulling me down to the squre 1, in my case is wasnt like its adds up - and getting better lvl1-lvl2-lvl3 so on ...
it was more a random thing - one day  iam on lvl-5, next i go back to lvl1 or 2
i had time of denied about last year - meaning thinking that this game thing is bullshit and immauture, maketers and sales men making money on virgins, and the only thing that really matters in life is $$$,
but now I feel like i need to go back to it

share your story.",pickup
Approaching a girl and telling her she's cute - Rejection Therapy to bui...,,pickup
Eren Unveils The Secret ‘Belief System’ To Getting The Hottest Girls That YOU Can Replicate,,pickup
30 Day Infield Challenge - Day 20: Daygame Compilation: 20 Minute Pull - Instadate,,pickup
Almost Every Guy Will Fuck You Over (Here Is Why),,pickup
Opening Multiple Girls &amp; Merging While In Line For Food Seemingly Invisibly - Daygame Infield,,pickup
"Alex &amp; Ryan on ""Don't Be That Guy"" + INFIELD PULL",,pickup
(+Infield) How To Steal Girls From Guys &amp; Take Them Home,,pickup
Cold approaching a girl from behind - Rejection Therapy,,pickup
Developing a Pickup App,"Hi Everyone,

I'm thinking about developing an app specifically for pickup. I want to know if you guys would be interested in one and what features you would like. 
Off the top of my head I can assume everyone would like a gps-based wingman finder.

Tell me what you guys think.",pickup
30 Day Infield Challenge - Day 19: Daygame Compilation: How To Game When Out Of State- POV INFIELD!,,pickup
RSD Max &amp; Tyler - BECOME The Creator Not Just Consumer !,,pickup
Failure Enough Times Over Becomes Success,,pickup
How To Overcome Social Anxiety And Shyness | 4 Simple Principles,,pickup
30 Day Infield Challenge - Day 17: Daygame Compilation: RAW POV INFIELD 8 Minute Pull!,,pickup
4WN RYAN - Dubai to Sweden (From Perth),,pickup
30 Day Infield Challenge - Day 16: Daygame Compilation: POV INFIELD + Pull + Number Close,,pickup
Don't miss your chance to talk with her !,,pickup
Shakey Newbie Pickup - Approaching Girls in Barcelona &amp; Complimenting them,,pickup
30 Day Infield Challenge - Day 15: Daygame Compilation: POV INFIELD + Instadate + Number Close,,pickup
Daygame Secrets REVEALED: How To Make Her Feel Comfortable INSTANTLY - Building Familiarity,,pickup
Ways to Improve my Game,"Hello, I'm pretty new to pickup having recently read The Game and The Mystery Method. After reading them both I decided to get some field action and I've run into a few common problems. 1.) I open well and have a good conversation but I never can find a way to slip in a Neg that's appropriate. 2.) Kino for me has been hard and I don't know when I should use it. Thanks for all the help and advice on where to start.",pickup
Swedish Guy tries to pick up girl in Barcelona - Fear takes over,,pickup
Cold Approaching Girls in Barcelona - running after a jogging girl,,pickup
The Four Stages To Reach Pickup Mastery (ex rsd coach),,pickup
What self improvement products do want to buy if you can afford it? (New products - to be released products),"Trying to help out and see if I can fund some of these purchases and get some of these products. Have some friends who are willing to pitch in. 

Please provide the product and a link to the purchase site. Please only request products that are not already on the other mega links. ",pickup
Anyone in/around Boston trying to do daygame on the weekends?,"been really trying to get into daygame recently but it really is a nervous thing haha. 

I assume it would be a lot easier/funner if I associated with people who were also into daygame and pickup so if anyone's nearby lemme know I'm really trying to get into it.

little background I'm 20 and have experience with women, just not cold approach.",pickup
How To Meet Girls On The Train/Bus/Subway/Tram - Talking To Girls In Transit + Infield,,pickup
[Discussion] JC action pill,"Hey guys I am going to buy the Jc action pills Have any of you guys tried it?
Does it have any side effects? Like rashes on skin 

Please review people who have tried it.
Thank you
",pickup
Drinking and The Game?,,pickup
The Story Of Eren Social - Loner To Legend,,pickup
Grocery Store Infield - Picking Up Swedish Girl At Woolworth's - Daygame Infield,,pickup
Thoughts on MGTOW?,Anyone have thoughts on Mgtow? Most of them bash on pua and how all of us are just sacrificing ourselves for girls while they advocate isolation from females and most of the community being new and all follows along without looking twice at a girl. Yet when you talk to the ones leading the pack like MGTOW 101 he defends himself by saying his relationship with girls is just to have Fun and fuck girls while going his own way and putting himself first aka the PUA lifestyle and not what he preaches and tells guys to do. They also have a concept of there only being blue pill and red pill and unless you believe in a negative outlook in women thats align with thiers you must be blue pilled and living in a fantasy world. ,pickup
"RSD Max - How to get a girlfriend, great advices to get the right girl",,pickup
Any interest in mPUA AMAs?,We might good hooked up with some mPUAs if there's enough interest. ,pickup
The Day I Met Zyzz - Trailer,,pickup
How To Lead A Girl While Keeping Her Interests At Heart + Infield,,pickup
Guy Asks Swedish Girls What they look for in a Guy - Practicing Rejection Therapy,,pickup
Guy Approaches Girl and tries to get a Date - Rejection Therapy to build Self-Esteem,,pickup
30 Day Infield Challenge - Day 7: Daygame Compilation - Daygame Physicality + Infield Thoughts,,pickup
Creeping Self-doubt,"I am practicing new mindsets. I am currently facing some sticking points that I hope you guy could help me. When I manage to talk to a girl for instance, and even though I expose myself and do all I could and the girl rejects me, I keep taking it abit personally. Like thinking to myself stuff like if I was better looking or if a better looking/cooler guy did the same thing as me, she wouldn't have rejected me. Maybe I'm not good enough, maybe I'm full of it and not all that like I want to tell myself.

For guys who went through such experiences, how you think about it and how you stopped taking it personally? How you see rejection? How stop comparing yourself to other guys?",pickup
(Request) what are the best list of product to make her chase you,,pickup
Review of the latest content in Manwhore.org 's monthly membership,"Intro to Manwhore , since he's relatively unknown. very solid guy. Used to be an instructor/associate instructor for RSD for years. You can checkout his old RSD profile http://www.rsdnation.com/manwhore/profile . Seems like he definitely could have been an RSD instructor but he didn't want to do all the corporate requirements, ie teach day bootcamps which he doesn't feel is an effective teaching medium. 

But you can checkout his free articles and vids www.manwhore.org https://www.youtube.com/user/Manwhorelio/videos . If you're an intermediate or advanced guy, his legitimacy should be glaringly obvious. If you only want to read one or two articles, I would recommend the LMR series (much more than LMR) or his field report with RSDAlex. 

I actually prefer Manwhore. His audience is only a few thousand people (vs hundred thou for JC or RSD) , so he doesn't have to worry about 'not being contradicting' or 'being mainstream friendly', or answering the fucking looks matter question, or posting some shitty motivational porn video, or whatever retard shit social media celebrities or marketers are into. 

His material is very focused on **insight** , low on fluff. Not sure how it'll come across to a newbie, but for people who actually go out and hovering on at least intermediate, his value should be pretty obvious. 

Here's links to the previous manwhore reviews I did

https://www.reddit.com/r/seduction/comments/5of8ux/checked_out_manwhores_membership_thing_its_pretty/
https://www.reddit.com/r/pickup/comments/612p13/manwhore_latest_content_review_on_his_monthy/



Here's a review of the chapters released since my last review of his monthly membership. 

**How To Control Your Unconscious Mind.**

Based off of Tolle's stuff. Reminds me of stuff in Transformation Mastery. It's about how experiences we had, especially when we were younger, shapes out subconscious minds, and how it translate to our behavior and conscious thoughts, confidence, anxiety, instincts etc. 

Very important to get down imo. Assuming that you put effort into being more present (lowering filters, being spontaneous, not thinking/calculating everything you do and say), a lot of your personality is your subconscious thoughts, emotions, and assumptions. A lot of people have these nodes of anxiety and fear. Very important for dealing with in game, coming across as a high status person, etc. This video is tip of iceburg imo, 6-7 minutes but dense. 



**The Sexual Buying Temperature Timeline**

Female psychology stuff. He uses a scale of 0 to 100 of how much she wants to have sex with you. Goes over what's on her mind using this scale from every part of pick up (open, move, etc) and the factors that influence this scale. 

Also goes over one of his most used paradigms: Projection of Authority. It's a paradigm that covers a ton(maybe most) of 'Pickup' techniques. He gives a few manifestations (techniques) of this paradigm. Projection of authority is a paradigm i've going to use to analyze my nights. 8-9 minutes. 



**“Survival Biology”: Why We FAIL**

Evolutionary psychology stuff. Homeostasis. Survival psychology and why it can lead to self sabotage. Probably not anything new to anyone with a decent understanding of evolutionary psychology. 

But if you're not one of those people, you need to get on this asap. A lot of our subconscious thoughts are from our past, **but** a lot are wired genetically. You need to figure out all the main ones regardless of where they come from. This video isn't the only source of this info; you can find it else where. But this is is a pretty solid, clear, and concise explanation. 

**Masterclass: Eye Contact**

Goes over the social dynamics of facial expressions, one example in business/listening. He also goes over the number one mistake guys do with eye contact. As far as I know I never seen an RSD video cover it. Not to make this sound too clickbaty, if you studied acting or decently proficient at pickup you probably already know it. I did learn something new though, the most common subconscious thought behind that particular action (like I mentioned in the other sections of this reviews, this is why mastering your subconscious thoughts are so important). 

He also goes over what to do when the initial reaction is negative. 




**Overcoming The Sexual Shaming We ALL Have!**

Goes over the most common causes of the fear and anxiety guys have when expressing themselves sexually. Some guys don't even have a sexual identity. It isn't just girls who get sexuality shammed. A lot of diving into your subconscious stuff. 

**The CORNERSTONE Technology of Text Game**

The premise of this section is “The point of text game is to turn emotional leverage into logistical compliance.  “.
Most of the sections in this review I’m either crystalizing or deepening stuff I already know since I’ve had a solid amount of time looking at material and going out, but with this advanced text game stuff it’s like I’m back to being a newbie looking at PUA material for the first time. Though I’ve never really looked too much into text game outside the RSD stuff (jeffy, todd max), but that stuff is mostly and intro to online game.

He gives several techniques each with an example: Challenge, Childish Adventure , Shared adventure , Shock &amp; Awe , Slightly Pissed .



**Masterclass: Effectively Handling Amog’s, Mother Hens &amp; Cockblocks**

He goes over personality trait you should have to even prevent amog’s cockblocks from happening in the first place. Then he gives overall strategy and the play-by-play of what he does in those situations. 

This is no magic pill stuff though. It’s not some old school ‘amog destroyer’ stuff. The foundation of this is good game. But if you have good game, this stuff I think, is exactly what you need to do. 

He gives a manifestation (aka, a line) of his overall strategy that you can use. 

There’s stuff he advises which I haven’t really done too much of. Will start working on that




**Text Game Manual: “First Texts”**

A little more begginer-ish text stuff. Implementing classic pickup principles (call back humor,  conspiratorial, “you and I are a team” type vibe , endearing tone , etc), but also not quite. He gives quite a few examples with texts you can start using right away. 



**Sex MasterClass: Dominance Vs. Sensuality**

This is my favorite section of this review. It’s a masterpiece, I can tell he crafted this in massive presence. It’s sort of the next part of the *** Fear &amp; Arousal: The Quintessential Dichotomy Of Love &amp; Lust
section. 

The premise is about “Control Points” and “Hot Spots”

in bed, but it’s more than that. For one thing, you apply this to kino escalation in game in general. In fact, I think he did this in his Sasha Daygame section of that one product I reviewed last time. 

Anyways, for the first time in a long time I’m learning from pickup material about female psychology of attraction/arousal. I’ve been learning a lot from my own experiences this past year/2years, but not much from material/videos until now. And yes, I’ve seen the whole Women by Todd Valentine. 

But this, in combination with the fear and arousal ch has deepened by understanding so much that  I would call it a re-wiring. 

This is a cheesy example, but I saw Twilight a while ago and while I got the gist of why women found it so appealing, but was confused about why studios just didn’t create another billion dollar franchise. I saw Twilight again recently, and I can see how they hit a lot of attraction/arousal nodes with surgical precision. I know there’s a lot of aspects of the story that are ‘bad’, but so are the plots of a lot of porn movies. The story was designed to be arousing, not to have the best character or plot consistency. 

The advice is mostly for the bed, but this new awareness has shifted a lot of my subcommunications and behaviors in my interactions with women. It has deepened other theories/understandings I’ve had with other aspects of what causes female arousal/attraction (they’re all kinda linked). I’m also looking at a lot of the pickup infields under a new lens, especially RSDJulien 's. 

I feel that the 2 chapters I mentioned here could use their own book club discussion. 

Can’t guarantee everyone will have the same realizations I’ve had. I recommend people ponder the ‘swept off her feet’ paragraph a few times and see how it applies to real life, movies, and especially infields. 

In case you want to subscribe 

http://mwdatingcoach.org/

Either way, check out his free shit, it's free! 
www.manwhore.org https://www.youtube.com/user/Manwhorelio/videos

",pickup
Transformation mastery question (from identifying the subconscious video),"So julien said that the 4 ways of identifying subconscious hinderances were childhood, patterns, triggers, and escapism. I've always had problems in all of these categories and one thing I'm trying to focus on fixing is escaping through porn and masturbation addiction. But julien said this is one of the hardest things to fix because it requires you to embrace the pain and not resort to relief through your addiction (masturbation in my case). But earlier he also kept saying what you resist persists. You just have to acknowledge what's there and let it be, don't judge it negatively or positively, just acknowledge that it happened and that's all there is to it.

How can I get over masturbation addiction if what I resist persists? (Resisting masturbating = still wanting to do it and not getting over it) ?",pickup
"Why Going Out And Doing Daygame Makes Nightgame Easier! Bradicus, Alex &amp; Seany Talk",,pickup
30 Day Infield Challenge - Day 6: Daygame Compilation - Normal Session,,pickup
Newbie Guy tries to pick up Swedish girl - Asks for a date,,pickup
How to self amuse,"How did you guy lean to self amuse and exaggerate in sets, i am newbie and learning to self amuse so that i will have some stuff to say without relying on chick's replies.
 Is there any exercises or anything that would help me to get out of my head and amuse myself. ",pickup
Screening - One Of The Most Overlooked Yet Important Elements To Game,,pickup
Imagine this,"if JC joined RSD, then he would be RSD Jason, right? His Team Capital would be RSD'd Team Capital. That would be just like a scene where the rich comes to display and buys the poor",pickup
Newbie does shakey cold approaching trying to pickup swedish girls - Rejection Therapy,,pickup
30 Day Infield Challenge - Day 5: Daygame Compilation - Instadate + How to Warmup,,pickup
30 Day Infield Challenge - Day 4: Daygame Compilation,,pickup
Transformation Mastery aftermath question,"Ok, so i gone through the program. I admitted defeat, traced down those underlying emotions, and did the breathing exercise to let go. Afterwards i now feel kinda sad and hopeless. I don't know if that's alright or if i just didn't go through the letting go process correctly.",pickup
(Request) list of push pull routines and lines,plz share here a list of good push pull routines and lines,pickup
How to start in seduction?,"Hello
How can I start in this world of seduction, how can I take action, and take away limiting beliefs?
What dou you recommend ? Any book or program?
Thank!",pickup
Looks like /r/pickuptorrents got fixed. . . post product stuff there and refrain from posting it here.,You guys can go back to your home world!,pickup
"Exclusive Interview With EREN! Lets Talk Quick Pulls, Entitlement, Daygame Openers And More",,pickup
"Ryan &amp; Sean on Breaking the 9-to-5, Finding What You REALLY Want to Do, and Just GOING FOR IT!",,pickup
Alex &amp; Eren Reveal What It TRULY Means To Be ALPHA + How To Get Into An Alpha Male Social Circle,,pickup
Infield+Lovedeep discusses approach anxiety,,pickup
Punishment for my friend?,"Hey guys,
I m playing a game with my mate where if one of us sees a girl he can order the other guy to talk to her no matter where and when.
And if one refuses he gets punished immedietly.

Do you know any punishments you can pull off in the middle of a street ?",pickup
The Open To Close Daygame Manifesto + Infield,,pickup
Justin Wayne caught using models in infield,,pickup
Newbie guy tries to pickup 2 swedish girls in stockholm,,pickup
My review of Jason Capital’s Higher Status book…,,pickup
[REQUEST] F Formula - Marni Wing Girl,Does anyone have this?,pickup
[REQUEST] Higher Status Audiobook,anybody has the audiobook version? would love to get these audios into my sleep :),pickup
Bradicus Picking Up A Hot Busy Girl In A Hurry - Daygame Infield,,pickup
Guy does shakey pickup but fails - In Sweden,,pickup
"Girl is ""seeing someone"" right now, should I meet up with her anyway?","**tl;dr** Invited this girl to grab a muffin tomorrow, she says that sounds great but she's seeing someone so it has to be on friendly terms. Should I bother going? I don't have much to lose. 

***

I'm looking for someone who knows what the fuck they're doing to tell me what's going on and whether I should bother meeting up with this girl.

I used to work with her. Neither of us work there anymore and we're both in university (same program different uni). Let's not waste time with details but it's clear to me there is *some* amount of interest, however small. We at least *like* each other.

This is definitely someone I want to have sex with, BUT she's pretty funny and I think we could have good chemistry just as people regardless of what happens. 

I've been sending so-called value-giving texts every now and then which she always responds to so I invited her to grab a bite once but she was working, and week later to see a comedy show, and she said ""damn I wish, but I'm working."" Always asked for the same day and never thought to plan something ahead.

I stopped asking for a month or so because I've been too busy but just now ended up inviting her to grab a muffin after her exam tomorrow (we both have exams in the morning and will be in the same area). Just asked what her day was like and she said she had an exam in the AM, so I replied ""My exam's at 2. How about [this place] in the afternoon.""

She said,""that sounds great but I'm seeing someone so it would have to be friendly. Nervous for the exam? What's it on?"" I said ""no worries hot stuff,"" told her about the exam and asked about hers. She said she had to cram so I told her ""well snap, better get to it then."" Her: ""I better... lol fuck."" So I left it like that.

Best case scenario, she's just saying that so I don't expect anything from her. Another possibility is that she met that someone doing the same thing she did with me. Girls are always seeing someone. If I'm cool and fun and never act needy maybe things will happen eventually. I've had 2 gfs that happened with and they were total freaks in bed. 

I probably wouldn't spend much time hanging out with this girl if she doesn't show signs of putting out but I do think it would be good to meet up with her just because I need to interact with women more. I would use this as practice at the very least, and maybe she'll introduce me to her friends or give me inside info or something. This girl is hotter than most girls I talk to so I figure it can't hurt to have the reference. 

Do I sound like a fucking freak or what's going on? Am I nuts or does this make sense? I'm kind of in scarcity right now. Middle of exams and no money to go out. My ex loves having me over to fuck but it really isn't ideal. I pulled a random girl to her own place a month ago but we only ended up messing around a bit, making out and cuddling all night and going for pho in the morning. Haven't really managed to meet up with her since. That was the first (and only time) I actually went home with a girl I met the same night and it blew my frikin mind. I know I can do it again, and don't plan on making this girl I used to work with anything special. I see her as practice/potential fuckbuddy/friend who can give me value somehow. Confidence, fun, whatever.

I plan on going out several times a week this summer. Just to put this girl in perspective on my radar or whatever you might call it. She could be a wing, or someone to bring to a party. I know she goes clubbing so there's that. What I mean is I won't get stuck on this girl--she's not my ideal girlfriend so I just won't let that happen.",pickup
Seduce Her With Time &amp; Relaxation - Relaxed Arousal,,pickup
If i am a 10 and girl is a 6 is there too much of a value difference,Would a 6 girl want a 6.5 or 7 guy who she can keep easily or a level 10 guy who builds comfort yet he is harder to keep,pickup
Eren's F*cked Up Speech! - Become Your Own Legend Or Die,,pickup
Drake reading his tinder conversations!! Hilarious,,pickup
Travelbum Show old videos,"Do you know Travelbum? He is The natural lifestyles coach now. He had series about pickup and travel but he deleted all his videos. (reuploaded only few)
Maybe someone did copy of it or know where I can watch it.",pickup
What are some of the changes that game has brought you,"I am a beginner who's just starting, but I'm already seeing the world quite differently now, especially regarding social conditioning, attraction and neediness. Feel free to share some of your experiences with game :)",pickup
[Free] Jason Capital-7 Millionaires Secrets,"link : http://go(dot)highstatus.com/
UPVOTE PLEASE",pickup
What do you think about Kezia Noble? Have anyone tried her products?,,pickup
Why People Don't Want To Talk To You - Start Showing &amp; Sharing NOT TELLING,,pickup
The REAL Story of Bradicus... 4WeekNatural,,pickup
Recommend David Tian,"The guy's products offer so much value, I mean it's a different style to RSD kind of game, but to me I find David Tian to be much more helpful, especially for acting and feeling like a normal human being around girls with things like conversation, framing etc. I like he doesn't focus too much on the pickup but emphasizes the personal development aspect.
Overall fully recommend to everyone, especially Asians",pickup
How to use pickup products,We need a product on how to use pickup products.,pickup
Kinobody Style (Best styling for pua),,pickup
How To Have A Perfect First Date /ex rsd/,,pickup
Another Controversial Video... Let's Talk About Daygame,,pickup
"[ADVICE] Changing game styles, hitting plateau","Hey guys i recently hit a plateau. I follow rsd since forever and i was addicted to energy gaming. Now im more into todd stuff, more gamey and i put aside that high energy gaming since i want to become more grounded and do chill daygame and shit. So i hit a plateau, 0 fucking results. I follow fred hooking model from todd and its cool, but im not congruent to this. What are your advices what should i do with this? Should i learn some more techniques, or set my frame control right because todd says the words aren't that much of a deal, but the place where are coming from",pickup
can someone learn pickup without having a relationship in the past,I want to learn pickup i didn't have any relationship with girls in high school(gf) now i'm in college 18 years old i want to learn pickup but my friend keep saying that i can't skip levels relationships with girls came first then pick up and this stuff.is this right?share your experience please.,pickup
How Bad Do You Want It? Story Of Bradicus - Exclusive Interview With BRADICUS!,,pickup
[REQUEST] Fields reports/ebook:get laid or try dying by jeffy,"Hey guys, I am newbie, I don't have approach anxiety but I don't know what to talk next, so I need field reports of success and failures. So i found this book. If you have another suggestions, link, book. Please help/share",pickup
How to close,"I opened a 3 set this evening to shoot some pickup pool with 2 viable targets. After finding out one was married to an obstacle she then BECAME an obstacle as the other target was on a date with the couple.

The night ended with me trying to number close the third wheel however i got stopped but was told that she wouldnt forget about me, hugged and i left.

How could i manage this differently if i run into them again or another situation similar to this",pickup
Every Guy Should Be A Fuck Boy (ex rsd coach)(haters gonna hate),,pickup
[Watching] TransformationMastery Saturday!,"UPVOTE IF YOU LIKE THE IDEA

Hi guys we will go on at Saturday! We will meet on an IRC-Chat (very easy to use) **8pm UTC+1 (Berlin)** I know some of you might be from another country/timezone so if this doesnt work comment.

We will use: webchat.quakenet.org 
To join choose a nickname (use ur reddit name!)
and enter the channel #rsd Its very easy 
to use and we stay anonym!

comment if you need another time/day

**We are watching part 2 ""Proof""**
",pickup
My thought on abundance TM.,"I watched TM and this is my thought on how to operate form abundance.
I think you are realizing that the essence of you as a living and conscious human being can never be added to nor subtracted from.  Abundance comes from knowing the fact that you are always the present experiencer and knower of your own life and existence.  In fact, if you look back on your life to when you were a small boy, the abiding presence always there and still there today is the same conscious knowing that is you.  As you have now learned firsthand, the outside things we do and obtain can go just as easily as they came, so it's fruitless to base one's identity and happiness on outside things.  Yes, it's fun to play in the world of form and improve ourselves or attain this or that, but we must always realize that outside things can never add to the essence nor subtract from the essence of who we are as human beings.﻿",pickup
A New Life - 4 Week Natural Motivational Video - Hustle And Adapt,,pickup
[Watching] together the programs!,"**UPVOTE IF YOU LIKE THE IDEA**

Hi, due to a lot of intrest in my idea of watching a program together I want to actually realise it!!
We will meet this evening on an IRC-Chat (very easy to use) 
I would propose in 3 hours --&gt; **9pm UTC+1 (Berlin)**
I know some of you might be from another country/timezone
so if this doesnt work we will have to make out 
a time that fits for as many people as possible so try to show up please ;)
We will use: **webchat.quakenet.org**
To join choose a nickname (use ur reddit name!) and enter the channel **#rsd**
Its very easy to use and we stay anonym!

*comment if you need another time/day*

EDIT: **JOIN US RIGHT NOW **",pickup
Your best 3 products that changed your life.,As a beginner im currently going the David Tians Invincible as my biggest enemy is my own mind and limiting beliefs. Im wondering what your 3 best products that changed your life or given you the best results. ,pickup
TIPS (info) - Applying 'dancing' in the game,"Hey guys 😀 
I want to make some subjects clear about apply dance moves while picking up girls...
I'm a professional dancer (multiple styles), so I'll let you know what I learn from my experience:

1. The 95% of girls you'll meet has no idea of how to dance in couple... actually the 85% of them has no idea how to dance at all. They just do shitty moves randomly. And I mean night game (clubs, pubs, bars, etc.), in day game the odds are worst.

2. Knowing how to dance will give only two things (in outer game): attraction and physical escalation. Those 2 things become almost too easy in night game when you know a lil bit about dancing. BUT, those are the only 2 things that you'll get with dancing.

3. If you are VERY lucky you'll see another male that knows some moves in night game, but most of the time you (if you wanna learn) will be the only one in the place (unless you are in a place where dancers meet). So, you'll always feel special.

4. Dancing it's only an attribute, like having a good body by working out, or to be a wise person by studying. So this ability alone will NEVER get you the girl, unless a good dancer is her fetish.

# **RECAP:** 

Dancing is optional, you don't need it to pick up girls, but it'll give you benefits. Like stand out in the dance floor, impress her with your cool physical escalation (day or night game), girls open you, dancing storytelling, music is your 'alcohol', physical manipulation, posture, presence, etc. BUT, if you combine it with a good game (inner game, calibration, pick up knowledge, having fun, etc), you can be able of easily makeout with girls fast and without talking at all (if you want, of course).

# **TIPS:** 

- Do not seek to be a great dancer... don't waste your time. Go for the basics, with a lil bit of knowledge you'll get all that you need to pick up girls while dancing. 

- If you really wanna learn, focus your attention in this 3 styles: Salsa, Bachata, and Hip Hop (or Reggaeton is good too). Their BASICS. With girls you don't need jazz, ballroom, tap, axe, disco, etc. So focus in those 3.

&gt; **_Salsa:** will teach you how to move her arms, spin her, get her far or close to you. A lot of arm tricks to have fun.

&gt; **_Bachata (sensual bachata):** will teach you how to manipulate her torso, her hips, her head, her legs. How to dance close to her (stuck) and how to dance behind her (lean on her).

&gt; **_Hip Hop:** will teach you hot moves (energetic and smooth ones), while you dance alone or while you are dancing with a girl. And it'll make you stand out a lot in dancefloor (great for visual contact with girls + open). You can even dance sexy hip hop (with hot music) to make girls scream for you, or turn on her with your moves before sex. Like in the Magic Mike XXL movie (it's all hip hop only, masculine style).

- In daygame you can show her moves to have fun and build conection, they always laugh a this. And it's a good excuse to go physical with her.

- YouTube is your friend bro 😎 Don't look for dancing programs, unless you love dancing. With youtube you got all that you need and more. But, REMEMBER you don't need to know about music, rhythm or tempo, girls (most of them) don't know shit about that... So your only job is to copy the moves that you like, the 'dancing tricks'. There is a lot of channels that will help you with this. For example...

# **LINKS (youtube):**

- This is Salsa ➡ /watch?v=L1_2m5di-B0

- Learn Salsa ➡ /channel/UCulIPhX8Jyz2FnT8AeMR08g

- This is Bachata ➡ /watch?v=2DMML6fELNU

- Learn Bachata ➡ /channel/UCDaU7nrRVQi0oeqvnE5bb2g

- This is Hip Hop ➡ /watch?v=IQYyDtzmPB0

- this too ➡ /watch?v=FE7z-yzSFDA

- Learn Hip Hop ➡ /user/DanceTutorialsLIVE

There is a lot of good dancers teaching for free in youtube. Search dude!! Choose some moves, practice with somebody if you want (friend, mother, sister, your wingman, your dog, whatever) and go out there to have fun!!!

Hope I've been a lil helpfull... I'll answer any question, so ask freely.

###Have fun!!

P.S.: My english isn't the best so, sorry for my grammatical errors 😅
",pickup
[REQUEST] PRODUCT,"Does anyone have this course?

http://www.artofthepickup.com/aotptt/

Does anyone pass me this course? Or do I buy this course

http://www.artofthepickup.com/aotptt/",pickup
[HELP] How to become an advanced guy,Hey guys i was wondering what are the steps that you took to become an advanced pua?,pickup
Justin Wayne vs RSD Todd Valentine,,pickup
DAYGAME PHONE GAME -With Ryan from 4 Week Natural (DGPG HYPE VIDEO),,pickup
How To Pickup Girls On The Train - Full Daygame Infield Breakdown + Textgame Example,,pickup
Who do you like and why?,"Hi i am interested, who in PU industry do you watch/like the most and why? ",pickup
6 Common Community Pickup Lines That Suck (ex rsd immersion Coach)(Girlschase Writer),,pickup
Transformation mastery,I watched Transformation mastery but i couldn't know how to apply what julien said to my life can someone explain more?,pickup
LSE Girls,"Hi, did any of you ever dealt with low-self-esteam girls (with low sexdrive) ... what are experiences/thoughts/tips on this topic? ",pickup
State of this Subreddit,"Quick recap: Subreddit had a small, loyal following. Subreddit was closed (locked/banned). Subreddit inexplicably returns with moderators /u/TheKrooth and /u/onlyaskredditonly. There was a post up for ages with many of the original pickup users asking for it to be unlocked. Krooth manages to get with [one post?](https://www.reddit.com/r/pickup). Aside from getting into arguments with the mods at /r/pickuptorrents, and posting in anime/movie/news threads, I'm not sure what exactly your credentials are. 


I want to start a discussion about the content posted to this subreddit. I think every other post seems to be advertising for someone's PUA course. None of this feels inline with the old subreddit's values and ideas. I can't be the only one who sees this for what it is right?

[This](https://www.reddit.com/r/pickup/comments/qwyd6/pam_the_approach_101_the_walk_up_pama101_twu/) is good content. This is the kind of thing that made this subreddit worth visiting. [This] (https://www.reddit.com/r/pickup/comments/ri4hp/tome_of_knowledge_part_2a_mechanics/) too.

Let's take a look at [some](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=kXtvZo895pE) of [the](https://youtu.be/Nms88qLohQ4) recent content [posted](https://www.reddit.com/r/pickup/comments/603wfm/rsd_products/?st=j0moxzuh&amp;sh=9f092245). 

Maybe there are some of you from the old days still around who understand where I'm coming from. Krooth yes, I may sound a little pissed off that you've taken a forum intended for honest communication amongst men and turned it into seductionv2.0.

",pickup
Manwhore Latest content review on his Monthy Membership,"When it first came out I posted a review on the stuff on here. 

https://www.reddit.com/r/seduction/comments/5of8ux/checked_out_manwhores_membership_thing_its_pretty/

Here's the updated content. I'm gonna put the title of the content then my thoughts. The first following are 3 pieces of content in one thought. 

**Myth Buster: Are “Religious” or “Good Girls” Harder to Pickup?**

**Advanced Strategy: Balancing Logistics vs Escalation**

**How To Handle Amogs Like A Boss &amp; Steal Their Women**

Not anything brand new I haven't learned through experience, though would have been helping to know earlier on in my journey. BUT I have a TON of experience going out. So I'd imagine the wow factor for most people would be much higher for this content, because it is very insightful and very accurate information that I got from crystallizing a ton of experiences. 

Loved the story/field report he told in the amog video. Overall these were great to see, even if it's stuff I figured out, it gets more solidified when a guy with Manwhore's authority can sign off on it. 

**Text Convo: Model “10” Gets Flown Around The World For Photo Shoots**

This one I learned a bit more from. A learned a bit more about how to talk/text in a way that's high status, and engaging without being accommodating. 

**Text Game Manual: “Reengagement Game”**

This was great to read. It's stuff I already noticed about Manwhore's textgame from his other texts. Cool to see him explain what he's doing. A lot of his text stuff you can apply to real life verbal game. ie "" come up with funny little arrogant statements about myself, or how my day happens to be going"". I guess this is 'cocky funny'? Most of the stuff I seen about it just seems lame to me. I can actually see myself using Manwhore's structures and even specific lines. 

**Approaching: Assuming Power &amp; Respect**

This one was pretty great. It's about how girls have an initial fear when they're first approached. He gets deep into the psychology and emotion of what the girl is feeling when they're first approached. It definitely pushed the envelope of my understanding of this topic, and it will have an effect on how I'll handle any initial awkwardness I have on the open. At this point of my journey, deeper understandings of their emotion and psychology have a bigger effect than any technique, because if I know what's going on, I can adapt to the situation. So this was one of my more favorite videos. 

**Advanced LMR: When Girls Go “Cold” Or Unreactive.** 

Like the approaching assuming power/respect video I reviewed above, he goes into the emotions/psychology into what a girl is thinking/feeling/assuming when she goes cold. I ***think*** he could have gone more in detail like he did with the approaching video . . . or, that's all there is to her mind in those situations. 

But in times when she's being cold on purpose, I have an itch that there's more to it than her just testing if you're one of those guys who 'knows whats up' or is 'doubting himself'. Not that this is wrong, but I have a feeling there's some more layers to this or perhaps a more elegant explanation. Or, maybe that's all there is to it. 

**Manwhore MiniManefesto.**

I thought it was great. I mentioned before that Manwhore has a unique schema of game principles, just like any top Game coach. And it was great to hear them in manifesto form. I sorta backwards engineered his schema from reading all of his other content. 

That being said, he definitely has the juice to make a huge manifesto like Pimp, Jeffy Show, Boss, etc. 

**1st Date Lay Text Convo: Girl Calls Him A “Player”**

Best for last. I was very very impressed. It's been a long time where my mind was significantly rewired from PUA material. I've read it 3 times. This wasn't Manwhore btw, this was one of his students. 

While he was doing some very layered, balanced and accurate stuff in being firm in his principles and not being emotionally effected. . . . he was doing what I interpreted as being needy and try-hard. For example he texted a ton more than she did. I would have imagined the girl would have interpreted this as try hard. I had to rewire in my mind the true dynamics of the situation. 

He was being honest and expressive, and it's just that it took a lot of text to convey that, because he's an intelligent person. 

So yes, 'my mind was blown'. PUA material does a true rewiring of me maybe 2x a year. Most of the rewiring experiences happen from my own experiences in the field. So very impressed in the rare instances a pickup material can do that to me. 

**BONUS Review.** 

**Manwhore's seminar with Sasha Daygame.**

This isn't in Manwhore's monthy thing, this is from a Sasha Daygame product that was guesting Manwhore. 

This is bit premature because I listened to it in the car but manwhore was giving a lot of physical escalation techniques that you needed to see. But it was good stuff. For example, he mentioned the number one eye contact mistake guys make, that I've never seen mentioned anywhere else. And it's perplexing to me because it's the most common mistake. Why has no one else mentioned it yet? Disclaimer these days I mostly look at RSD's stuff, and sometimes Love Systems and Alex Socials, tho back in the day I looked at everything. 

As someone who goes out a lot sometimes I get perplexed when I hear when RSD instructors have trouble coming up with new content. It's like hello, there's a ton of stuff you can mention. Manwhore seems to be the only guy who seems to be mentioning this shit. 

",pickup
SHOCKING DAYGAME INFIELD COMPILATION! - Daygame Phone Game Official 4WN SAGA Trailer (DGPG 4 of 5),,pickup
Starting to game,"Hey folks, figure the front page of the internet is the best for this 

Been wanting to start my game but my sticking point has always been approach. Once ice is broken i dont find many issues (or ones i know of yet) but making that initial move seems to be my hardest piece. 

I feel i'm typically making the mistake of going for women off on their own, but approaching groups feels tremendously difficult 

Looking forward to any advice for this newbie.",pickup
The World of Tinder &amp;amp; Dating Apps: Phone Game Guide w/ SEANY! - DGPG (3 of 5),,pickup
Why You Should Wait Before Approaching Women - Social Calibration,,pickup
The 4 Week Natural: Official Daygame Insights After Going Out 6 Weeks Straight!,,pickup
How To PERMANENTLY Cure LONELINESS | The Solution No One Told You About,,pickup
DAYGAME PHONE GAME Live Stream Webinar w/ALEX! (4 DAYS TO GO),,pickup
Fast seductio,anybody knows or has similair products like the shogun method/ nlp seduction/Fast seduction etc and can share?,pickup
State,"Hey guys, 
I've been going out for a time now.
But because of lack of sleep and waking up after few hours and can't sleep i can't even be in a normal state to meet girls. And my verbal game has been the worst i have ever known like i literally don't know what to say ussually and i feel a sence of stress like the girl will leave me any moment or it won't go anywhere . Didn't have sex for 3 weeks. I don't wanna bang a fatty haha. I also seem like i put way to high standards for myself maybe thats why. I can flirt a bit but nowhere near what i could have done in last year and made rapport in a few mins really deep now it's different. Any advice tips? I am watching allot of theory at the moment to learn everything again. ",pickup
This has helped me to get more in the now and be in a sense of abundance,,pickup
RSD Products,"Hi guys, 
do you think its ok to ask for 600$ for their programms and stuff?
I watched them and they are really good but 600 bucks? ... well ... ",pickup
Ask Alex Anything Is BACK! - DAYGAME Edition!,,pickup
"We understand we're getting some traffic from /r/pickuptorrents, but no posts just about getting Karma. Participate in discussions like a normal person.",,pickup
THE 4 WEEK NATURAL EXPERIENCE -With Ryan (MEETS A STUNNING GIRL ON THE WAY HOME!),,pickup
Transformation Mastery Megathread,,pickup
Ex-Rsd Immersion Coach Teaches You The 6 Fundamentals Of Seduction,,pickup
Welcome new users!,We're about to go BIG,pickup
Will GIRLS Make You HAPPY? Honest Advice From A Long-Time Pickup-Artist,,pickup
4wN Interview Series: Alex's RSD Origin Story &amp; How Alex Got Into Pickup - Alex Interview Part III,,pickup
Tinder : Most IMPORTANT TRICK to getting Matches REVEALED,,pickup
(Infield RAMPAGE- Pulls + CLOSES) How To INSTANTLY Pull Hot Girls With Your Wings,,pickup
How do you keep a conversation going?,"I always have the hardest time keeping conversations going and keeping whoever I'm taking to engaged in the conversation. Do you guys have any tips or advice to not seem so boring? 

I've been dating this girl for around 6 weeks now and it's safe to say we have just about everything possible in common. During the first month we talked nonstop, but now it seems that we exhausted a lot of the common ground and conversation has become much less frequent. Because of this, I'm having a hard time figuring out what to talk about to her interested. Hopefully this is normal...",pickup
How To Prevent A Breakup,,pickup
Why You Get Rejected So Harshly By Women and What To Do..(former rsd coach)(girlschase writer),,pickup
The BIDEN Method,,pickup
Exclusive Alex Interview Part II - Tai Lopez &amp; RSD,,pickup
The Two Types Of PUAs (which are you and what does it mean?),,pickup
[POV] The Shocking Truth About Seduction - PUA &amp; Depression,,pickup
Stop Trying To Control Girls - LET GO! (Drop Your Expectations),,pickup
"This is HILARIOUS, pussy talk",,pickup
How To Have A Bad Breakup and Be Unaffected,,pickup
Simple Solution To Respond When Someone Asks For Nude Pictures,,pickup
"Become A Workaholic Effortlessly (look how many vids I've posted on r/pickup alone, this is why i have drive)",,pickup
The 4 Week Natural Mission Statement,,pickup
How To Stop Cockblocks..FOREVER,,pickup
Triple The Amount Of Girls You Take Home By Doing THIS - One Simple Trick To Do TONIGHT,,pickup
Why Daygame Is Amazing For Connecting With Women - Where Daygame Trumps Nightgame + Infield,,pickup
Exclusive Interview: EXPOSED! The Real Reason Why Alex Left RSD,,pickup
"lol, this guy is so different than the PUA guys. Fucking helpful",,pickup
Ok guys,"Im really in desperate need for advice. 
A few months ago a friend invited me to have a shisha with him and when I agreed I found out theres two of his buddies. A girl, and a guy. 
The conversation was mildly entertaining and I kept it all running, had like 80 percent of the speaking time and well. It got me bored. So I flirted with that girl. Alot. Within 5 minutes we spoke about practicing deep throat with a banana and dicksizes and shapes. In the car of my buddy I touched her (under the radar. Cause the other two who know her longer). She liked it and we had a real good time.
Turned out that she was together with my friend but they both never slipped a tone. I didnt even know he HAD a girlfriend. 

So I took back the action, he was pissed. Of course. And well she didnt really care.
We met up another day, without him and I noticed that she really was into me but I didnt make a move. Because its friends girl and I respect him.

Suddenly she didnt response immediately anymore. Her answer took days now, and were very short. 
I thought to myself ""Ok its better for her because I dont wanna destroy their thing"".
But she was really unsatiafied with him, as she told me earlier.
So I broke up the contact and then, after two weeks, she came at me ""Hey its me lets get a drink"".
I tried to shoot her down bit she said ""Im sorry. Ill make it up by paying for you!"" How could I refuse now? Especially after breaking up the friendship to him because I realised we only met 3 times and hes quiet and boring as hell.

So we met up, talked a short amount of time and when she showed me her bra I just knew it. She wants my cock deep inside of her.

Made out. Went to my place. And just when I stood fully naked infront of her half naked ass she was like ""I .. I cant do this. Im so very sorry!"". I said ""ok"", got my boxershorts and just comforted her with her decision. She was still together with him. 
Heres the first point; was this the right way to seduce her? I dont care about her broken relationship anymore. I just wanna fuck her.
What can I do if she reconsiders in the last minute? 

So she wrote me that shes really overthinking her relationship and she empathized a couple times that ""we will see again"". But without making a clear decision.
I smoke cigars and I gave her one of my tubos, which is the perfect dildo, and she offered me to write when shes using it. I refused by the way. To show her that I wont go any further with her until she chose me over him. Because she cant do both. (Not that I would care, but she does).

Next day she asked me how I imagine it with us. I explained it to her and she told me then she broke up with him and when I texted her she always smiled. She really, really was attracted.
So we planned a date 3 days later but werent auite sure how busy she would be. (No excuse. I know her reason weeks before). She was supposed to tell me today if yay or nay.
She didnt write me so I asked her around 8pm whats up with tomorrow. And her answer was shes sick.

I somewhat lost it because a girl already flaked today and I thought its a safe fuck with her.
I wrote (doh) her that I knew shes just flaking, because if she wanted to she would come anyways. 
And shed be flaking because I didnt give her enough time to get to know me. That would be the real reason. And all that stupid stuff.

But midway through, after she was pissed, I agreed to be overreacting and that I had a bad day. And that we reschedule the date. Simple as that. She agreed, but was really short on words again.

Now I sit here and dont know if I should forget her, shouldve pulled through with the rage cause Im right or if theres still hope. 
And what I still can do now to benefit my situation. (If theres anything).",pickup
Denton Dating - The New Era Of Seduction,,pickup
6 Signs A Girl Is Cheating On You,,pickup
The Deadliest Style Of Game/How To Look Like You Never Get Rejected,,pickup
Is it a sin to have oneitis?,"I was pondering this the other day, as oneitis seems to be beneficial in terms of baby rearing.

Oneitis seems to get a lot of hate though, so I wanted to hear the opinions of others.",pickup
How long does it take to get result in pickup,"I been going out for 6 months. I mostly do daygame because I am under 21. I been going out 5 days plus a week. I got like 6 or 7 instant date and 3 day two date . I haven't got any lay. Today I went out and totally feel like shit. I was thinking what was the point of all of this. Is this gonna ever work out for me. Is this a waste of my time. I felt very negative today. I also heard Julien say every 6 months 80% of people quit game. Any help , recommendation or advice would highly appreciate! 🙂",pickup
"WHAT DO YOU WANT?! (Question time, bitches)","What are your goals? What is it you want to achieve through /r/pickup? What are you struggling with? What are your pain points? What is it that you ultimately want? 

...Time for some real talk.

***Not to be confused with ""real talks."" @.@***",pickup
Tinder game,"Yo boys, what's good? Does anyone have any advice for someone failing to use tinder? I don't seem to get any further with it than a few messages back and forth. If anyone remembers these links:

https://www.reddit.com/r/pickup/comments/r2z0u/player_approved_methods_compendium/?ref=search_posts

Does the same apply here? Been out of this a while and feel like I've lost all my mojo, man.",pickup
One Thing That Will Get You Women (and everything else)(hey again guys!),,pickup
The Cure To Approach Anxiety,,pickup
5 Things You Can Do To Reach Pickup Mastery Faster,,pickup
The Secret To Getting In The Zone Consistently (Hey again guys!),,pickup
Club game: help me,"Posted to the other subreddit but didn't get much of a response. Whole place seems full of wannabes and total beginners.

2017 is the year I I actually learn to pick up women in clubs. That's what I want to do this year, probably as part of a larger self-improvement program, but I want to get the club thing down. I'm pretty good looking, I actually like dancing, but I have absolutely no clue when it comes to club pickup - the process, what/how to do, what to be aware of, etc. Really just flying blind when I go clubbing.  That being said, I'm a quick learner, and with some pushing I could learn this skill. People with actual skills hmu. My location is the Boston area.",pickup
Confidence program,What is the best confidence program,pickup
Sociopathic Vs Empathetic (hey again guys!),,pickup
"Spinning (The Road To Riches, Keys To The Kingdom and To Getting Lucky)",,pickup
The Three Stages To Pickup Mastery,,pickup
Anyone in South Florida?,,pickup
"My ""Absurd"" Views On Text Game (hey guys/hmu with any questions))",,pickup
Infield / Breakdown (an ex-RSD immersion coach + currently a Girlschase writer) If Im posting too much let me know.,,pickup
Me Taking A Girl Home From A Club and Breakdown,,pickup
How To Read Peoples Minds (former RSD Immersion Coach),,pickup
Remember boys...,"It's not what you get them, or what you do for them...

It's all in how you make them feel!




If she is after material things, you found yourself a gold digger.",pickup
Discussion on bitch butterflies,I know most of us have experienced social anxeity lets talk about how to get over it,pickup
How to save a dying relationship: Appreciation vs Expectation,,pickup
Would It Be Awkward To Pursue This?,"There's a girl at my university I've wanted to ask out all semester but sadly I don't even know her name. She's in a class right before mine so I can't get to know her that way. I approached her a few weeks ago and basically said ""Hi, I'm TA2690. I was wondering if you'd like to join me to grab lunch in the University Center here or something sometime"". That's actually the first time I've ever done anything quite like that so it was pretty unnerving, but I don't think I came across too poorly or anything.

I'm honestly not sure on her reaction, she basically said ""oh thanks, I'm actually going to the library right now"" but I don't actually have any answer from that and in my inexperience I guess just kind of said oh okay well let me know if you'd like to some time. Honestly I was pretty nervous so I don't know that I can accurately draw much from any of that.

I've made a point to smile and say hello in passing a few times beforehand but that's about it. How would you approach this? I only have one or two class meetings left this semester so I feel like I need to at least ask again but I can't tell if that was a polite no thanks or if she was just taken aback. Looking back on it, it feels more awkward now though, especially since I'm not sure how to approach it a second time. I'm thinking the best thing to do might be to just give her a note with my number on it and leave it at that.
",pickup
How to pick up girl when she's with her twin sister,"I really want to talk to this girl since a long time (something like 2 years now). But when I have the opportunity to do this, she's always with her twin. Any advice? (and motivation) :p",pickup
How to Make A Woman Laugh: Simple Strategy,,pickup
This sub is officially back online under new leadership,,pickup
A story from 1931 - this shit is nothing new boys,"I want to share with you motherfuckers a story about Dr. Albert Ellis, basically the godfather of all types of behavioral/cognitive therapy.

[click here, and forget that shit up top for now. scroll down, and read the part below ""The origins of REBT.""](http://www.rebtnetwork.org/ask/may06.html)

This shit went down in 1931. IN NINETEEN MOTHER FUCKING THIRTY ONE THERE WAS A SLEAZY AWKWARD SEX OBSESSED JEWISH KID WITH GLASSES DOING COLD APPROACHES IN NEW YORK CITY.  (y'all g0ts 2 L0vE dEm fyy1ne gr8 dePr355IoN DyMe$.) Shit doesn't change much does it? Now, imagine if Albert had the resources you have today. Imagine if he had the internet, if he had this subreddit. Imagine if he would have gone with the PAM approach.

Just so you know, Albert went on to be quite the horndog throughout his life, studying sex, working with alfred kinsey, writing a book called ""sex without guilt,"" having multiple long term relationships. (Wiki him if you please.) So I think his little experiment did exactly what he wanted it to.

One can only assume that his professional and personal interest in this subject was driven by his frustration as a younger man. The point being is that your frustration with your life up to this point, combined with your extreme will to change, is going to result in something pretty fucking powerful. You're probably going to end up having healthier relationships and a more fulfilling sex life than joe schmo from high school who could get girls then. You're going to learn how to make yourself face your fears, to make yourself do things that are hard, which will transfer to all areas of life. One day, you are going to be thanking your lucky stars you were a 23 year old virgin.

Some pickup dudes will talk about how cold approaching isn't that great and at the end of the day you'll meet more girls through social circles. They're missing the point. COLD APPROACH IS **THERAPY.** And it's better therapy than sitting on that musty old couch, too. You are doing something 99% of the population, male *and female*, is afraid to do. Besides the obvious benefits of cold approach (hitting on that girl right then), it is going to train your brain to ignore your fears and allow you to get a girl through your social circle, whereas you may have been afraid to make a move before. And it's going to train your brain to take the steps necessary to go get the job you've always wanted, to live where you've always wanted, to do what you've always wanted, to *be* what you've always wanted.

TL;DR - Approach dime today, conquer world tomorrow.",pickup
BETA TESTING THIS WEEK: PUBLIC POSTING,"I am lifting the approved poster system for the week. We'll see how it goes, in the instance that shit gets FUBAR, I will approve any and all posters that contribute thoughtfully over the course of the beta. Obviously, anyone previously approved will maintain that privilege.

&lt;3xmp ",pickup
Mandeer checking in with a minor insight: Eye contact,"so i've been out for a while getting my life in order.  i've been working through projects i've had set aside for summer, and preparing to play guitar at a wedding at the end of the month.  i've ducked out of irc, because i've been pretty depressed and i was focusing on helping other people as a way to avoid my own problems.

anyway.  i'll be back soon, and i've got a few submissions planned that should be moderately helpful.  i still haven't read a single one of the new submissions from the manventure crew.

i was doing sound for a business presentation this morning, and there was a very pretty lady in her 20s on the panel.  we were both working, and no real opportunities presented themselves, as i was supposed to be out of sight, and she was supposed to be in front of people.

in any case, i've got razor burn and a few ingrown hairs from being overzealous with a shave 2 days ago, and i'm not feeling particularly baller.  add to that that she's wearing business attire, and i'm wearing the embroidered polo shirt, universal uniform of the service underclass.

after the event, i was sitting in the booth, and presenters were coming back to pick up their bags. she was the only person that avoided any sort of eye contact with me, and when we did make eye contact, it was sort of sidelong.  she smiled nervously, grabbed her bag, and hightailed it.

**SO WHAT ARE YOU GETTING AT, BRO?**

i have in the past interpreted refusal to make eye contact as rejection.  this, even though i have a hard time making eye contact.  the way i compensate for my difficulty make eye contact while conversing is by making strong eye contact early.  if someone doesn't match me, i feel rejected.

what i realized is that if i were a fat old guy, she would've made eye contact.  if i were a woman, she would've made eye contact.  if i were a puppy, she would've rubbed her titties all over me.  **the only reason she didn't make eye contact is because i'm threatening to her.**  this doesn't necessarily mean she's attracted to me, and it doesn't necessarily mean that she would ever end up sleeping with me.  feeling threatened can mean many things.  in this case, i believe it was attraction, because of how she reacted to the eye contact.  but in any case, avoiding eye contact is not rejection, it's acknowledgement that you hold power.

**TL;DR: much like weaker prison inmates, women avoid eye contact because making eye contact at the wrong time might get them shanked.  don't feel rejected.**

**ASSUME ATTRACTION**

**ALSO, DON'T BE AN ASSHOLE**",pickup
[MECHANICS] ::XMP HANDSHAKE INDUCTION PLAY-BY-PLAY BREAKDOWN::,"YO! Most of you have already seen the [XMP Handshake Induction](http://www.reddit.com/r/pickup/comments/uxjgm/infield_manventure_xmp_handshake_induction/)--now it's time to break it down into the raw mechanics. I'm going to dig deep into the surprisingly robust fundamentals of what's happening in this short minute-long clip.

---

**0:00 - 0:06** - The first thing happening here is that xxxmoneypower is controlling space and attention by swinging his backpack at mrgold. This gets the attention of everyone within the immediate vicinity, and is relatively toading as it is. Next, XMP addresses the girl that we will call Hannah, asking for something simple and easy to respond to--her name. Notice that it isn't offered as a question, but more of a command, a lead.

**0:07 - 0:12** - Britney immediately offers her hand, which is a plus--chick is outgoing. XMP takes it, and Britney tries to get XMP's name--""Benzel?"" Even though this is wrong, XMP agrees and amplifies by nodding and confirming, ""Benzel!"" He continues to nod throughout the exchange while they try to figure out his name, until he finally says his real name--note that when he tries to correct her, there is a slight pattern interrupt as a headshake interspersed into the nods. This agreeing is a quick way to enter into rapport--yes, yes, yes, yes. Yes, Benzel! My name is XMP. There's something else occurring here--notice the pattern of the handshake. I'll touch on that again soon.

**0:13 - 017** - There's a lot happening in this segment. ""Why are you still holding my hand?"" XMP does a classic handshake induction where he calls attention to the fact that they're still holding hands, but he puts it on her--planting the seed that there's a particular reason she's still holding his hand. Britney mirrors him--""Why are you still holding *my* hand?"" XMP comes forward and puts a hand on Britney's arm at **0:14** and then tries to ""pull away""; what's really happening is that as he pulls, XMP is the one not letting go. Britney immediately mirrors again, doing the touch that he had just placed: putting both hands into the handshake. With this go-sign, XMP brings his hand back. Notice again the pattern of the handshake--throughout the exchange so far the pattern has been shake, stop, shake, stop, shake, stop. Patterns are arbitrary, but once they're built, humans tend to look for them in an exchange. The pattern sets up a sequence during which someone is suggestible because they are naturally following the pattern, even if unconsciously--here the pattern is physical, with motion, cessation, motion, cessation, or 1, 0, 1, 0, 1, 0, or on, off, on, off, on, off.

**0:18 - 0:21** - So far, Britney has taken up the pattern and is actually doing it on *her* side herself--probably unconsciously. When the pattern breaks, the next beat is effectively the *insertion point* for a suggestion or embedded command. He says something about support--hard to hear, but he's basically relating the handshake to some kind of support (which Britney repeats back to him as well). Then, he says, ""Don't let go."" This relates the two ideas--support to not letting go, and allows them to stay there because the subtext has been stated, ""Don't let go, this is support."" Then, XMP does something incredibly powerful--beginning to roleplay. He says, ""I missed you.""

**0:22 - 0:24** - Bam! Britney immediately plays along, saying, ""It's been so long."" Roleplay is *ridiculously* powerful because the other party essentially has to play along, or break rapport. The sexual frame previously thus far has been subtle, but this directly underlines it--a romantic story wherein two people are uniting. This also has the purpose of acting as a time distortion, unconsciously setting the two up as if they're reuniting--as if they've known each other for a very long time. By acting out this fantasy, it becomes an unconscious reality.

**0:25 - 0:26** - The power of this interaction is apparent-- Britney fake-sobs ""Never leave me again!"" and pulls XMP into a hug. XMP, of course, immediately escalates and pulls her in as well, agreeing and amplifying and fake-sobbing as well.

**0:27 - 0:34** - Just hug duration with some pats--but the slight turning of the hug as well as the pats take on the 1, 0, 1, 0, 1, 0 pattern--or turn, still, pat, still, turn, still, pat. She's picking up part of the pattern as well with the pats at regular intervals.

**0:35 - 0:38** - What's happening here is interesting--XMP himself signals that the interaction is over, always leading: ""All right, I feel better already--all right, I feel good."" He begins to pull away, while shaking his head. The head-shake serves to punctuate the interaction as opposed to slowly sliding away with emotionally ambiguous connotations--he intentionally ends the interaction and caps it off with the headshake. It's also important that it is a headshake because he subtly communicates that *pulling away = bad*--it's negative to pull away. It would be counter-productive to pull away and nod your head--yes, yes, pull away! It should be no, no, no pulling away. Of course, Britney immediately jumps in to hug again, shouting ""No!"", which has been led from the head shake. She verbally mirrors XMP's non-verbals. This is also known as physical transliteration. She is translating the script of the interaction into verbalized audio.

**0:39 - 0:44** - More patterns--switching up side-to-side motion and turning. In addition to the toading quality of the pattern, the other important quality of this motion is that it puts Britney into a kinesthetic realm--instead of standing there, hugging, and eventually wondering why she's still arm in arm with a practical stranger, she's forced to pay more attention to the motion of her body and where she'll step next--it becomes more like dancing. Not only that, but it takes her out of that intellectual space and into how it *feels*--how it *feels* to hug, those *feelings* associated with hugging, and the unconscious subtext that *it feels good, doesn't it*, *I only hug people that I like*.

**0:45 - 0:50** - Here XMP turns the both of them around to face the camera and says with an upward inflection, ""Is this on film? This is on film!"" Even though both of them obviously know that they're being filmed, this intonation makes it a shared discovery, a way to connect the both of them even more within rapport. XMP says, ""We should make this really romantic--"" *deep hug* ""--Ay, Maria!"", pushing the sexual frame and roleplay story further. He explicitly points out, ""Like a Spanish soap opera.""

**0:51 - 0:55** - ""Anyways--"" --a verbal indication, capstone that the hug interaction is over. He pulls away and creates *huge* physical distance, which is the voidspace that makes a girl think--wait, what? Where did it go? What happened?, etc. Notice the very subtle headshake as well as he pulls away. ""I need more of those hugs,"" he says, as he looks at the camera. This *verbally* indicates the future and a desire, serves as an embedded command, but also takes the pressure of Britney to deliver as well as creating more voidspace because he's now giving direct attention to the camera instead of her. Then, he looks entirely away.

**0:56 - 1:02** - Same nonverbals, he makes a comment about getting wet while grabbing his chest area. This is obviously suggestive of breasts--and, well, getting wet, duh. Britney immediately picks up the sexual frame--""Oh, you got wet! Oooohh!"" XMP looks, then looks away and agrees and amplifies without looking at her. The interaction, and the toad, is complete.

**1:03 - 1:06** - XMP tells Dante to fuck off.

---

Hope you can get a lot of knowledge from this video and break-down--there's a ton of great shit happening all over the place. Keep it real.

*Dante*",pickup
IN-FIELD MANVENTURE: XMP Handshake Induction,,pickup
The magic of Touch... as our sticking points.,"Touch has wondrous effects on the human body and energies all around you.  
  
Touching someone in the right place will grant you access to a different state of mind without you ever having to open your mouth.  
Touching in a certain way will actually *send off* certain vibes about yourself, *from one finger through someone's entire body*, so that you'll be identified as either creepy, sexual, weak, or just friendly.  
Even just the energy you exhibit around yourself will find it's way to another person to help them determine what type of person you are. The way you motion yourself through the air when you walk through a crowded mall or when you're in a club or a dance opportunity will give off the vibe of whether you're an approachable person or whether you're just someone that wants to get down and dirty.  
  
Out of the five senses for the human body, touch is one of them. It shouldn't be a wonder why touch plays a huge part in daily interactions, to the point where if a baby is left untouched during his childhood, he will grow cold towards others and will likely outright *die.* That's some incredible stuff.  
  
Unfortunately, touch is a sticking point for me, as it is for many others. I've only recently picked up Savoy's Magic Bullets again to realize that I have a lot of the other steps solidified rather firmly. Touch is not part of that. My lack of touching nature can be seen in many other activities that I do.  
  
The time is now for me to improve on this slower brain process of mine. I have a lot of activities on my plate that involve touch that I'm at a roadblock with because I am not a touchy-feely individual.  
  
So I've really come here to ask when did you start noticing significant improvements in your kino game of any sort? I already know what to do to improve, but what did you do to really grow your sense of touch up and out of the dirt?",pickup
[FR] Reverse close on a flight,"First log, hoping for much more.

Off to a vacation/seeing relatives on island X and previously came off a connection flight in XYZ where a young kid almost threw up on me, though his mom had no choice but have full ""naked"" (both of our sleeves were high) arm to arm close touching/rubbing with me while I tried to sleep. Maybe it was the secret desire to know whether she was making a move, maybe it was the lack of sleep (the kid kept waking me up). But, the next flight I knew I was going *full-throttle outcome independent*, I wanted to land on the island feeling *good*.

------

**Summary:** Girl closes me by writing her email on my flight ticket before I decide to close her. What follows is me trying to recollect from memory because I forgot to write it down later and I'm starting to forget bits and pieces. Basically it's going to be really long &gt;.&lt;

-------

Sat in the airport waiting for the flight to go, doing a scan while eating a cinnamon roll. Leaned back on my seat taking in the full cinnamon goodness so my mouth is full of the roll, and I looked to the right.

HB 7.5 decides to look left at exactly the same time... *Nice dare_ious... &gt;.&lt;*, my mind echoes. She gives a nice smile realizing my current predicament o/\*\o O....k, let's approach this. *No dar_ious, let's not with your goddamn cinnamon face* So for the next few minutes I go into a mental battle with myself into getting me to go for it. During this time, big guy with big arms sits on the seat opposite her. 

*Glad, you listened to me dar_ious* Whatever arrogant mind, whatever.

Anyways, the flight is late by now so we are going to reach late at our destination. In the line still scanning HB 8 early 30's (a bit old for me but it's a solid 8!) asks what's my seat number. I've heard this before, she most likely has some guy nearby, I'm not even going to try. As it turns out she was looking to get seats for her and her husband together. &gt;.&lt;  
  
Not letting frustration get the better of me, I walk into the aisles on the plane and cooled it, *I'm going to sleep, then I can get a better start when I land* Normally, when I am going for my seat, a little hope is put into having a girl sit to next to me, a frustrated guy hope, I know, why should I care who sits next to me? I should add value to whoever sits next to me!  
  
So this time, I'm in confidence, outcome independent mode, I'm going to chat up which old chap or lady, whoever, is in the seat next to me. To my surprise, there I see an HB 7 reading her book, but I'm not aware enough to realize it and go straight into polite reserved mode.  
  
HB7: ""Oh, are you sitting there?""  
*She removes her bag from the seat*  
dare_ious: ""Yeah, but it's cool. You can have the window.""
HB7: ""Hmm, I'm sure we can share the window seat""
*/me No you didn't hear window seat, you heard window, you definitely heard window, refrain from making a comment about it*  
End up going into the window seat, and whip out PR, which I was reading prior to the cinna-incident. Start reading.  
HB7: ""Do you want some gum?""  
*She pulls out a pack of gum, and is about to the hand it to me*   
dare_ious: ""Oh no thanks...._incomplete_

Now, this *could* have been the end of conversation, I *could* have gone back to my book and then went to sleep after. But for some reason, the ""share"" line was still in my head.

Using the powers of #p, making sure to slow down the pace with which I talk

dare_ious: ""_incomplete_ You know, I know we just started this sharing relationship"" put hand on arm rest and move closer still keeping my stare in her eyes, ""but don't you think we are going a bit too fast? We haven't even shared the window properly."" *Smile, to near giggle*

She smiles and a mini-blush, appears

HB7: ""I think it's okay hahaha &lt;throws back a retort that I cannot seem to remember but it was good for me&gt;""

*Holy moneypower dar_ious, did that just work? o0*

I return a friendly comeback then we enter conversation for the rest of the flight (of which most I either don't remember or divulges too much of the dare_ious). Now here is some things I don't think I should have did

**The pull for personal info**

She asks about my high school grad ring then starts to ask about when I graduate which may lead to what school do I go, which leads to what do I want to work as, what I am currently doing. **Nope**. Something inside of me said not do this route and see how long I can maintain conversation without divulging information and thus making her pull for the source. It reached as far as me blocking her with my left side (yeah, I went for the childish approach, see how many years I can appear younger to her) when I wrote up my arrival form. Then she basically said, ""Alright, I'm HB and I'm 27 and go to X school"". Woah dar_ious she's in her late twenties. Having got this out of her, without asking for it explicitly, I think it was fair that I took off some of the mysterious behaviour. She ended up seeing my name on the form and *I think* my age. I'm not sure. May need some advice on this, I think she was hooked from the start so this may have ended up annoying her. Not sure.

**The book and setting the frame**

She is reading Fifty Shades of Grey and I'm reading PR. It doesn't get much better than that. I ask about the book, which I had no knowledge of before. She told me all of her friends were raving about it so she decided to get it, but so far she doesn't think it has a good plot. So I ask, ""What's the plot about?"" She cannot say. Going on the offensive, I take the book from her hands and read the back.

Okay, woah this book is *@_@*. Legit.

I say, ""Maybe, it's more interesting half way through""
HB7: ""Sure! how about we read it a random page?""

She cuts the book in two, and we watch the left page... let's just say there was enough @_@ going on in one sentence and they had a whole page of it. I feel like I'm on a tricycle. I should have used this situation better, and wasn't able to escalate based on the book in any way.

**Escalation and comfort**

Without a doubt she is comfortable around me, I kept making sure to speak from lower rather than higher up and moving in when it's something personal/comfortable we were talking about. Once the conversation reaches informational stuff (like I wonder when the flight is going to land, what's my book about? I still have no idea how to explain PR) I lean back and glance out the window a few times. Let's be straight about this, it was 3 hour a flight, keeping comfort and convo going was pretty hard for me. 

Basically throughout the flight our hands kept bumping up at the arm rest until it became apparent that it was no longer an accident. I did that thing where you pull the nose off of somebody when they are making fun of you, as well as checked her temp once when she full out blushed red for a mistake she said, that I caught her on. Held at the hand a few times, to prevent her from poking me (1st Circuit exercise 1 perhaps? I'm not sure, not knowledgeable enough in PR to know, but we were really comfortable with the play fights) But, the thing is, I don't think I was escalating the way the situation was literally flagging me down to do it. Advice on this?

**Timing**

Because of the lack of the escalation, I kept trying to maintain comfort with pacing, soft stares in her eyes and even sometimes letting her fill the space and look into her eyes when she goes on retort (So much so that it took me 30-45 minutes to finish my class of OJ &gt;.&lt;). Anyway, whatever it was, I knew she was in when at one point when I was asking about stuff to do on the island, she opens my book takes my flight ticket which I am using as a bookmark for PR to write her email address on it and says &lt;Actually, I am not going to make this up, I really don't remember what she said, my memory goes fuzzy here. It was something like ""well I saw your name so if you feel like messaging just send it there""... but as I said don't take my word for it. Memory goes fuzzy&gt;

-----

So the flight reaches in and it takes *forever* to reach the gate. She has a friend that has been waiting for over an hour. When we finally get off the plane, she speed walks... like olympic speed walk. So I'm there with my bags thinking, *You just had a great time flirting on that plane, let that go no matter how bizarre it may seem* Luckily, I talked to one of the guys in IRC and we straightened it out that she most likely didn't know what to do when we landed as well as the fact that her friend was waiting for a long time. (She did indeed say ""See you"" while we we're leaving the flight, I guess she didn't expect me to come off the plane at the same time since I was still packing up some stuff.

All in all it was a good flight and a good 3 hr flirt, now she's off on another island (it was some sort of a connection flight for her) so I doubt there will be any dates moving forward but I am going to keep in contact with her

What I am going to do now that I am on the island?

**PAM Beach approaches, with the hope that the ladies I approach don't have a guy or father anywhere near &gt;.&lt;**",pickup
Bad Dates and Online Dating,"In the past, I've openly criticized online dating based on little experience. So, I decided to try it. I still hate it and now I have actual experience to back up my dislike of the whole experience. The online dating experience is completely superficial and frustrating. I joined okcupid and created a profile. Even though my profile is consistently rated highly (meaning I'm one of the most attractive males on the website); I RARELY get messages. I've received one unsolicited message from a reasonable attractive female. 

So far, I've been on three dates with women from okcupid. My first date was with a cute, but overweight girl. blegh. Second date was with an attractive brunette, but we didn't click even after a second date. It was very awkward. Third date was with a reasonably attractive female who sent me a message. We had a decent date, but it wasn't good enough for me to contact her again. 

I'm going on one more date, but I've become convinced online dating sucks. Now, I have the real life experience to back up my prior opinion. 

TL;DR Online datings sucks. Trust me from recent, personal experience. Stick to #pickup techniques!",pickup
"London and UK/West Europe based #p users, let's meet up! ","Hello.

With the man venture crew trekking across the US right now, and many other American users looking forward to Sleezecon, I figure we Europeans need to start organising some events of our own.

I've chatted with a few other UK members on IRC, and acquired xxxmoneypower's blessing, so I propose a meetup in London to chat, approach dimes and generally have a hell of a time. Sounds good, yes?

---

Logistically, I haven't really made any plans. Obviously we'd need to come to an agreement on a date and a general plan. I propose something like this:

**Location:** Central London, not sure exactly where yet. Some of the more popular locations e.g. Oxford Street are quite saturated with PUAs so that can be either seen as a place to avoid or a challenge when you hear the dreaded ""oh not this again…"" from the lucky girl caught in your headlights.

**Date:** Any Saturday in July/August. Simply because it's a weekend, there are lots of people (read: dimes) about and the nightlife is booming. 

**Game plan:** 

* Meet at [some pub] between 1-2pm, introductions, group discussion  perhaps more exp. users welcome to talk for a few minutes on a particular topic - and general chitchat. 

* 3pm till 6-7pm, go to [some place] for daygame. Push each other into sets with PAM openers, offer feedback, advice and ultimately #-close all the things. 

* 7pm till 8pm/9pm, grab dinner together at [fuck knows where]. Discussion of how things went during day and chat about plans for the night. 

* 9pm - late, hit up a bar/club [which ones?!?!] or bounce between multiple locations, just pretty much improvise this part of the evening onwards. 

---

Ideally I'm looking for help from London based users in arranging this - as I live outside of it and am not completely familiar with the best spots to hang around. Those of you in other parts of the UK, or even Europe are completely welcome to attend, but you will need to make your own plans to get home, unless some other users don't mind letting you crash at theirs.

I am aware that some people may work during the weekend or have other commitments that they need to attend to, so we will leave a few contact numbers on the date and people will be welcome to drop in whenever they like. If you just want to daygame with us for a few hours, or maybe find us in a bar later in the evening, you're completely welcome to do that. 

Let me know what you think in the comments or via pm, would love to see a nice turnout to this and I know we have plenty of lurkers around these parts. 

",pickup
"If you tell yourself ""#pickup is just like every other PUA school of thought"", here's some feels for you to maybe begin to understand a little better.","This came from a reply to mandeer_ in another post and I feel like I should post a new thread. Here's some real feels for you guys because I don't talk much about them since it's mostly in the past.

Alright listen guys, before I got deeper into pickup and used mostly MM tactics combined my confidence/""inner game"" I had practiced building for a couple years, I relied on negging and pushing and pulling and all of that typical PUA shit to keep a relationship with someone I REALLY liked and who dug the MM type game to the maximum which was a lot of fun because I love teasing girls... but it didn't last with no real connection. 

I sometimes wondered how to talk to her about warmer more emotional things because she had a drunk for a father who treated her like shit when she did everything for him - I used to call her Cinderella sometimes because of this - amongst plenty of other things I could get into. But I didn't feel comfortable/felt out of place initiating that type of conversation after developing a relationship founded on games and beneath-surface yet not-so-deep level subjects/conversation. On top of that, I don't think I really even knew how. Instead of really asking her about her home life and how she felt about it the right way, I just gave her a nick name and made her laugh and had this illusion that the nick names I made for her gave us a deeper connection. Which they do, but not to the extent a relationship needs. Needless to say she eventually broke up with me.

She even told one of my friends I ""have no emotions"" a month or two after breaking up with me which was extremely eye opening, but not only that, devastating because she didn't even realize how devastated I was by the break up. I went out getting totally fucked up almost every night and trying to bang every chick above a 6 I could find and making sure she found out through the grape vine to make her jealous. It was terrible looking back on it. I was nearly a full blown alcoholic to be honest with you. It was stupid behavior for someone with as much psychological know-how as myself but just goes to show we can all fall prey to our emotions.

I knew I couldn't keep it up and it was clear she wasn't coming back - I even asked her to come back at one point and she sounded devastated by the question just by her tone of voice on the phone. We haven't really talked since. Eventually, I got myself back on track and got back into studying and not partying every single night.

I still use negging and play some games because I think it's fun, if you don't that's cool, but I do. But you CAN NOT RELY on that shit for a real relationship with somebody. You need to learn how to ask open ended questions, stay interested, LISTEN, use warm words, thread + associate, build connections, etc.

Go ahead and use MM and RSD and all that if you want. Yeah, you'll get laid - sometimes - I won't lie. But plan on having an **illusion** of knowing who you *really* are, a foundation for *getting* **some** girls but not *keeping* them, and extremely limited knowledge on how to make emotional connections with them.

If #pickup was anything like MM or RSD or whatever, I wouldn't be here today.",pickup
Hard times to make discussion.,"Hey /r/pickup, I kinda feel under the weather right now. Yesterday, I was with some friend at a show, and there was this extremely cute dreadlocks' girl. And I couldn't think of a thing to say.

I was smokin a bowl with a friend, she ask to take a little bit so of course I accepted. I almost automatically asked her name and started kinoing, but after that, I just froze out.

I could have asked what she was doing but that seemed pretty obvious (drink a beer and watch the show with their friends).

It always have been my main problem, and it still remains, I don't know what to say to people.

And that bother me a lot. Please, give me some advices, tips and tricks or other.",pickup
Why shy girls flake on you and how to succeed,"Long time no post. I just *tested* (got laid) a thought I've uttered in IRC before concerning shy girls. I don't remember who it was but this was the situation:
 
1. Shy girl clearly liked #p user
1. He tried to escalate
1. She panicked and left.
 
His idea was to freeze her out. This would've been totally wrong. Shy girls who react like that are in a stuck state where they can't make sense of their own emotions and sometimes it's just a simple lack of rapport. Ignoring her after this would be the exact **opposite** of what to do. I don't know what happened to the guy but I was in the same situation on my last date, here's how it worked out:
 
I kissed her, she reciprocated but got up and quickly left without saying a word. I text her ""Hey did I do something wrong? I really enjoyed our date and up until the end I thought you did too"". She texts back ""No it's me, sorry"". I call her, we talk about dem feels and basically lay it all out on the table. She was afraid to go ahead because as she said her ""mind was full of thoughts and she wasn't sure what I was after"". I told her my intentions (I like you and I would like to take this a step further) and told her I would be up for anything as long as she's comfortable with it. She said she was incredibly relieved and definitely wants to see me as soon as possible.

Fast forward to today, third date:
 
Her body language is a lot more open, we cook together, watch a movie, she cuddles up against me instead of sitting half a foot apart from me on the couch like she used to. Things escalate quickly to kissing, making out and we ultimately end up in my bed.
 
Repeat after me: Honesty fucking pays off.
 
Edit: **Please also read aypez post in the comments.**",pickup
Beginner Pattern Making,"Beginner Pattern Making:

https://docs.google.com/document/d/1mvAVGqOtXe-GwaCJRP1og-O4UjGyGtd8ba_tLMPdiF4/edit

This is a four page introduction to pattern making for anyone with a basic understanding of NLP as far as the following: tonality, pace of speech, and embedded commands. It's extremely detailed yet short/sweet/to the point. It includes only the basics to creating hypnotic language patterns. I'm hoping it will spark some interest in you, perhaps leading you to dive a little deeper into the subject.

Hope you all enjoy.",pickup
words of wisdom... from some tumblr blog from some chick i was talking to on okcupid,"I messaged some chick on okcupid who turned out to be a troll. She has a fake account in addition to her real one, and she baits dudes to send her crude messages then she puts them on a tumblr. My message was apparently 'good' enough for her to talk to me and tell me she's just trolling. Sort of questionable ethics, yes, but I talked to her for a while and she was actually kind of cool. I told her ""I'm not going to tell you to stop what you're doing but I am going to say a few things."" I told her about how bad a place most of those guys are in and how it doesn't excuse their behavior but it also is nice to have empathy for them.

But that's not the point, the point is this. I was looking at the tumblr and she wrote this a few weeks ago:

&gt;It is safe to say that the 2nd date with The Gentleman went well!  We went to a nice little Italian restaurant in the Lower East Side.  I got there early and waited at the bar.  He came in with an Avengers shirt on and just like last time, conversation came naturally.

&gt;Detailed story less detailed, he is hands down the best kisser I’ve ever kissed.  I mean, my ex became quite good, but only after a few months of me “training” him how to kiss without slobbering all over my mouth.  This guy, though.  I felt like fainting right there, his kisses were so good.

&gt;**Again, He was a perfect gentleman.  He let me know the effect I was having on him without being crude.  He didn’t push for sex, even though he made it clear that he wanted it.  He, once again, insisted on paying for everything.  He called me beautiful and awesome and cute.  He almost hit his head on a low-hanging sign because he was too busy looking at me.  He is most definitely living up to his nickname.**

&gt;We have plans for a 3rd date, which include a midnight showing of The Avengers and a Buffy marathon, so it should be fun!

I thought that post, especially the bold part, deserved to be reposted here.",pickup
"An Introduction to Submodalities: Using your mind's 
natural resources for fun and self-improvement","**FIRST:  Submodalities build on prior NLP techniques, in particular the “conscious input and output systems” as described in Sleight of Mouth and Monsters and Magical Sticks.  So if you haven't read those, this may not make any sense. Hell it may not make any sense even if you have, but here it is anyway!!!!**

We see, experience, and relate our experience of the world through several ""sensory **modalities,**"" mainly Visual, Audio, and Kinesthetic* as described in NLP and in books like Monsters and Magical Sticks. 

Sub-modalities are simply aspects of each modality. Some sub-modalities of audio could be volume, clarity, echo, nearby or far away, and so on. Some sub-modalities of visual could be, still frame compared to moving pictures, color or black and white, bright dark, flat or 3 dimensional, and so on.

What's interesting is that we experience audio, visual, and kinesthetic in our own minds. If I asked you to think about a cat, you might see a picture in your mind of a cat, you might hear it mewing, you might feel yourself stroking that pussy or having it rub against your leg. 

And at this point we can compare and contrast the sub-modalities of say, if I asked you to think about ""cats in general,"" or if I asked you to think about Mrs Snufflekiss, your aunt's old cat that you played with last year at Thanksgiving. The sub-modalities would be different, maybe the images of Mrs Snufflekiss would be brighter and moving {like a movie in your mind}, while the images of a generic cat might be blurrier or faded or still.**

So far that's cool, now let's start playing around with these ideas.

**Think of a pleasant memory,**  just for practice let's pick a pleasant one that doesn't have any particular feeling of self-worth attached to it***, like how excited you felt when you went to an amusement park or how much fun you had playing with your new pet corgi (a dog, for those who aren't familiar).  What modalities do you use to think of that corgi? Can you look at the sub-modalities? If you hear it barking in your mind, how ""near"" are the sounds? How loud? Clear? Fuzzy?  If you see the corgi in your mind, where are the pictures located in your mind's eye -- right in the middle, off to the sides, does it take up all of your vision?

After you identify some of the sub-modalities, can you modify them? Can you make the images brighter, clearer, larger, more colorful? Does that intensify the feeling of the moment? (Notice how changing the submodalities changes the intensity of your feelings. If you were to try this with a negative feeling, you'd notice the negative feelings increase when you brihgten up the modalities. Crazy isn't it?) 

So now we know what they are, and we can mess around with them, let's consider how to modify our beliefs with them.

**Think of something you know is absolutely true that has no emotional attachment to it, like ""The sun comes up every morning,"" or ""Breathing is good.""**  Notice the modalities and the sub-modalities you're using in your mind, in particular the placement in your mind's eyes, the quality of the images, and so on.

THEN, think of something that could be true.  Say you drink at Starbucks every morning, but there's a Dunkin Donuts in town. You COULD go drink there one morning. Compare the modalities and sub-modalities of this idea with the 100% true idea, like ""breathing is good.""  You may even want to write down a list comparing and contrasting the sub-modalities Again in particular, compare the position they hold in your minds eye

Then, you can try to quickly ""snap"" the ""could be true"" belief out of the ""could be true"" position and into the ""is true"" position. (I believe this is called the ""swish"" pattern of NLP? Don't know, it's fun though, you may be surprised at the results.)

**Reality Strategies**
I'm not going to get into detail on this because it's described in Sleight of Mouth, but basically the modalities we use for events that actually happened and made up\daydreams are different.  A cool idea I got from a book called Psycho-Cybernetics (about using visualization exercises to make ""synthetic memories"") and later heard again in the Adam Eason self-hypnosis books is to visualize events as you want them to play out, i.e. how you would like to act in social situations. I've used this to help me accomplish several goals in my life, it's also a lot of fun.

**Affirmations**

I'm really *not* an affirmations nut, but lately I've noticed results by using my inner voice to speak mind scripts\affirmations (""I'm feeling relaxed, comfortable, and so are they"" or whatever) in the same place I think the words ""Breathing is good."" 

**IN CLOSING:** 

These are just three different ways to use sub-modalities, there are many, many, many, many more. The only limits are the limits to your imagination. This is stuff that your brain is doing constantly, so why not use it to your advantage? 

Note 1: There are other modalities, like taste and smell, but it would seem they are relatively minor compared to ""the big three.""

Note 2: We all experience modalities differently. Your “true” beliefs could be still images, not moving pictures, for example. Don't judge your submodalities, by saying nonesense like “that can't be right, the things I don't believe should be black and white,” or whatever, just notice objectively how they play out in your mind.

Note 3: We, as people, tend to go for the examples that have our sense of self-worth attached to them, which is why we're encouraged to practice with things that we have no sense of self-worth attached to. Our self esteem usually isn't marred or built up by the fact the sun can come up, for example. 

Note 4: There are ways you can “use” other people's submodalities in sets and interactions, but it's something I'm still experimenting with. ",pickup
"#pickup: TheDukeDevlin &amp; Friends demonstrate 
some cold reading for fun.",,pickup
"Submit questions for Claude Steiner (Psychotherapist, Transactional Analysis expert and protege/contemporary of TOK2A author Eric Berne)","For those of you reading the [TOK2A](http://www.reddit.com/r/pickup/comments/ri4hp/tome_of_knowledge_part_2a_mechanics/), maybe you've hit up the books on Transactional Analysis (Games People Play, I'm OK - You're Ok, What Do You Say After You Say Hello?) and found a wealth of psychological information. It's really changed my viewpoints when it comes to the way people act and communicate with one another. Claude Steiner is a direct link to the founder of TA (Eric Berne) as well as a major contributor to it as a field of thought (in particular, he is responsible for the idea of the ""stroke economy"" as well as elaborating on the idea of life scripts as written about in What Do You Say After You Say Hello?)

Anyway, I emailed Claude to see if he would do an AMA or similar, and he suggested a skype session. So...

A) You guys into this?

B) If yes, what would you like to ask?",pickup
Reddit user blehhhhhh talks about men crossing boundaries or: why empathy is your most important skill,,pickup
PURE_AMBITION VS LEGENDARY_: BLONDES ONLY CHALLENGE,"We both have repressed feels when it comes to blonde girls and we want to break those, so that we can approach all sorts of girls without restraint. I want to break some of my perceived stereotypes and pure wants to break some of his personal issues. Let it begin tomorrow.

1. blondes only
2. real attractive
3. PAM only
4. first to 10 approaches (3FRs, 3 different days to sarge) [Ex: It's cool to do 10 in one day but you need to do 1 another day and 1 a 3rd day, 10-1-1]
5. after 2 hours of effort, if no attractive blonde, wild card approach [do whatever you want with whomever]
6. must go for #-close
7. any place, anytime
8. group approach counts as one approach [unless you get 2 #-closes, which makes it count as **THREE**] --to advocate set approaches as well.

Ends June 5.

EDIT: If this isn't post approved, let me know and I'll do what is needed to change this to make it approved.

EDIT: Seems like other guys are on this too. I'm adding:

Obscuromagna (**1**), jackthelad (**1**), theVet, marbles12, OMGnoogies, lost_in_joshua_tree, kalarax, rhoop

I'll tally it here.",pickup
[FR]Conversation threading at karaoke bar,"So, I'm kinda late in posting this since it happened last Thursday. Just to set the context, I was drinking since the afternoon, chasing a very stubborn tail (more on this sometime later :). Totally frustrated, I land up at my favorite karaoke haunt. By this time I had pretty much biked around half of the city and tired as fuck. But I decided to not let the day go to waste.

So as soon as I walk in I meet this friend who works in theater. She was in town for the week and in tow are three other friends, one of them being the cute yet sultry type that I keep falling for.

A round of introductions happens. So while going for the handshake I try the hypnotoad approach(excuse my lack of intimacy with the jargon) but doesn't turn out as good because of the loud music around. I had already held her palm and turned it horizontally for a good half minute till I was suddenly like ""holy fuck, i'm holding this girl's hand"" in my head. She surely picked up on that and let go. But I managed to throw in some banter about the misheard name on the first time.

Everyone proceeds to sit down, I head to the console to put in some requests and when I come back I see her alone. I'm going in my head ""fucker, don't fuck this up. it's now or never"". What eased me a bit is that I had flirting around a bit since afternoon as I got off work early. I go and sit really close near her, our thighs were touching and say ""what's your story?"" (first thing that popped in my head). She starts off with how she shifted from another city and really loves theater. From here on I started getting deeper into the conversation with:

1. the awesome things about the last city she stayed in, and the crappy things and how things are much better here

2. then i shift the topic to what exactly she does in the group, her dreams and passions. Believe it or not, this led the conversation to go on for a good 20 minutes or so. By this time I had shifted closer and had my arms around her. Every time she said something exciting, I would touch her on the forearm and the knee as if to reassure it is indeed exciting. It's just something that I felt I should do, do tell me if it wasn't the proper thing to do at that moment.

3. now comes the surprise, she studied journalism from the same university I went to(compsci here). Here I didn't even need to try and the whole thing flowed smoothly. So, here's what I threw out somewhere in between: ""this is amazing. I was not supposed to be here coz I'm already tired, you were supposed to go home and take a nap. But somehow we managed to end up together on this couch talking about our lives. How cool is that?"" and squeezed her forearm lightly? Her face kinda lit up, I could see that.

Now comes the fucked up part. I didn't go for a makeout or even a #-close. The former coz the same shitty voices in my head going on about how stupid it would be to randomly hook up with someone and how the word will spread through the huge social circle my theater friend has. The latter coz I was clumsy with the goodbye and dammit, I should have taken her number. 

All in all, even though there was no definite conclusion to this, I'm damn sure both of us felt better after this conversation and especially for me, who has had a lifelong struggle with expressing himself and getting others comfortable to open up around him, this was a big step.

",pickup
"Toward a rhetorical re-frame (aka, so long PUA lingo)","""*You have your thoughts, and then they become your words, right, your words become your actions, and then those actions become habits, and those habits create your character, and then your character defines your destiny.*""


""*We shape our tools and thereafter our tools shape us.*""


""*...And yet there is no such thing as hypnosis.*""

---

The language we use creates a rhetorical frame, and in many ways we become locked into that frame. We are, in a sense, hypnotized a priori by it. We speak of HB10s and yet a) do any of us really use the phrase ""hot babe"" and b) one man's 10 is another's 8.5, or 7.5, or 1.5. 

Then there's the _-close. Like it's a fucking sales deal. Why use this terminology? If you were sitting around chatting with your homeys, would you really talk about f-closing a HB? No. So why are we doing just that in field reports (another bogus term) other than that's the way it's always been done? Why field report? Why not feels report?

I guess what I dislike is the weird, robotic nature of it. The *feelingless-ness* of it all. Hat tip (pun intended) to Mystery. Let's move beyond.

We're just a group of guys expressing our feels. It's not some meaningless phrase, it's a way of accessing our innermost selves, and who we really are, and how that can help us be present in the moment. The #pickup universe is not about the ridiculous bullshit of the past, it's about the wonderful bullshit of the future. One of the ways we can reclaim our minds is by reclaiming our thoughts, which are influenced by the words we use.

Discuss.",pickup
"[FR] And again, another show … Oh wait no, not a show this time !","Hey buddies, it's me again. Small FR here, but I wanted to share with you.
So my friend and his very-close female friend wanted to re-see The Avengers, so he naturally invite me, and telling me there would be a friend of the girl. Well ok, no problem, this movie is awesome.

So here we are, the three of us at the beginning, grabbing something to eat. Then the friend arrive, and we go chill in a clothes store. So here I am, escalating with her, teasing and negging EVERY members of the group, being cocky funny, laughing at myself by trying silly clothes etc etc

Then we go to the cinema, and I take the friend in my arm to walk during a few meters, increasing the kino, push-pulling. Once in our seats, I am at the center, my friend at my left, the girl at my right. I basically talked  alot wiht my friend, and sometimes just going like 

""Aaaww come here, you don't speak, that's sad"" And when the conversation stopped eventually, I'd tell her ""Bravo, you broke the mood, nobody's talking, bad girl !"" while having her in my arms.

And when the movie begins, kinoing faster, taking and petting her hand, response, approching face, good reaction, so go for the kiss few minutes later (and even went a little bit more than the kiss ;) )

So well, I basically just use the basis of the PUA, and it worked great ! And I wasn't even going for getting the girl, just wanted to have good times with my friend.

Probably gonna see her next week, so I'll let you know if it worth being told.",pickup
My first #-close,"Here’s a little summary of my situation for those of you who don’t know.There was a girl I’ve been working with doing a duet act together and I was really worried about approaching a girl that’s in a work environments, taking in consideration it could affect our act maybe. But today I made sure i had a pair and finally decided to put to use what I’ve learned from /r/pickup and make a move.
While taking a break from practicing I mentioned to her “isn’t it crazy how we just met the other day? (Slight pause) and here we are doing this crazy thing (slight pause, as if I was thinking of what to say next) that totally requires a huge amount of trust (pause) yet we seem to already have that and it feels totally comfortable (pause) doesn’t it?
She responded with a slight bend in the hip with her hand on her chest and her bending slightly forward with a smile and laughs and said ""yea! I know what you mean""

I quickly responded ""it’s just a crazy thought, IM going to grab some water"" and walked off. Hoping to let it sink in.
 We continued to practice and at the end of the day we both walked out together to our cars. I asked her what she had planned for the night and she told me she was going out with a couple of friend’s downtown. I asked her after if she would want to hang out sometime ("" hang out"" probably wasn’t the best choice of words but it was said and I had to just go with it) she replied “yea sure!"" and so I handed her my phone and had her put in her number. #-close.

I read the first PAM and I havent decided what I want to send as the first text, any ideas? 

",pickup
[FR] Limiting Belief Destroyer Vol. 1: Running Up to a Moving Girl,"I saw this redhead walk by and I took my anxiety, gave myself a few seconds to reframe it and feel it. I got excited and started walking towards her.

This girl was walking fast. I had to jog up to her. I did it even though it may have looked weird or whatever. (A little bit of a limiting belief)

I want to get to tough logistical approaches. So I jog up to her and catch up. I tell her, ""Hey, I saw you walk by, I am a little nervous, I find you attractive.""

She smiles and blushes. She continues walking really fast. She says, thanks, I am walking to my class because I'm late.

I say, ""Yeah I understand, let's hang out sometime when you're not in a rush."" She tells me that she isn't from town and commutes an hour everyday to get to class.

**Is that a subtle way of saying I am not interested?**

It's unfortunate that I didn't have the time to get to know her or tell her any PAM approved ""isn't it crazy how you're in a rush and missing out on something awesome here?"" I'll keep that for next time.

**Well check to jogging up to a girl, not as weird as I thought it would be.**",pickup
[FR] F close with HB6,"This is the 4th part of this FR series. See previous post here:
http://www.reddit.com/r/pickup/comments/t4nl5/fr_continued_follow_up_with_hb6/

So I invited HB6 over (again) and this time it was pretty straightforward. We go straight to my room and just start going at it. She's a real giving lover (swaps between giving head and sex...amazing). We ended up fucking 3 times that night and are now FWB.

Now the goal is to avoid oneitis. Sorry for the short FR, just thought I'd close out this written series for those that followed. 

~PoundPickupFR",pickup
[FR] Another show …,"Hello guys, it's me again, still headbanging in Montreal's metal shows.
This time, I'm going to see a band that I know, very theatrical. DUring one their song, there is always two hot chick wearing mask who throw silly strings in the crowd.

This time, it wasn't the two usual. Smokin hot body, really sexy on stage. At the end, the girl generally just leaves, still wearing masks. But this time, they get it off. Woah, both were hot, but one was over the top. I take some photos (as I did during the entire show) and she crack a huge smile at me after that.

During the next show, she's headbanging next to me, and between a song, she propose me a sip of her beer, that I refuse politely. Few minutes after, she turn back to me and scratch my arm with one of those [armor ring](http://www.dreamwaytrading.com/prodimages/alt_images/3824H_chrome_finger_armor_ring_skull_flame_3V.jpg) while smiling a lot.

At the end of the band, she starts talking to me:

""You don't drink?""

""No"" … catch her hips and bring her ear close to me ""it impairs my performance"" (thanks guys for this one !). 

We continue chatting a bit, she told me she wanna drink again, and I tell  her 

""Too bad that I don't pay drink to girl. But you can offer me one if you want. :)""

""I wasn't going to ask you to buy me one. I usually find people to pay me drink.""

She go upstairs take money in her purse, I go talk with some people, and when she came back, she asks me ""Can I bite you ? I like biting people."" So, I offer my neck, but at last moment, I bite her instead. From the moaning, it was a good idea. And then we start making out for few minutes (including hair pulling, biting and scratching. And her forcing my hand on her beautiful boobs.). I manage to catch her number at the time, and trying to get her to my place next, but she have her friend sleeping over (the other masked girl) and because ""You're cute, but I'm too drunk.""

But after, it's the part that saddened me. She make out with at least two others guys, really teasing them and stuff. And she was veeeery drunk all along. So my ""victory"" seem really not like a victory, and this doesn't give me this confidence boost. Well, I'm happy, cause well, K-close, but it seems really lowered by the other guys kissing her.

But I really want to F-close her, so I'm going to see her again (or try at least). She'll be at the next show of this band, next tuesday. I don't know if I should try to see her before (but I'm outta town for the week-end), and I don't know if I can F-close her during a ""regular"" date.

So r/pickup, advices, remarks, comments, anything :)",pickup
scammed millions fund luxury hotels,,pickup
Lucasvb on how to be interesting and getting rid of self doubt [/r/askreddit crosspost],,pickup
my manventure feels,,pickup
"BODY TALK STUFF, TAKIN SPACE IN PUBLIC",,pickup
"First ""date"" is a house party","Hello /r/pickup ! After my [really good show](http://www.reddit.com/r/pickup/comments/tihgp/fr_first_fr_a_show_a_kclose_two_close/) last week, the first HB I #-closed and I have talked (couldn't get a date cause she lives outta town) and she invited me to a party at her house on saturday. So here is my questions: 

How the fuck do I manage to F-close her (or at least K-close) at her party ? Does the ""rules"" of the nightgame in bar apply in a house party ?

Plus, any advices are more than well-accepted ! ",pickup
Creating those bonds that really matter...,"Homeys,

Building a bond with something is hard, it requires quite a few things, but the things you need to focus on are easy enough to master when you know yourself, and are comfortable with who you are.

The hardest person to create a bond with, is yourself I find.

When I think about it, what was causing me to struggle getting the day 2's and lasting relationships with anyone that I met outside of my core circle of friends and coworkers. That was not being honest and open with what I wanted in the interaction.

My opinion is the following things helped a lot when I started to work on that:

*Honesty
*Being Open to other's opinions
*Being genuinely interested in the person I was talking to
*Being comfortable (both internally and where I was)

When approaching myself with the problem, and through talking to other people via the sub, and on IRC, I began to paint a better picture of myself. This all culminated in a conversation I had with a fellow named ABC about his situation, and gave me a strong chance to reflect some of my feelings, while talking through some of his concerns as well.



We all have things we don't like about ourselves, and the best way to connect with someone else is to be able to show that we aren't perfect, and are willing to open ourselves up to them when they do the same to us.
",pickup
"Negative Words Shut Down Higher Level Mental Processes, 
Study [/r/science crosspost]",,pickup
"RE:TOK2: ""Wordweaving I"" BR by Vitamin Dook","Hypnotic suggestion is one of the most fascinating things I've ever read about, and so when I found out there was a book *entirely* about Hypnotic Suggestion I had to read it.

**Wordweaving: The Science of Suggestion - A Cromprehensive Guide to Creating Hypnotic Language** by Trevor Silvester is everything it claims to be and more. 

It starts with an overview of how our minds cross-connect information, (Stimulus ---&gt; Memory search --&gt; Emotion --&gt; Response --&gt; Termination ---&gt; Evaluation)    in other words seeing a wild dog causes our brain to link togetehr what it knows about wild dogs, makes us feel scared, we respond by running away, and when we're finally safe we can evaluate the situation.

Wordweaving is built upon aiming our hypnotic suggestions at a particular step in the process,  in the example I just gave we could aim a suggestion at seeing a dog, the stimulus, or we could suggest a different emotional response (let's say, caution instead of fear), or we could aim a suggestion at the response (you feel scared, but don't run).

Afterwards, the book describes the various types of Trance Pheneomana we can attach to our suggestions; some of them include positive hallucination (seeing ""more"" than you're actually experiencing, oh my god that dog must have been as big as a house!)  negative hallucination (Seeing less, I didn't even see the dog), time distortion (when you see the dog you might be amazed at how quickly fear passes\time might slow down and you'll have an ample amount of time to choose the appropriate course of action),  age progression, age regression (which will be covered in Wordweaving II).

Then the book brings it all together by teaching about the Milton Model (NLP Familiars will recall the Milton Model is based on the ""artful vagueness"" of Milton H. Erickson's hypnotic languaging ) and a **very** extensive chapter about linguistic framing. It reads like a toolbox of hypnotic language, and is one of the most money things I've read.

At every step of the way Wordweaving provides exercises, to identify specific elements and to create our own. So instead of just reading, you'll get an opportunity to actually practice.

Wordweaving is an amazing book, and a must have. I've been using it in my personal self-hypnosis, in set, and in general persuasion and the tools given here have had a definite and profound effect in all areas. 

",pickup
"[FR] First FR: A show, a K-close, two #-close","Hello /r/pickup, here is my first FR, I hope it will be alright.

So, I go this show, come early to have a good spot and after 20mn, while I was talking to a random dude, a redhead chick HB7 come and tell me ""Are you the guy from Ghost?"". I was wearing a Ghost tee-shirt, so I tell her ""Well, obviously, yes."". It was in fact a chick I met at a previous show, but I didn't take her number cause she was living far away.

So we start to chat, with her friend too, I kino her, tease and neg her, and after 15mn she ask for my number. Instead, of course, I give her my phone so that she gives me her number. First #-close of the night.

So I continue to chat and escalate, between the opening bands. The soundcheck of the last one was taking time cause of sound problem, and I notice a girl behind me, who looks really shy, who respond to my smile when she meet my look. So I bring her and her 3 male friends into our little group and we start to chat. She is, indeed, really shy, and I just ask her name.

The band start, and after 3 songs, I notice that the girl is closer to me, due to crowd. I feel her hand against my arm, so I take her hand. I start to nicely caress her, to see if she was fetching for someone to hang to because of the crowd, or if she was attracted to me.

And she responds well ! So at the end of the song, I approch my face from her, as if I was going to kiss her, to be sure. She absolutely doesn't reject me, so it … was … on ! I start kissing her, and kinoing her during and between the songs, mostly kissing her when the lights went down, because of her friends.

BUT, at one point, the light stayed and I kissed her. Of one her friend saw her, and start talking to her, apparently pissed off. Shows continue, so I don't really care, and she is still hanging her hands against my chest. I hear him said things like ""How can you do this to me?"" etc etc

So I presume this dude isn't just a friend, but a BF, but she doesn't look like she gives a shit. So I don't stop until the end of the show.

After that, she go back with her friends, I talk to them for a bit, inviting them for a drink but they couldn't make it. So this girl, who didn't kiss me in front of her other friend go before I can do something. But after 3 steps, she go back to me and kiss me again. So I ask for her number, that she gaves me, kiss me one more time and leave.

She apparently doesn't live in the same city as me, but to the question ""Do you come often"" she responded ""I could…"", so I think it's a good sign.

And even if I don't F-close her, it will have been a great confidence boost, and a great night (and great death metal show, too :D )",pickup
[FR] GIVING VALUE: IT AINT BOUT GETTING LAID ALL THE TIME,"Note: If you're the type that wants this to end with any close, you can skip this, this is about giving value when I saw it was needed.

-

I ran into a girl that I approached indirectly a couple of months ago [before I was here on #p].

I noticed that she looked undeniably tense and frustrated. So I said, Hey [ ] what's going on?

She didn't give me the typical ""good"" crap. She went off about how much stress was in her life.

I asked her bout her family, friends, school, etc. I did this because I wanted to practice using a little bit of NLP, some inductions, strong eye contact to make her feel more at ease with herself. I touched her on the arm and hands when she needed some strokes. She has a really strong stamping on the 2nd circuit, which showed up in her tense expressions, so I made her recognize it and see what she had to do to improve there.

I hung out with her for an hour or so because I wanted to give value **by listening** and helping her have **good feels**. She just needed an example of how it is to feel **perfectly comfortable** in the moment. I attempted to be that example.

At the end I poked her nose (child state) and said, ""I don't want to do anything sexual with you, I don't want to save you, I only want to show you how the world is when it's fun and comfortable.""

tldr: Giving value with the stuff learned on #p doesn't always have to end in a close.",pickup
[FR] The Follow Up,"This FR is the follow up of [HBScene Pickup](http://www.reddit.com/r/pickup/comments/t9xjz/frflustered_turned_into_fun/) I usually blow it on the follow up, but Marbles and Ease_On_By gave me some good tips to make this happen.


**Ch.1**

Went to get coffee with her yesterday afternoon. Probably one of the best experiences I had with a girl. Usually I hump and dump, but I genuinely wanted to have a legitimate interaction with this girl. So we start having this flowing conversation back and forth, kind of like dancing. Our conversation never stops, we finish our coffee's 2 hours after getting them, and I tell her I am really enjoying this interaction, and want to continue it, want to go get some food. She is down, but I tell her I have to stop back at my place because I have $1000 of donations in my car that need dropping off. (I work for red cross and was out soliciting that day)  


**Ch.2**

So she follows me back to my place, I invite her in. I drop of the basket and we go get some sushi, this time only taking 1 car. Just a reminder the conversation never stops, we are both vamping off each other, and it is still going very smooth. Before we leave the car to go in, I go with a pattern break and just pull her in and k-close. She did a little moan when I pulled her close, so it was successful.


**Ch.3**

After we go and our conversation seems to be sapping the sexual tension, I figure I fix it. So I start telling her this story about a guy that couldn't get a clue from a girl that was obviously shunning him. So I move to her side of the table, sit down next to her, and move my face real real close (like an inch or two away from hers). And was continuing telling the story but my eyes were locked in hers and visa versa. I am explaining (with my face real close) how the guy got this close to this girl and it really creeped her out. At this point she wasnt listening to the story...she was completely @_@. Then I moved to my side of the table again, and continued on with the date. We finish our sushi, and go get Mochi(frozen yogurt) across the street. We are still vibe-ing and having flowing conversation.


**Ch.4**

I invite her back to my place to watch a movie, and she is down. We start watching the movie and at random intervals it gets hot-n-heavy. However, seeing how she is a good girl, after the movie ends she ejects herself, I walk her out to the car and she tells me she had an amazing time with me today, and looks forward to the next time.


Later that night I go out with my friends, and I text her plans for our next meet. Parks and Rec + Wine. Her response, ""Sounds amazing.""",pickup
AM I REALLY A CREEPER OR IS THIS THE GREATEST PULL OF ALL TIME? [NEED FEEDBACK ON 4LINES OF TEXT MODS],,pickup
"Conversation Threading: Ideas on how to avoid ""interview questions,"" get wide rapport, and have more interesting conversations.","Since the inception of [/r/pickup](/r/pickup) we've gotten lots of questions about how to have interesting conversations, avoid interview questions, and so on.

As such, I wanted to throw together a quick post with some *ideas* on how to expand your conversational skills. This is not a step by step guide, nor a list of do's or don'ts. These are just some things that have helped me.

**Interview Questions aren't bad, per se.**
I don't think you have to exclude interview questions completely, however it's obvious that asking too many isn't conducive to establishing rapport, which is ironic, because it's been my experience that people interview to try and gain rapport. 

**The Idea Web\Spider Diagram**
I suggested to users a few times, that they can think of a conversation as an idea web. In Elementary School, they would instruct us to plan our writing by diagraming it. In the center circle we would write ""Summer vacation,"" and then draw lines extending from the center to smaller circles,   ""Summer vacation,"" would be the center circle, and smaller ones could be ""going to places"" which would be branched off to ""the beach,"" ""the mall,"" ""grandma's house,"" or whatever. Other branches could lead to things like sunny weather, sleeping in, no school, summer school, and more.

*How to use it:* Say a girl tells you she's an Engineer. Instead of asking ""Cool, do you like it?"" you could consider the idea web. Engineer is in the center. One branch could lead to ""What qualities does an engineer need?"" which could be branched off into ""Organization,""  ""Patience,"" ""Creative,""   or a branch could lead to ""What does an Engineer do?""  or a branch could lead to, ""People I know that are Engineers,"" or a branch could lead to ""How does one become an engineer?""   which could lead to ""Studying lots of math, doing a lot of computer work.""   So in theory she could say she's an engineer, and you could say something like ""Isn't it crazy how much math you have to do?""  Or you could combine branches and say ""My friend John says that to be an engineer you have to be really creative, and really patient. Especially because of all the math that's involved.""   

**Emotion and Logic, Warm and Cold**

One thing that can be said about Interview Questions is they tend to keep conversation very logical, or very cold.  An old example is the contrast between ""Do you plan on teaching dance, or performing dance?""  Which is logical, and ""cold,"" in contrast to ""What about dancing resonates with you the most?"" which is very warm.   It's been my experience people get more invested in the warm questions, rather than the binary ""yes\no"" cool questions.

And of course, certain words are warmer:
""What is it about biology that you like?""
""What is it about biology that fascinates you?""

And of course you can combine this with the Idea web,  say a girl says she likes to play Rugby, instead of ""Oh Rugby, that's fun,"" you could warm it up and branch out the ideas,  ""Rugby? I don't play myself, but it always seemed like a lot of fun. Have you ever been playing, and you just felt *really focused,* almost as if everything else just kind of... fell to the wayside?""    

http://redd.it/qdy61 A classic topic about warm/cold

**Wide Rapport against narrow rapport**

""Wide Rapport,"" in this sense means a discussion of a wide variety of topics, in contrast to Narrow Rapport, where you've talked about few subjects.   For example, have you ever had someone in your life that you always talked to about school, and not much else? And then if you ran into them outside of school, it felt a little.... off?     Obviously, I don't want you to panic if you met a musician and you spent a lot of time talking about music, but there are benefits to exploring more avenues.

**Conversations don't need a ""logical"" progression**

You can change topic at any time. This can be done smoothly with conjunctions like ""Oh, that reminds me,"" or ""Wait, did you see\hear\hear about\catch\know\ x?"" 

**REMEMBER:**
Most everything they tell you can be branched out. Even their name. Be creative


**In conclusion:**
Again, these are just ideas. This wasn't written to be a definitive step by step guide. However, these are the things that have helped me. Every person you talk to has a special set of ideas, passions, experiences and feelings that are exclusive to them. These are the things I try to reach in my conversations.  Obviously, you can weave these suggestions with what you already know and what you've been learning from the TOKs. 

Happy Sarging, and may the odds be ever in your favor.",pickup
[FR] APPROACH 25: NOT THE SAD DREAD,"Approaches 12-24 were all sorts of weird awkward, I have a boyfriend liners that I didn't write about but let's just say it isn't going to be perfect at times. I got sick, then lost my motivation, etc.

Got to have a good chat with Popefool as we met up. Good stuff.

------

After we talked I headed in one direction and right when I came out of the restroom, a girl with crazy hair walked by.

Finally, I could feel excited and my vitals popping into place. She was totally my type. I am not immune to AA, it took me 7 seconds to get my feet moving. Luckily, after about 20 seconds, she sat down near her classroom.

I took a few deep breaths and went up and said, ""Hi, I saw you walk by. *she nods* I got a little nervous. *she nods* I find you attractive. *she smiles, blushes, and nods.* I wanted to chat for a few minutes with you. Mind if I sit with you? She says sure.

We chat about our majors, where we're from, all that good stuff. I add in some stuff with, ""Isn't it comfortable just sitting in silence?"" and she agrees. I tease her bout her hair and choice of soda. One of her classmates says hi to both of us and for a split second I feel the approach is lost but I give props to the guy. He moves away due to being hot in the sun.

We chat for a total of 10 minutes about where she chills and she tells me coffee places and stuff. She lights up a cigarette. I tell her that, I better get going but ""we should hang out.""

**She adds in, ""Yeah let's get coffee.""** (Whenever a girl says it, I feel it reduces flake rate).

I hand her the phone and tell her to put a creative nickname. She does and I say my goodbyes after the #-close

Improvement:

I need to touch more often during my approaches but I sat too far away from her. I will work on this.

",pickup
Tome of Knowledge 1: Using Some of this Shit,"*This was written a while ago.. on DLHQ, before reading Persuasion Engineering.. didn't post it though cause i wanted the 'go ahead' from higher ups -but here it is and take it if it speaks to you*

**INTRO** The TLDR; for Conscious Out Put System is that it is how we express our experiences. There's three ways of expressing it kinesthetically, visually, and auditorally (This is not a word).   
____

p.60 of Monsters and Magical Sticks
""From what you have just read, I know that you can see and grasp firmly the concept that each system has a different way of expressing itself. If an individual is unable to ""solve"" a problem-pain in the above example-you, as a people-helper. can help him/her utilize a different system."" ""In the areas of ""emotional pain,"" perhaps ""looking"" in a new way may help him/her to see a solution""

Besides the other stuff on conscious output systems, this really resonated within me. The examples of conscious output system essentially conveyed that you can gain rapport with someone by find out their conscious output system, and also you can help them by the ""utilization of a different system"" 




And from that statement ""utilization of a different system"", I got that you can widens someone's map of the world by helping them utilize a different output system. Following a change in one's map, one's beliefs included can too be changed. From the book, ""In effect, you help them to break their ""mind set,"" and enable them to call upon another 'partner', or system, for the solving their problem. 
___

**So how does this apply to what we do?**

In pickup, we might deal with beliefs that get in our way. Sure we can have stuff like sleight of mouth to give us the tools, but really how we subtly use these tools can make a positive difference. We have to combine what we have learned, as they become stronger tools for our disposal. I'll try to demonstrate.

Let me show you an analogy to paint you a clear picture of what i'm depicting for you:



Let's say that Sleight of Mouth is like your tool box filled with chainsaws, axes, rope, and more.
Let's also say that ""your knowledge of conscious output system"" is your arms, shoulders hands and all.
And your mark is a tree.
Depending on what you do with your tools, you can get the tree to look like what you want. Do you want to chop it down? Do you want to peel some bark off? Do you want to cut the branches off? Do you want to carve a wooden statue?
Now how are we gonna do what we want? With our hands of course.

We can throw an axe at the tree to decorate it, we can thrust our chainsaw into the tree, we can do whatever we want with it as long as we know how to use our hands in the proper way.
 
{our tools are the what, our arms are the how}

___
**So... What do I do once I have read the TOK 1 and am really excited to apply what I have learned?** 

Let's chunk back laterally to pick up. Here's a crude example {*very crude*}.

Let's say you are talking to a chick and she has a ""limiting belief"",

**HER**:""I can't see myself having sex with you, my boyfriend wouldn't like it.""

**YOU**: ""It's good that you look after other people's feelings.. at the same time, can't you grasp that human beings can just communicate with each other on a deeper level? I mean, isn't it always great to just hold that experience, where two people can simply put themselves out there and embrace new feelings of being connected with one another..""

From her statement we can SEE that she is using a visual output system to describe her problem. We want to communicate in her conscious output system to gain rapport, and after that we can begin to lead her to a better place (preferably a place that favors us). This goes back to the concept of pacing and leading [which is explained by TheDukeDevlin here](http://pastebin.com/tScYxStz). We respond by acknowledging her intention in HER COS, which focuses on an outcome frame. The word ""see"" is the indicator that she is using the visual output system. 

Now, in order to lead her out of this limiting belief, we need to make use of a different conscious out put system because she may appear to be ""stuck"" in a visual conscious output system. So we choose a kinesthetic output system because 1) it's different 2) it's relevant to what we want her to FEEL. Not only do we use a different conscious output system, but also we use some Sleight of Mouth patterns. Plus utilization of these conscious out put system is perfect for emotional arousal which is not too far from the arousal that we want. 

We widen the frame size and chunk up ""boyfriend"" to ""other people"". We chunk up again from ""other people"" to ""human beings"", and ""sex"" to ""communicate with each other on a deeper level"". 

When we we utilize ""can't you"", we not only do some posturing, but also we offer a choice to accept our suggestion / belief, and most people do not like to say no. //But looking at it again, I feel that ""don't you think"" may sound better or ""isnt"". I hope other users can chime in on this // The second sentence that we say ...its another suggestion / belief. We chunk back down and make the frame smaller by chunking down ""human beings"" to two people. When we use Sleight of Mouth patterns we want whoever we use it on to have new perspective. The new perspective here is: ""Really ,we are just two individuals amongst all human beings, isn't it amazing that we are taking the opportunity to do 'this'"". We do all of this while of course using kinesthetic words like""hold, put themselves out there, grasp, feelings, connected, embrace""- You might as well ask for a hug now. 

*If we wanted to make some changes/improvements to this, perhaps we can change some of the tenses of the words, to create presuppositions that the experience you are trying to communicate has already happened, or is happening currently. 

____
****In Conclusion, maybe the above example perhaps isn't something that is likely to occur, but we can use it as a model and understand how / why it worked in order to make the connection between the tome of knowledge and application.  **** ",pickup
"[Audio FR] I've been told I go into interview mode too much, please analyze.","Here is a recording of my sarge. I'm pretty new to this, so thoughtful advices would be helpful. Funny backstory, I sarged her before but don't remember... so I had to lie a bit :/

[link to audio](http://soundcloud.com/user1805150/vn810052)",pickup
Recent Fuckups: A Compilation,"This is purely for my own benefit, so that I might reflect on the times during the last month or so wherein I was not, how you say, killing it.

1.) Met 2 girls at bar with friend of mine, interaction went meh.  I text one an hour later, get some interest.  I proceed to like BLOW UP her phone for the next 2 days (never 2 at a time, always getting a response, but still way the fuck too much), and she finally blows off a day 2.  I run into her that night at same bar where we met.  Went fine, I laughed it off, but learned my lesson.  Just because a girl is texting you back after like 1 second doesn't mean you should keep doing it.  I was focused on getting her out on one particular night at all costs because I was about to leave town, but I should've just chilled out.

2.) Approached sexy Persian chick, talked to her for like four seconds about her boring teaching job, before calling her boring and asking if she wanted to do some blow.  Admittedly, this occurred because I'd already done some and was acting like a fuckhead.  Lesson:  Don't do white girl and sarge, shit is way incompatible for like a million reasons.  She later commented to my friend that I was ""like way aggressive, and mumbled something about drugs"".  L O L

3.) Exited bar in one part of town, was immediately approached by petite sexy blonde, don't even know how but we had a good interaction, kissed her, got number.  Her friends pulled her away, I drove to another part of town.  She blows up my phone telling me to come back.  Mind you, she knows I just drove like 15 minutes away.  I was unable to resist, drove back, got hella ignored.  EPIC SHIT TEST FAIL.  I was really mad about this one, woulda tased a bitch if I hadn't been so obviously lame and totally at fault.

Abbreviated others:

- Failed shit test from blondie about my taking a smoke break.

- Saw girl I had brief thing with at club and just froze, said ""how are you"".  Should have said anything the fuck else and/or more interesting than that, because she looked foxy.  Oh well.

- Left one girl a babbling VM for like no reason, which is bad because not only is she pretty hot, but she also sells me klonopin, and I love that shit.  Hope I didn't screw it up.  **EDIT:** I screwed it up.

I've just suddenly started getting shit tested a TON more lately, no idea why.  I take it as a positive, but since I'm getting more, I'm failing more.  I've also been getting into the really bad habit of getting hella fucked up when I'm out, and I don't mean drunk.  I mean like Tom Sizemore fucked up, like THIS IS BAT COUNTRY fucked up.  This is really fun, but it won't get you laid.  I shall stop at once.",pickup
XMP CONSPIRACY: SOMEONE IS STARTING TO SEE WHAT I DID THERE.,,pickup
"XMP CONSPIRACY: SEDUCES MEN INTO INTROSPECTION, PROMISES SEX/MONEY/POWER in exchange for FEELS.",,pickup
[FR]Flustered turned into Fun,"**TL:DR at the end**

**Preface**

So earlier this week I watched the bodytalk vid, and read up on dantering's explanation of transactional analysis. Needless to say my mind was completely blown after both. I realized there was a lot of work I had to do on conversing and posturing. This is the FR on my first night out after internalizing all the info.

**Ch. 1**

My roommate and I decide we want to go out, we invite some friends out, and go to my usual bar. We are sitting there for a bit just shooting the shit. Its currently graduation weekend so there are a lot of parents out. Some were even busting a move to some Top 40.

I look around and its a target rich environment. So I figure I use what I learned and approach this 3 set (HB10, HB5, HB5's boyfriend). I indirectly open to the HB10 (who will now be referred to HBScene) and introduce myself to the HB5 and her boyfriend.

I start talking to HBScene and she is in the child ego state already, and she is down to play. So we are hitting it off and she is starting to get @_@. She gets a text from her friend telling her he is on his way. I don't fret because I know how to handle myself when there is another guy trying to blow out my set. So she tells me she wants to go dance, but she needs to find her friend first. So I tell her that's cool I'll be at the bar when you get back.

**Ch.2**

I go back to the bar with my friends and start telling them whats up. How she is going to look for her friend and they give me like an ""uh oh"" look. I tell them to not fret and just watch. So about 15 min later I see her again and I walk over to her and her friends. I start @_@ her again, she starts to visibly show signs. Pupils are dilated, face is blushed, etc. So I say lets go dance. We start dancing and about 10-15 min in I whisper into her ear ""I don't usually tell girls this, but I find you very fucking attractive."" She turns around, she forces a k-close. After a bit more dancing we move off the floor and she goes to find her friend again. I tell her she'll know where I'll be and she goes off again.

**Ch.3**

Find my group again, give them an update, talk with them for a bit. 5 min later I see HBScene again with her friends. I walk over and start getting in good with her friends. Talk about their various ventures, like school, jobs, and all that stuff. I noticed the guy has a sqrt(3) tattoo'd on his chest and I ask him is that from the poem. Him and his girl were impressed, and told me usually people don't get the reference. Since apparently HBScene's friend was real close I set a timeframe for the rest of the night just in case he tried to AMOG. I invite HBScene, and her friends to my place for an after party. They aggree to come over, so plans are set. I let my roommates know so they can partake in the experience as well.

**Ch.4**

HBScene's friend shows up, and he comes off real strong to her. He was the definition of short-man syndrome. Like is super buff, but looks kind of like a bowling ball because he was like 5'4. Comes up gives her a big hug, starts trying to buy her shots, trying real hard to convince her to dance. So I tell him we are about to go back to my place and play some beerpong. He is holding eye contact with HBScene, doesn't acknowledge anyone else, and I wasn't about to get blown out. 

So I start engaging him specifically. I force him to reframe himself, and we start talking about random things, but just ruining any social momentum he was feeling towards HBScene. He says that if she goes dance with him he will bring a bunch of liquor back to my place. I kind of neg him about what liquor he had because he had like Mango Rum and Smirnoff flavored vodka. So he ends up dragging her to the dancefloor, and her friend and bf are like ""we like you exponentially more, this other guy is a douche we have your back""

We head out to the dancefloor to find them. Eventually do, I tell HBScene and her friends that I am going to get some beer for my place after I'll text you some directions. As I leave I pull in HBScene mid grind with her friend, hold eye contact with her friend, and k-close again...right in front of him.

I head to pick up the beer, and if they showed they showed, if not I could say I still had a good night. 

**Epilogue** 

Turns out they showed, and without the guy friend. (/swoosh) We played some beerpong, I introduced them to a game called ""Tits"" we play in our house that people don't usually know, and it's a lot of fun. They end up calling it a night and depart, but that was after I pulled HBScene's number, with plans to hang later in the week.

**TL:DR**

Start off night well, body talk and transactional analysis really helped. Approached three-set (HB10,HB5,HB5's bf). Hit it off with HB10, almost get blown out by a guy friend who arrived later. Salvage the situation, blow HIM out. K-close, #-close, and make plans with HB10 later in the week",pickup
[FR] Breaking down the physical wall and rubbing HBsaudi's face,"**Preamble:**

friday night was a bust.  i had been revving mollie up to hang out, and she got sick so nothing happened.  i had nothing else cooking because i really have been trying to do homework.  yesterday, i worked on a paper until 5, when mollie was supposed to call.  she said she still didn’t feel great, but we could go to this thai place at 7ish.  i consider that i may be able to pull a roasted duck close, but then she calls a little past 7, saying she was worse again.  really apologetic, but i was still frustrated.  so i biked down to this pool party that had started to at least make an appearance, but i couldn’t get anybody’s attention to let me in.

so then i go home, and at 8:40 i’m like fuck it, i’m getting beer.  i get to the place just as it closes, and as i’m biking home, i go past my friend’s house, and think “fuck going home, i’m drinking these with somebody.”  i end up hanging with him and his friend as they’re working on producing a song.  after 2 beers, i say i’m going to go home and work on homework, and he says “you’re not staying for the party?”  THERE IS A PARTY.  so i head home, grab some stuff, come back.  they’re freestyle rapping and force me to do it.  i have about 10 good seconds, and that was good enough for me.  i was on my computer working on my paper a bit and on irc, then shit started to heat up, so i put that shit away and started mingling.

**Panic:**

i was sleepy to begin with, and i had smoked a hit of weed and had two beers by the time anyone arrived.  i talked to a few friends, and more people started arriving around 11.  i played flip cup with a girl i know and her friends, including an hippyish HB9 that i’ve seen around.  i do okay, end up on her team for the second round, and do some shoulder contact with HBhippie.

at about midnight, the place blows up.  HBcockblocker from the mollie saga is there, so i start to worry that she may relate negative things to mollie, then i fucking drop it.  my framing is good, and i don’t think you have an assumption of monogamy if the last time you hung out you couldn’t grab the person’s hand in public.  then this 18 or 19-year old HB9 i screwed frame up on last saturday--the girl who was in a girl kissing mood--shows up, and is sort of awkward around me.  that does not help my anxiety.  there are a few other girls that added to my anxiety, and there were so many people.

at this point, when people ask me how i’m doing, i tell them i’m overwhelmed by the people.  i end up talking to a friend of mine who gives me some good advice, and suggests i’m OCD and maybe i should talk to someone.  which was good, he was taking care of me.  good stuff.  i sat down at one point, and this cute black girl came over to see if i was okay.  i ended up talking to her for a couple minutes, escalating to me holding her around her waist, but she got broken off into a group for a photo, and i just walked off, and she later ended up talking to a friend of mine for a long time in a physically intimate setting.

**Turning it around:**

oddly, i noticed that when i did things to calm myself that were indicators of my nervousness, such as placing my hands palms-together in front of me, whistling, and simply saying “WHAT THE FUCK” while in the middle of a group with 5 people, people responded to me a lot better.  weird.

i also started doing the thing from the body talk video where you put your hands on people’s shoulders as you move through the crowd.  i start with guys i know, escalate to girls i know, end up doing that shit to pretty much everyone as i pass by.

things start to change for the better, and shift into a non-panicky state.

**Post-panic:**

i have a few social interactions in line for the bathroom that go really well, because the hallway is dark and quiet and has few people in it.  i show up and there’s a girl on her phone.  i ask her “how’s your phone?”  she says “great! how are you?” and touches my arm.  i’m still not escalatey at this point, but i think i touch her arm a little and find out her name is marlowe.  later, i end up in line with HBcockblocker and HBhippie and her friend.    i go to the bathroom and then HBcockblocker goes in, and HBhippie challenges me to remember their names and i do.  i escalate a little contact, try the two fingers around the back from bodytalk and it goes well.  HBcockblocker goes out, and HBhippie says i can go.  i grab her around the waist and pull her to me and push her a little and jokingly give her shit for being too fucked up to realize i already went to the bathroom.  a good time was had by all.

by this point, when i talk to a girl, i’m grabbing her hand and playing with it while i’m talking to her.  greeted a guy from school, held his hand, turned my wrist and rested my other hand on it and said ""you have really soft hands"" he looked at me inquisitively, so i said, ""sorry, just trying to be social, man."" and he said ""sorry it didn't work out for you in this case.""  lol.  that guy has good frame control.

**Hot for teacher:**

so, my teacher shows up, and she’s like late-30s hot chick that always wears dresses and heels.  she’s not supposed to be at the party, but she’s there with this little gay freshman kid and a friend of hers from admissions (HBtroll) at the school.  i talk to her, and immediately i grab her hand, drop the hand and we’re still holding. after a second, hands release, i put my fingertips on her back.

i eject after a couple minutes, because i need to process some information.  my friend whose house it is tells me to go for it.  so i end up walking around a bit and she goes out back.  i stand with them again.  she has a spiky bracelet on, which i ask to touch.  i say dumb shit about the bracelet while i’m holding her arm, and so does she.  HBtroll isn’t fugly, but she’s got bad juju and is trying to bone me.  she was sort of rubbing on me at times, which helped me get in state. so i talk to her a little bit, but HBteacher has her back to the wall and i have my hand on her back.  i was definitely in ass territory, because i could feel the thong.  i could’ve been a little more aggro with the ass, but when i took my hands away, i would drop them and run a finger down her leg.

while i was talking to her, i marlowe walks by and shouts goodbye to someone. i call out to her, she comes over, i say “you’re leaving!” she confirms, we do the face kiss thing, and i pull back and kiss her and get a little tongue.  she leaves, she was at least a 7, maybe i should've followed it, but whatever.  i feel pretty fancy by this point.

she says she wants to go, and the gay kid is her ride, but he’s talking to this other guy.  i’m like “i will escort you home” and she says “that sounds fine.” and tells the gay kid she’ll figure it out and he should stay at the party and have fun.  he says, “no, i’ll drive you.”  i tell him to chase his dreams, but he does not heed my advice.

HBteacher escapes, but i’m pretty sure i can hit that any time i want.  i think i just gotta be all, hey can i come by your place and show you this thing i’ve been working on?  i think you’ll like it.

**And so on:**

the HB in the girl kissing mood has been causing me anxiety, partially because i wanted to get in on it, and partially because i hate that awkward thing where you don’t say hi.  i spent some time throughout the night trying to approach decently.  i ended up walking up when she was in a 2-set and she walked away.  then she ends up making out with this friend of mine.  that lucky bastard is moving on up.  anyway, finally run into them, and as he pulls away to take her out back, i say “HB! how are you?!” and put my hand up and she grabs it.  she’s doing well.  she starts to leave, i call her name again, and grab her hand and start playing with it, and tell her, “i just don’t want things to be awkward.” she’s hammered, and says, “what?” and i said, “nevermind, we’re good.”  and she says, “yeah. don’t worry.  next year.”  hooray.

i also run into this girl that i had hit on awkwardly and weirded her out at the beginning of last semester, and shit’s been okay, but never great.  we say hi, it’s comfortable.  later, there’s this guy who’s touchy and overbearing and she looks really unhappy and says she’s going to go, so i walk over and engage the guy in bullshit conversation while she leaves. i run into her a little bit later and we exchange a few words as she’s on her way out, and she’s genuinely nice to me.  i tell her to have a nice summer.  it’s sweet.

**CONTINUED IN COMMENTS**",pickup
"DANTERING TALKS ABOUT TRANSACTIONAL ANALYSIS, REAL HELPFUL STUFF [174L]",,pickup
IRONIX GETTIN SWOLE // PAF PARTNER PRESSES,,pickup
SAN FRANCISCO MANVENTURE POW WOW...deets in comments,,pickup
"BODYTALK: POSTURE AND SEXUAL FRAME, SHOOTIN THE SHIT.",,pickup
Want to ask Richard Bandler something? This might be your chance,"I'm attending an introductory course on NLP by Richard Bandler in London tomorrow and I might have a few minutes to talk to him in person. Is there anything you guys would like me to ask him?
 
.
 
**Post your questions in the comments.**",pickup
[FR] Continued follow up with HB6,"This is a 3rd part of this FR series. See previous post here:
http://www.reddit.com/r/pickup/comments/svdr9/fr_follow_up_from_club_night_out_post/


HB6 came over to my crib a couple nights back around 9. Gave her a hug and kiss when she walks in. She brought a lot of movie type of junk food and I bust her ovaries about her trying to fatten me up. She brings out the DVD case and explains the movie to me. The kino begins here. We're sitting very close together on the couch, etc.

She heats up the popcorn and we head to my room (where the TV is) to ""watch the movie"". We start the movie and I immediately put my arm around her as she literally throws the candy/popcorn containers on me as a place holder (lol). 

Only minutes into the movie, we begin making out and she goes cold/turns to look back at the movie. This making out goes on and off for about 10-15 minutes. It eventually progresses into her groping me. Long story short, we both are at the point of being in our underwear and she looks at me directly in the eyes and says ""We're not having sex tonight. I'm on my period"". She said it in a semi-stern kinda voice. I read a little about different types of LMR (last minute resist) and ASD (anti-slut defense) in the bedroom the day before thinking this would happen. I already knew how I wanted to response to a potential situation like this. I looked directly into her eyes and said ""That's fine"". Her jaw nearly dropped. She didn't expect such a response. She replied ""Wait what? You're so relaxed and don't care"". I legit thought (me being gullible) she was on her period. Regardless if I thought she was on her period or not, I still would've had the same carefree response. No woman is going to try to grab me by my balls and control me. After more groping and making out, I got her topless and things got even more physical. I found out she really wasn't on her period, but we didn't have sex.

After some boob action and a little hand work from both teams, she quickly gets dressed and says she has to go. As she's about to leave, she said she forgot to watch some motorcycle videos I used to make. We go back to my room and I turn on the videos. She asks about dubstep and I play a banging track I'm recently into. All of a sudden she goes ""I don't like when it's put away"" and looks down at my manhood. I reply ""So whip it out"". Not only did she whip it out, but I got the best head in a LONG time. Blew it straight down the pipe and she didn't even spit. BOOM.

I'll be seeing her again for sure and this time with an f-close. I'd like your guys thoughts on my response to her LMR/ASD. Cheers.

~PoundPickupFR",pickup
Sensory Acuity Flash Cards [NLP Practice],"I've compiled a set of 335 flash cards to broaden my horizon of sensory acuity terms (and yours if you so choose) and decided to post them here for you all to use as well. They include not only words, but also phrases for each rep system.

I originally created this only for my droid to have handy when in line places or waiting for appointments or when I'm bored, etc but decided to also add it to another website for online study as well as upload the list itself for anyone to use freely as they want. 

*One might try to argue that sensory acuity is not just knowing terms, and this is correct. However, once a rep system is identified it helps to have a list of terms in our memory bank that are associated with the identified rep system. This is not to develop sensory acuity but to expand OUR OWN sensory vocabulary.*

------------------------------------------------------------------
**For droids:** http://studydroid.com/index.php?page=studyPack&amp;packId=317314 

(note: this requires the *studydroid* app)

---------------------------------------------------------------
**For online study:** http://quizlet.com/11827873/sensory-acuity-flash-cards/ 

(note: the format of this website kind of sucks, so I'm supplying the list of terms if you have a better alternative you wish to use)

-------------------------------------------------------------------
**The list itself:** 

**.txt Format:** http://www.mediafire.com/?3ux0z06f4ceoevn

**Pastebin Format:** http://pastebin.com/RbAGrYD7

-------------------------------------------------------------------

**When using the online study version** you're going to have to do the following once it loads for proper/normal studying:

1. Uncheck ""Both Sides""

2. Check ""Term Frist""

3. Click ""Shuffle""

4. Study

-------------------------------------------------------------------
**Here's a list of descriptive words:** http://www.msgarrettonline.com/descripwords.html",pickup
"[FR] LEGENDARY'S EPIC: PIZZACLOSE, KCLOSE, @_@","PRELUDE:

I finished my school for the day. I called up one of the girls that I #-closed a couple of weeks back. She told me that, ""Look, I don't want to date anymore. I respect that you opened me with such bravery and courage but I don't feel it anymore."" I thanked her for being straight up and honest.

I respected the hurt feeling and let it sift through my mind.

-----

THE EPIC:

After a few minutes, I decided to call HBsnakeeyes. After talking on the phone for 5 minutes, we decided to meet up like 5 minutes later.

After we meet up she tries to talk to me about her issues. I had to posture on top of her a couple of times to make sure I wasn't going to go the friend route because I really liked this girl.

After about 5 more minutes, we enter **deep hypnotic rapport** where I tell her that I create opportunities for giving honest, raw emotions. Then something happens where a guy comes up to us and gives us a newspaper: it said, ""giving is better than receiving"" She looked at me and laughed and smiled and @_@. She walks and stops when I walk and stop.

Then I talked to her about how everyone should see the world in a metaphysical light and then all of a sudden there was a guy playing violin next to us. So she told me she liked it. We sat down next to a running shop. She @_@ because she loved violins and told me ""Did you create that?"" Then I stare at her for a long time and then kissed her on the cheek.

Then I told her. I don't make it myself but I let the opportunity for it to be created. @_@

I said to her that I was a runner. 5 minutes more of metaphysical talk which I was truly honest about, runners start popping up. She looks at me like I am a creator of something @_@ I say, ""I give opportunity to make people feel and feels are important""

Then I see a safe alleyway where no one is. I walk her to it. We both stop and I tell her, you always have control of your own life and feelings...*go in for the kiss* We kiss for a bit.

We walk and she starts saying feels and stuff. She wants to buy me a cookie and then last minute I change it to pizza. **She gets me HP10.**

After pizza, I tell her about why I do what I do and how I do it. I tell her that I want to create honest magic, magical moments, and feelings because people feel amazing and want to feel great. She wrote down notes @_@

Afterwards, we chatted for 30 more min with the @_@ and walked around. She ended up meeting her group where @_@ was broken but I introduced myself and luckily she went off to call someone. I followed her and told her I had to go, we hugged and kissed and she told me thank you for today.

------

I'll give the pic to the mods on a bit.

Thank you to everyone who helped me and listened to me, no words can express the gratitude.

Edit: I changed my pacing and tonality to fast when talking about facts and non-attraction stuff and then slowed down when @_@ Cheers",pickup
"[FR] - Meetup, Day 2 ish.","Ran into HBEngineer last week. I had met her towards the end of last quarter. We kicked it a couple of times last quarter in groups, and she seemed pretty chill. I had asked a couple of times for lunch or coffee, but she could never make it and never offered a reschedule. I ended up getting busy and didn't see any effort to follow up.

When I ran into her I got a fairly warm response. We talked for about 5 mins, then I told her it was good running into her, and that I'd like to see her again. She agreed, I told her I'd call since I had to get to class. We worked out logistics over the weekend, and met up today.

I shot her a confirmation text about 10 mins before we were supposed to meet, and she gave a pretty cold response, saying she only had about 20 mins. 

She was still cold and displaying fairly closed body language when we met. She starts talking about her bike getting stolen over the weekend. I'm thinking ""wtf... how do I deal with this?"" Then she says ""I like to just think that it was stolen by roaming gypsies though. At least it's helping someone that way."" I hook to that, expand the roaming gypsy frame, and transition to a role-play about joining a wandering band of bike-thief gypsy-folk. Years of running D&amp;D games (telling ridiculous stories on the fly) combined with some Player Approved Mechanics suddenly paid off. She opens up her body language and starts to get a bit warmer. We've been kicking it for about 2-3 minutes now.

About 10 minutes in I've been building on the connection and she makes some geeky reference to her engineering major, and I drop my pitch a bit, slow down ""oh my god, talk nerdy to me"" while maintaining strong eye contact and smirking. She looks a bit puzzled, and says ""wait, I can do that?"" while giving me @_@ eyes. Fuck yes you can. She starts spitting math equations at me. I grin a bit more, lean in a bit and say ""stop it, you getting me excited."" She goes red, tries to hide a smile and looks away. I fade back and let it hang for a bit, then segue into another topic. She's gotten a lot warmer at this point.

Soon she has to bail, and I had to finish a paper anyway. I tell her I'd like to see her again, logistics don't really mesh for the next week and a half, but she said she wants to get together again next weekend.

By employing the skill set I've been working on, I managed to turn what I had written off as a lost cause into a genuinely cool interaction. She went from cold to warm fairly quickly, and I opened a sexual frame. I've got a good foundation to work with when I see her again.",pickup
A note about goals,"So I decided to take a moment to point out a couple of things that I really want to take hold in my brainbox.

Heading out to the gym last night I didn't really want to go at all. I was tired, a bit hungry, and a bit deterred. I had originally set out to break 200lbs on the bench press in college, a goal while totally achievable at the time (I was going 5 days a week at 5 am, with a State Trooper/Collegiate level wrestler as my trainer) was never realized. I was 21, had never been in the gym before, and as a result was at my lowest weight in a while (something that I am currently trying to achieve again) and I had just begun running for the first time, which I hated then and still do now.

Never-the-less, as I approached the gym on a cloudy spring evening, after having a long day at work, and lacking the motivation to do basic cardio, which I now realize should be my next goal, I began to notice that if I pushed myself today. Just a little bit, I could destroy my own belief that I was weaker than I actually was. A brief bit of backstory due to specific attempt I am talking about:

&gt;I had begun to lift weight again, about 3 months ago with a buddy of mine from college, who I hadn't seen in a few years. It was a good place to be, and I enjoyed having the companionship. Lately though, we had been pushing hard, and I burned out, missed the gym all for but maybe twice a week the past month. That was falling short, and I placed the blame mostly on the fact that my buddy couldn't make it out, and when he did, I didn't give my all (he is training to be a fire fighter, and as such, does a lot of cardio), culminating in me falling off a treadmill, in this case the proverbial horse, and not getting back on since. Looking back that was mostly due to carelessness and not respecting the machine, or my body. A week after that, I thought I had broken my goal, until a bit of research (something again bred from carelessness) I found I was still 20lbs short, I didn't go the gym for two weeks.

Getting back into the groove had proven hard, especially flying solo this time. Luckily, after heading into the locker room, I saw my co-worker and his buddy, we decided to work together today, and wait the rotation on the machines upstairs. Down at the bench press, no one wanted to do it, but they agreed if I went first they would assist, and also give it a shot themselves. Since the attention was on me, and I enjoy that, I agreed.

5 reps, 1000lbs pushed away from the Earth later, I had achieved my goal. It's weird now that I look back on it, that so many factors bothered me about even trying, and even odder that I would (still) let myself stand in the way. Be it, due to something unimportant to the goal, such as my weight. Or due to something that was tangible, but negligible, such as being a little stressed from work.

Goals are not for setting. Goals are for setting, then breaking.

Here's to running a mile in 7 minutes. See you guys out there.

~Obscuro
",pickup
Questions Regarding Our Ethics,"Hey boys, got some quick questions and deep shit from M1n1True here. Let's preface this with a quick disclaimer: This isn't to cause strife, it isn't to accuse anyone of anything.. It's legitimate questions that a buddy presented to me that I need to meditate on and think about as I think we all should.

**1. Manipulation:** If person A manipulates person B, an open, honest, and equal relationship cannot be attained because it places person A above person B or even gives person A power over B. My friend would argue that handshake inductions, power of suggestion, and our general @_@ are manipulation. Obviously, manipulating another human being is wrong. The risk that is then being taken is the possibility of people coming here to use these things for the wrong reasons (he would indicate that even the title suggests not ""building relationships"", but ""pickup"")... Now, don't get me wrong. I think we've got a damn good community and I've said it before, but I feel like we should be able to answer these questions without feeling threatened and that they're worth asking.

**2. Honesty, openness, vulnerability:** He thinks it's awesome, I can agree that if the world operated with these values then it'd be a better place. However, his concern arises from our value of honesty, openness, and vulnerability while we also suggest reading books on hypnosis as well as teaching tricks that use quirks of the human mind to advance our own aims (handshake induction, other @_@ methods). He feels that these are unethical and that it's impossible to be honest, open, and vulnerable while using these sorts of things.. Now, here's where it's interesting from my point of view. I don't personally take issue with @_@, but the question is legitimate. 

I've been with you guys lurking, posting, and in the IRC. You're my buddies and you've been there to support me.. You have no idea how grateful I am of that. These questions haven't deterred me from our community, but answering them would strengthen my connection to pickup even more. *Please* don't take this as something to provoke conflict. View it instead as food for thought and something to meditate on. 


Stay real, gents.


***
**Update:** My roommate is considering posting responses. If he does, it will be my username and flagged with ""Roommate"" or something to that extent at the start.. If he does this, he's only going to be trying to hold an intelligent discussion as you guys have all been doing great with. He doesn't want to upset anyone and his biggest concern is that he would do that by responding.",pickup
PAF Is The Shit,"Sup playas, just wanted to chime in and bump a cool resource in the TOK that not a lot of people are talking about, [**Player Approved Fitness.**](http://www.reddit.com/r/pickup/comments/qxaxv/playerapproved_fitness_paf_getting_jacked_swoll/) I've only done this twice, and I'm already noticing results that are so good, it's addicting. 

We're all working on our mental issues and inner-game, which is great, but we've also got to give room to focus on our bodies as well. One of the quickest ways to start feeling good is by working out. Those endorphins, those results, those feels. They all combine together as a boost. ***A sound soul = a sound body and sound mind.*** While I've only done two sessions so far, the impact it has had was phenomenal. 

I'd like to post an excerpt from my journal on my feels and how working out has contributed to my over-all health. 

****April 30th, 2012, 1am****

I should be writing these more often. The zone that my mind wandered into was tranquil, pleasent, and ultra focused. I don't always get like this; I've never known how it felt to be calm and relaxed for more than an hour. Hell even going 5 minutes is a struggle. I feel exhausted and tired out, and the escapes I take do even more to burn me. I've tried excercising, and it was the most pleasent thing I've ever done. The impact that it had on my body mind and soul was phenominal. I felt doped up, high, and yet cerebrally sharp and aware. Aware enough and doped out enough to not care about the small unimportant things that worry me minute to minute. I felt good, really good. I felt like I had a taste of what it meant to be the alpha version of me. I was calm, cool, collected. My shoulders were back and my posture was straight. I walked like I owned the world. Women kept looking at me, and men moved out of my way. My conversations with people that day were great. I filtered out all of my beta conversational habits, and people seemed to enjoy conversing with me while I cut out the fluff. I felt respected, and I showed people respect. For the next few days after, I was opening anyone. Going into the supermarket, I would talk to the employees, say something to them to cheer up their day and restore their faith in humanity. I felt like I was giving value to people on a low level by putting a smile on their face, but not as the fun guy but rather the cool guy.

~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~

So come on guys, start working out and getting into shape. You'll thank yourself after the first work out!",pickup
"On using the word ""I"" (ctrl-f for ""power dynamics"")",,pickup
Didn't sleep last night? Early in the morning? Looking scrubby? Putting up with bitch shields? 4 limiting beliefs quashed today- how many more to go?,"I really feel like I'm starting to flood the subreddit with hella shit. Let me know if I'm getting annoying, dogs. 

So last night I didn't sleep (still haven't). First all-nighter of my college career. Got wired as hell off some mickey D's tea (seriously, I bought a TON of their unsweetened tea to get me through the night), and caught a 10-minute power nap on a library couch before heading off to breakfast, unshowered and wearing the same beater and jeans I've worn for three days in a row now (Don't worry- they don't smell TOO bad). 

So when I get to the school cafeteria, I see this lovely indian HB9. Funny story - I've seen her at least 5 different times on campus, and each time she shot me a huge, beaming smile. Sexy as fuck. Each time I didn't approach, and I felt mega shitty. I approached her, and told her exactly that. Keeping it short (my new favorite thing), about a minute passes and I ask her if she's down to hang out sometime- after all, there's only like 10 days left of the semester. She says ""I dunno what we're gonna do, but alright"" and **I number-close**. I don't know what we're gonna do either- but I'll call her later tonight. Any ideas? 

Anyway, I eject from the cafeteria and move down to a bench outside. I see a couple random girls and just tell them ""I don't know you, and I'll probably never see you again, but I think you're really cute"" and ejected. **Try this if you want some low-risk practice with PAM.** I eventually see a pair of twins, tell myself ""YOLO,"" and go in for the approach. It was fun, but didn't go anywhere - NBD. We were just three strangers having an awesome moment, and that's all that matters. Did I really think I was gonna get a threesome out of the deal anyway? I mean, they WERE catholic, but....

Anyway, onto my favorite approach of the morning. I give up on approaching and start walking to class. I'm almost in my building when I see this dark-skinned (maybe latina?) smoking-hot HB9 walking my way, and I immediately say 'hey.' I'm kinda at a loss for words, so I decide to get real with her and tell her exactly that. ""This is pretty crazy, cause I don't even know what to say right now. I just find you incredibly attractive."" She's receptive as hell, and throws a little shit back at me, and I play along. At one point I notice she's got a real sexy (IMO) Texan accent, and immediately ask her where she's from. This entire interaction was really fast-paced (I was wired, still am), and I'm honestly impressed that she could keep up with me. But there we were, going back and forth, playing the push-pull game like naturals. After about 45 seconds of walking, I stop and suggest that we take a risk and hang out sometime. YOLO is the phrase of the day. She nearly instinctively says ""Yes, I'll give you my number,"" and I **number close**. Boss moves, dog. She was pretty damn fine too. I'd like to see if she's good in the saddle, true Texan style.  

Another approach that is really worth mentioning **JUST** happened. Walking around the library looking for a computer, I see this dime of a black girl on a computer. I come up to her and say ""hey."" She doesn't move. I know she heard me. I said ""Hey"" again, and she *very deliberately* turns her head to face me and gives me a **death glare.** That kind of glare that makes bigger man than I tuck their tails between their legs and run. The kind that very blatantly says ""Who the fuck are you, and what the fuck do you want?"" But I don't back down. I pause for a second, look at her, laugh a little to myself, and tell her ""I can see that look in your eyes. You're looking at me like ""what the fuck, who's this fuckin guy that I don't even know just coming up to me, interrupting my studying, holding a bunch of fuckin random newspapers and a coffee. I see that shield you got up."" As I continue, I notice a smile start to break out across her face, and she starts laughing/blushing. There go her vitals... aaaaand she's been disarmed. Taking advantage of the situation, I drop my voice to an almost sexual tone and say ""don't worry. I just wanted to come over here and tell you I thought you were pretty, you know? You don't have to put up your shield like that,"" with a little bit of laughter at the end. I don't remember if she said anything, but I saw a ""thank you"" in her eyes. I asked for her name, and commented on the fact that she has the same name as my sister. I closed up nicely, and ejected. Maybe I could've even number-closed her too, but I'm honestly just glad that I successfully disarmed my first hardcore bitch shield- using the #pickup-espoused technique of honesty. 

So let me run through these limiting beliefs, in case you didn't pick them up:

**You CAN** successfully interact with women when:

**1. You're running on absolutely zero sleep.**

**2. It's before 9am.**

**3. You're wearing the same scrubby clothes you've worn for the past three days.**

**4. You're dealing with an intense bitch shield.**

Hope this inspires some player-approved action! Tell me what you think! ",pickup
"Public transit approaches, easiest daygame you'll find outside of college","**Where do you daygame if you're not in college? Public transit.** I get ~95% of all my #'s from girls I approach at train/bus stations. So, fellow nerds, let's bust out the stats.
 
**Pro's:**
 
* Girls you will never see again if you don't approach (+2 incentive +2 fate)
* Girls you will never see again if you fuck up (-1 regret -1 anxiety)
* You're going somewhere (+1 fate -2 creepiness)
* Lots and LOTS of people if you pick rush hours (+3 variety +2 combo)
* Tons of interesting people to talk to and befriend (+2 state +1 social circle)
* Easy to build rapport as nobody else is doing this (+3 @_@)
* Gets you out of the house to meet friends/go out (+1 social circle +1 state)
 
**Con's:**
 
* Hard to insta-date due to time frame (-2 consistency)
* Almost impossible to k/f-close on the same day due to time frame (-3 critical hit)
 
Public transit is an all-you-can-approach speed-dating buffet, *but you're the only one that knows*. There are four different kinds of situations in which you will want to approach differently (let me know if I missed one). I will get into those later on but here are some general things first.
 
* If she's wearing earbuds/headphones, do the motion of ""taking them out/off"" of your own ears and she will do just that. SMILE!
* If she's talking on the phone, either wait or don't approach at all. That would just be rude and your first impression would suck.
* See something interesting about her? Might be a good indirect opener if you can't muster up the courage for PAM.
* Assess the situation before approaching a girl on a 30minute+ ride. If you run out of steam you're stuck with her for that duration.
* Approaches should preferably be done when either of you has the chance to split in case it goes bad.
* Try to stay/walk/sit beside her instead of in front of her
* If she seems to be in a hurry limit the time frame to something appropriate (Hey I only got a minute...)
 
**1. At the station, girl walking towards you:**
 
Try to establish eye contact, smile and hold it but don't stare her to death. Now slow down your pace the closer she gets, she will most likely slow down too. Imagine that she's a friend and you're meeting each other by chance. That's it, now open.
 
**2. At the station, girl walking in front of you:**
 
Catch up with her (hit the gym if you can't), don't get too close yet and tip her on the shoulder, STAY BESIDE HER AND NOT IN FRONT OF HER. Open.
 
**3. On the train/bus, open body language:**
 
You're both trapped and as such there is no choice for her to leave if she really wanted to. If you notice eye contact, an open body language or other signals then I suggest you go for it and just approach in the train/bus. Godspeed to you, young pickup warrior, you're playing the game on hard. As for the guys who aren't that confident or on a long ride. You will either want to catch her right before you or she gets off OR immediately outside at the station (see #1 or #2).
 
**4. On the train/bus, closed body language:**
 
Careful, this one can hurt if approached while she doesn't have an escape route. I really suggest doing the second part of #3 here but if you're crazy enough to disreguard that, good luck.
 
 .
 
 .
 
And there you have it. Public transit daygame. Easy as fuck but it leaves quite the impression. Why? Because it's **fate** who you're going to meet. Because of the limited time frame. Because nobody else is doing it. Because that girl who gave you her number will remember you, that mysterious stranger, all day long.",pickup
On being a giant puss,"Yuck... I have spent the past two days wandering about town to do some daygame and have come up with a grand total of ZERO mothafuckin approaches. Due to overnight travel for work this week, to a less than ideal place, I will not be able to get back out there til next weekend. My resolve has never been greater however. THIS SHIT WILL HAPPEN.

I have known about pickup for a long time but have been an apathetic motherfucker for a long time as well. Back in my college days I weirded some girls out going overboard with cocky and funny nonsense. When that shit arises organically, it's great, but in these instances, it was really forced and awkward and bad bad bad. Actually alienated a friend because of that bullshit and thats when I became apathetic towards pickup. But even before that, I never did cold approaches save a few drunk (meaning DRUNK not buzzed) ones here and there... mostly used it on chicks I met at parties in college. Pickup taught me to close pretty decently but I could never open for shit, and if you can't open, you can't close very often.

Even in my apathetic period, I read about game here and there, never acting on it... I discovered direct game and really learned to appreciate it as genuine and honest and open, as opposed to the phony indirect stuff that really comes from insecurity more than anything. I read a number of direct game ebooks, most of which advocate some variation of the PAM approach, and thought it was a great idea, but never did anything.

It was THIS community that cured my apathy. (thanks.) So, I went out this weekend and wandered around various dime-rich locales, spotting various dimes, but stopping myself before approaching said dimes. I refuse to label myself with the term ""approach anxiety"" because that sounds like some kind of a disease, like all the alcoholics who want to blame a 'disease' for their problems. I prefer the more scientific term ""being a gigantic pussy.""

One thing I fucking love is the idea that that feeling of nervousness that comes over you is YOUR BODY TELLING YOU TO ACT. When you think about it, it makes perfect sense... you don't get that feeling when the approach is impossible. If a chick is holding hands with her bf you aren't gonna get that feeling... you only get that feeling when the approach is *perfectly motherfucking possible.* So if you get that feeling you need to GO! I've been walking around enjoying that feeling the past two days, relishing it... but I haven't yet conditioned myself to the proper response yet I suppose.

What I do is, I make all kinds of excuses and wait for the perfect moment:

-She is looking at the products on the shelf at the store, I can't approach her from behind because thats all weird n shit.

-She is facing the wall at the table in Starbucks.

**-There is other people who would hear me spittin my game. (This is a big one for me it freaks me out)**

-She is too far away I'd have to walk at a brisk pace to catch her and tap her on the shoulder from behind. 
That's all weird n shit.

-She's looking at her phone.

-She's got headphones on.

-Didn't make eye contact

-She's with her less attractive friend. I don't want to ruin her friend's day by approaching her in front of her friend.

-She's not hot enough

-I've been at this store too long, I need to get out of here, the employees are weirded out by me. 

A few times, the perfect moment arrives, none of these excuses apply, but I wait anyways, because there could be a more perfect moment. So I blow it. What I need to do is to stop thinking and dust off the old 3 seconds rule. plus that's from mystery, the greatest and most goldly mPUA in the whole universe, the man who is so good at card tricks he could literally fuck any girl ever, so you know dat shit is fo real.

Do me a favor guys: post your most ridiculous approaches that violate as many of my excuses as possible, to unwire my shitty beliefs. aka ""I was driving and saw her walking down the street so I found a parking space, got out, followed her 3 blocks running full speed, yelled ""excuse me!!!,"" tapped her on the shoulder, gave her the PAM approach, ten people heard, and SHE FUCKING LOVED IT.""

Also, I have discovered an immutable law of dimes, I call it warmgun's law of declining dimes. If you go out on a dime safari, when you first get there there will be plenty of dimes, but if you bitch out too many times, the stream of dimes will dry up... you will walk around and there won't be a dime in sight, even though you're in an area which should normally have dimes. It happened two days in a row, it's like karma. I have of course put this law under rigorous scientific analysis and it has been determined to be 100% true in all cases. However I should note it was not possible to have a control group for this study because I was being to big of a puss to approach any dimes.

Right now, I feel disappointed, but not unmotivated. THIS SHIT WILL HAPPEN. However, I do realize I need to take advantage of my motivation NOW and do this shit before the moment passes. I know it will never be ""easy,"" but I also know that, in my case, it will get 1000% easier after I just get that first goddamn approach over with.

The thing is, most of my accomplishments have come pretty easy for me. I'm not sheltered, my life hasn't been cake, I'm going through some awfully hard times recently, death of a 16 year old cousin, a drunken dad, but they were never my fault. I walked into high school and college, did well because it was easy for me, and now I'm doing well for myself professionally since I graduated. (2 years ago) Another example... I have a quick metabolism and can eat whatever I want, while all my friends talk about running off those pounds, I don't have to worry about it. I am not saying this to brag... point is people applaud me and what not for all of this stuff, they think I'm such a hard worker, but my dirty little secret which I'll share with you all is I wasn't ever trying that hard. 

WOMEN, that's the thing where I'm going to have to break that pattern. I feel that in this way cold approach can teach me a lot more about life than just getting chicks... it will teach me what it is to really want something, and work, and get it. If I keep doing the same shit, I'm going to get the same results... which have been incredibly sporadic and lacking my entire life because I'm in a shell. Cold approach will get me out of that shell.

Hopefully this hasn't read like another cliche ""waah waah waah I have 'approach anxiety' "" post but there is probably a lot of lurkers going through this so count this post as on behalf of all of them. I am also posting this so that I have a stake in this community because that is what is going to keep me motivated and involved.

**TL;DR** Spent all weekend walking around trying to approach but ended up with a fat zero. Not giving up though, THIS SHIT NEEDS TO HAPPEN AND THIS SHIT WILL HAPPEN, AND I AM GOING TO KEEP SPENDING MY WHOLE GODDAMN WEEKEND WALKING AROUND TIL IT DOES. ",pickup
"DANTERING SAYS: KEEP HER FOCUSED ON HER FEELS, NOT HER THINKING",,pickup
[FR] M1n1true battles through AA and puts some PAM to use.,"Excited to be posting my first FR, gents, but my thoughts might be a bit crazed and long-winded. Bear with me!


**Friday**: There's not much to tell about Friday, but it sets the stage. It was a chill night and I just wound up hanging with a few buddies in our dorm. At like 2:00AM we get a call that one buddy's girlfriend has a car full of girls that need escorts home. See, it's sort of one of our things that we don't let girls walk home alone at night.. So we meet them in the parking lot and pretty much pair off. I wind up with this HB9 or even 10 who looked like Blake Lively. I chat her up but I'm a bit off and out of state because I'm tired and caught off guard. I get her to her dorm and she hugs me goodnight and thanks me for the walk.. I don't get her number, and the feeling is far worse than any rejection. I mention to my buddy's girlfriend (also a close friend of mine) that if she can somehow make my path cross again with this girl's I won't miss another opportunity. Unfortunately, she isn't receptive of setting that up. Whatever, I decide I'll make up for it the next night.


**Saturday**: I started Saturday evening with some meditation-- I've been trying to do that more lately. After that, I got ready to head to my first first toga party and I went out with Friday's cold feet in mind. We hit the party around 10:45 and it's pretty solid. People aren't really dancing, but they're on the dance floor. I grab a drink (the only one I have that night, because I don't want to operate on a crutch) and head out into the fray with a couple buddies. I saw a cute blonde but got in my own head, so I told my buddy to give me shit if I hadn't approached in the next 20 minutes. I approached and went with the direct open, to which I got what I believe was a polite decline. I know now that she has a boyfriend, though.. So we're hanging out at the party and it's getting sort of lame. People leave the dance floor, a lot of people leave the party, but I'm pretty determined to still have a good time.. It's between 12:00 and 12:30 that a friend and cutie that my buddy is after (Girl A) walks in with her friend B. B is pretty damn cute, and we work some small talk in. 

Fast forward a bit, and my buddy is dancing with A. I tell B ""Hey, I bet we can do better. Let's make em jealous."" so we head out and start having a good time dancing. Girl A sees B, and B is workin it so A starts to get more intense, then B mirrors, and so on.. They wound up competing. Around 1:25 I said ""At 2:00, I'm gonna kiss you."" 

B: 2:00? That's like 45 minutes..

Me: 35, yep!

B: Think you can last that long?

Me: *I* can. Can you?


She's going nuts. She's grinding hard and teasing hardcore (kissing my neck, getting really close to actually kissing me but not doing it) and I do the same right back. She's going nuts, and I've having a damn good time. Come 1:59, I go ""Guess what time it is."" And take her chin like I'm gonna kiss her.. She doesn't fall for it: she checks the time and sees I nearly tricked her into being the one who caved.. Oh well, it was worth a shot to give her shit hah. Anyways, 2:00 hits and she goes nuts and we start making out.. The rest of the night was crazy dancing, making out, and pretty much just talking and having a good time.

I got her number at the end of the night and set up a date with her for Wednesday using some PAM texting methods from Pure_Ambition's [texting thread](http://www.reddit.com/r/pickup/comments/sxhxc/playerapproved_texting_examples_for_the_most_part/). Thanks for that, man. All in all, it was a night very unique for me and it was definitely a display of how this community has helped me. Thanks for that, all. Keep doing what you're doing.",pickup
"RE:Tok2:  I'm OK You're OK Book Report by Vitamin 
Dook","**I'm OK, You're OK** by Thomas Harris is probably the most famous and mainstream of the TOK2 books, except possibly Games People Play, which is another transactional analysis book.  I personally found Games People Play a little complicated, so I thought I'd try to read the easier to read (Note: Easier to read does not equal dumbed down) I'm OK, You're OK. Which is basically an introduction to Transactional Analysis ""disguised"" as a self-help book.

The thesis is basically:
We have three *ego states*, all of which are created in the first 5 years of our life, two of which manifest themselves throughout our entire life, and one (The Adult) that can be strengthened throughout our entire life,  they are as such:

* The Parent: Recorded from the orders given by parental figures, ""Do this, don't do this, it's right to do this, one shouldn't do this, these people are this way, we should act this way.""

* The Adult: From age 10 months, we start developing hte ability to analyze the world through reality and our own perceptions of it. The Adult starts out very weak and is usually beaten back by the Parent or Child. When we start having independent social experiences, we begin to make our own distinctions, which is what causes inner turmoil when our Adult perceptions are at odds with our Parent or Child data. We can strengthen the Adult by logically analyzing the Parent and Child data. 
* The Child: The behaviours we've learned as children, this can vary from person to person obviously, but some Child behaviors include looking at the floor, having outbursts, being cute in order to get favor, and so on. There are two subtypes of child, the natural child (the one that's pure expression and exploration) and the adapted child (the one that respodns to the Parent)

With these three ego states in mind, we can begin to analyze social interactions. Interactions between paralel ego states can conitnue endlessly and usually ""work"" well,   if you're in a Parent ego state and talking to someone in a Child ego state, the conversation is complementary and can carry on forever. If you're in a Parent ego state and talking to someone elses Parent ego state (most commonly seen in two people bitching about the system\the service\""the way things are"") the conversation could go on forever, even though it's devoid of ""actual content.""

""Mis-communication"" according to TA happens when the wires get crossed (It's difficult to describe this without showing the diagrams, sadly),  for example if I'm in a Parent Ego state and I'm talking to you like a child, and you're in an adult ego state, our conversation wouldn't be able to continue for long (""The service here is shit! In my day waiters had some damn respect""  (Parent) ""It's only been 5 minutes."" (Adult)"" 

Obviously we aren't usually in one ego state all the time, but there are things that ""hook"" our ego states. There are some situations that cause us to ""Go Parent,""  and maybe they happen a lot, I'm sure I've known people that Go Parent every time they drive to work, for example, and spend the entire trip complaining about the other drivers and pedestrians. 

Which leads the book to the next big topic, the 4 life postions:

* I'm not OK, you're OK: The most common held position, it comes from the sad fact that as children we're two feet tall, weak, uncordinated, and at the mercy of 5-6 foot tall giants that are very assured of themselves.  At around age 2, we come to the conclusion I'm not OK, You're OK,  this doesn't mean we're raised poorly, rather as a byproduct of the human condition. This is the most common 

* I'm not ok you're not ok: When you developed the ""I'm not ok"" feelings as described above,  AND your parents were complete trash.

* I'm ok you're not: When your parents were so shitty you learned how to lick your own wounds, by giving yourself ego strokes (as discussed in this pastebin: http://pastebin.com/LtTUgwyu  

* I'm OK You're OK: This is the shit! Unlike the first 3 life positions you fall into, this is when you make the concious and verbal designation that you're OK. 

Life positons are not feelings, you don't wake up feeling Not OK and then feel everyones OK at dinner and then go home and feel Not OK again. Rather they're standings that you can conciously change.  The main the way book suggests to do this is to strengthen your Adult and begin to recognize the games you fall into. (Although, I feel it's obvious to say there are other ways to re-evaluate your feelings of OKness, books like Prometheus Rising\Angel Tech, Re-framing, etc.)

The book holds that games (which are discussed briefly in IMOKYOUREOK but are discussed more in Games people play) all stem from the feelings of ""not ok-ness"" and keep us from true intimacy with ourselves and others.  The author believes all games stem from the intial ""Mine is better than yours"" game; I don't feel OK, but I've got the most power ranger action figures. 

The book proposes the best way to break from the games, and enter the OK-Zone (as I like to call it) is to strengthen your adult, by using your Adult to analyze situations more often.  ""Why is my parent beating on my child?"" could be a question you ask yourself to utilize your Adult to analyze your situation. Another method suggested is to count to 10 to give your adult time to process the Parent and Child data, instead of acting on emotional impulse. 


Most of the value of the book is in the first 120 or so pages, when it describes the ego states, the life positions, and examples of. Afterwards are chapters about using PAC in children, retarded children, and Teenagers, which are interesting and provide more examples, but didn't really blow my mind. 

All in all it's not a bad book, it will get you up to speed with TA, and if you felt Games People Play was a little too technical, this one will help put it into perspective by helping you get acquainted with the TA jargon.",pickup
My Friday FR Report [Talk to everyone],"Hey /r/pickup, My name is Hypnotonic and here is a little background information before I get started. I am twenty, quite young, and I have been studying and practicing my seduction skills for about 6-7 months now, but the last 5 months is when I really started honing in.

I’ve done quite a few approaches, but recently coming back from a 2 months “relationship” (if that is what you want to call it) put me out of practice and fucked with my mind.

Now that the background information is done, I will be discussing my most recent Friday Night (the 27th of April). I attend a CSU down here, and we recently had a school event. It was comparable to an outside club/carnival type of event; and there were many individuals attending.

First arriving I meet up with two of my friends, one is known as B-Cera and the other we shall call M. Essentially we had Approach Anxiety for a good hour. It was ridiculous because B-Cera and I truly wanted tonight to be fantastic approach wise; and really break barriers we never could before.

First Approach: I, Hypnotonic, opened a set of two girls waiting in line behind us. I ask the girl for her hat because everyone seemed to have one but me. She lends it to me and I wear it and say something along the lines of “And now it is mine”. Now her reaction in my mind was definitely different and better then reality, and she just gave me a glare. I gave her hat back and realized she could not take a joke. Now most would consider this a failure. I do not believe in failure; this was a learning experience and it definitely was a nice little warm up because after I felt “Well as terribly as that went…I am still alive and nothing bad has come from this”.

Second Approach: We move into the “Casino” Room, and M and I decide to really put me in the mood, why not do karaoke. It was only us who had signed up and I talked to M that we need some girls with us. He agreed, and that’s when I really hit the zone. Every cute girl I came across; I told them that M and I were looking for some cute faces and sexy voices to join us for karaoke. This melted so many female minds, and we ended up having a good amount of volunteers. Now this is where it gets interesting. I spot a really cute latina girl, definitely around my age, and I told her she’s cute and we would be delighted if she join our epic karaoke session. She was nervous but agreed to it. As we get up on stage, I decide to establish Kino by wrapping my arm across her shoulder establish Kino Expressive Level 1. As the song became more intense, and as people turned their attention to our awesome selves, I then moved my arm to wrap around her waist; and she mirrored. At the end we talk a bit, and by talking, I mean I asked her one closed and open ended question and she ended up telling me a good amoung about herself. I then said “hey look, your cute and seem to be really chill but my friends and I are going to move on to another spot. I would love to run into you at school and we can chill and get to know each other more. Lets exchange numbers yeah?”. Bam done. She grabbed my phone, put her number in, even went as far as calling her cellphone with it. #-Close. PS: My friends tell me as I walked away, she looked at me and smiled. Fuck yeah.

The rest of the night was just approach after approach and most of them were successful in establishing fun for the group. But I will just talk about my very first “Group Approach” by myself. We were waiting in line, and I notice this cute Asian looking girl eyeing me and I was reciprocating as well. I noticed her whole group had these glow jewelry stick objects on them and I walked up and said “Wow, I am quite jealous of all your glowing jewelry”. The Asian girl then immediately says “They are awesome, would you like to have mine”. Instant IOI. I engaged the whole group, asked them a couple questions so they would start and continue their own conversation without me needing to “interview them”. My line starts moving forward and I tell them I have to depart. They all wave bye and say it was awesome/nice meeting me. Etc. I probably “should” have # -closed the Asian girl; but I made their night and they help made mine; so fair enough trade.

The rest of the night was about the same as the group approach. Just me walking up, introducing, socializing. It was a fantastic night. Got 1 #-close, going to call her Monday to establish a “insta-date” that day (as it seems she is either not texting me or just does not have it, but regardless a phone call is always better). Made about 6-7 approaches and all but one successful in terms of actual reciprocation of positive feelings.

So as my final words for this FR: When you are at a social event. Talk to EVERYONE. I mean you will meet some really cool people, and maybe even “click” with some. It will help you display higher-value among everyone as well as just up your mood and allow you to have even more of a blast.

TL;DR: Awesome Friday Night. Made more approaches in a single night then I have ever done before. One number close and a lot of new friends made. ",pickup
Took 2 hours to go from meeting a stranger to making out. A @_@ night.,"Yo. So there's this girl that I met at the beginning of last semester that one of my friends was into. I only remember her because he was really torn up when things didn't work out, but it's been so long that it doesn't matter. The other day I saw her and shot her a big smile- she returned the favor, giving me a sexy librarian look. 

So enter tonight. I was chilling in IRC trying to figure out something to do when I see this chick's on Facebook chat. I say 'fuck it' and send her a message- what's the worst that can happen? [Here](http://pastebin.com/ZtrKmpGf) is the conversation transcript (please excuse the shitty formatting). I prematurely asked her to hang out, and when it didn't work out I switched tactics- I mindfucked her a little bit, and then asked her to hang out again. She was down. 

So we met and kicked it. I acted a fool, climbing up shit and acting a little crazy- I gave no fucks. [Check it out.](http://sphotos.xx.fbcdn.net/hphotos-prn1/552872_2778082631779_1849555306_1717515_1675391665_n.jpg) After a few, we end up talking about deep shit. We were sitting on a bench, and when the conversation went in that direction I sat Indian-style facing her. She mirrored. I gave her the sexy eyes the whole time she was talking, looking at her like 'damn I want to fuck you.' I even had some help, because bugs kept landing on her, and I'd gently remove them PA-style. At one point, after removing a bug from her hair, she joked around saying ""sometimes I wonder if you're just doing that so you could touch me."" I replied by saying ""Haha, you know... That could be true. But it wouldn't matter.... would it? *(lightly brushes my finger against her chin, and tilts her face so it's facing me)* Because... I bet... *(looking at her lips, scooting a little closer)* you like it... don't you?"" She replied with a ""yes,"" and we moved in for the makeout. 


After that, I fucked myself over by inadvertently breaking rapport. I tried to escalate later and got rejected- but that doesn't matter. 

What matters most from this interaction is twofold:

**1. We all have the ability to escalate successfully, in a sexy and player-approved fashion.**

**2. When we hold beliefs about what's appropriate in an interaction and what's not, we're limiting ourselves.** XMP mentioned it in a podcast - examples could be beliefs like ""It's awkward and weird to approach women at the gym"" et cetera- that's holding you back from meeting potentially awesome people at the gym. So in this context, if I had had the limiting belief that ""There's no way I could get a woman to make out with me after knowing her for two hours unless it was in a club,"" then I would've never had this experience. **Recognize** these limiting beliefs, and extinguish them. People love to have new experiences, so if you can pull off an interaction in a non-typical context, you'll be astounding by the incredible moments you can create. In a nutshell, **go first.** 

**TL;DR** read the fucking title, asshole",pickup
"[FR] Wingmom, k-close, and some text game.","[Some Easy listening](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=QWfbGGZE07M)

---Prestory---

Late in December last year I opened a mother/daughter 2 set at a bar in the cultural street of Cannes. I thought the daughter was cute, but she was a bit older than me, so pulled a wing in, and they ended up dating. The mother took a liking to me, and told me that I would love her other, younger daughter, who was currently away on a ski season. I gave the mom my number and told her to call me when her youngest daughter was back. I have bumped into the mother a few times, and always try to make an effort to be friendly (it's good to be good to everyone). I hadn't seen her for a month or so, but this tuesday my phone rang, the youngest daughter was in town, and was keen to meet up. Not really expecting much, I head out to meet with the older sister, and my obvious target, the younger sister. I get to the bar and there she is. Spanners man, my nuts tighten up as I check out the dime who I shall be gaming. Cracking body, so casually dressed (Ripper jeans and a plain teeshirt), eyes like the ocean, and wild hair. I can't believe my luck. We'll call her SportyHB.

----FR----

I open with a kiss on each cheek (as is the fench way), then follow with the classic handshake induction. Slow and loose shaking of hands, lots of eye contact, roll my wrist so my hand is on top of hers and say ""Wow you have extremely soft hands, I find it extremely sexy when a girl looks after herself."" Normally I would lead into this sentence with a curve ball for confusion tactics, but at this stage I was speaking in english, and I wasn't sure how good the targets english was. She blushed, looked down at our hands, which I had stopped shaking, and I slowly took away my hand. She looks back up at me, and I give her my causal smirk, give her a wink (oh so not play approved), and let her know that I am heading inside to grab a drink.

I have a good level of rapport with the bar tenders at this place, which is always good for a bit of social proof, they all make an effort to come say hi, while I order. Back outside, sit down and continue general comfort and rapport with both girls. HBsporty currently was walking with a crutch due to a paraskiing accident, which was an easy point of conversation, I mirror her mannerisms and tonality while she is telling a story, and she complies by mirroring mine whilst I'm talking. After a few minutes the older sister gets up to use the bathroom, just me and HBsporty now time to hook. --BrainWave-- The  whole idea of changing your tonality and cadence when hooking is to make what you are saying seem significantly more important (or just different) from your general chit chat. I decided to try dropping tonality, slowing down my speech, *and* changing my language to French (which I am not fantastic at) for this hook. ----EndBrainWave--
We were talking about how the longer you are away from home, the less people seem to keep in touch, I follow with. ""You know what though, none of that matters (switch to french, drop tone, drop speed) what matters is here (I gesture up and outwards with both hands) and now (I point down to the ground with both hands) between me (I touch my chest with my right hand) and you (I rest my hand on her left bicep/breast area) everything is perfect. (Whilst nodding a little bit and giving my shit eating grin)."" She replies simply with a stunned ""oui"" and I say ""We should do this again sometime"", and hand her my phone. #close and hook achieved. 

The night continues, and I kino her lightly, she is receptive, but has to go after another half hour or so, we say our goodbyes, and pencil in doing dinner tomorrow. 

Next day I text her at around 3pm saying ""Hey Man (&lt;---God I'm an idiot), It's Ease. We should do dinner tonight, I finish work at 5, so I will meet you at 7."" This text is so rough and ready, and I definately wasn't expecting what happened next. She doesn't text back until 6.30pm and says ""heyyy Ease, I'm sorry but I can't tonight, i eat with my family. Maybe this weekend? Bye!!"" a bit bummed as imaginable, I head out to the restaurant, table for one styles, and enjoy the fuck out of some thai food.

I call her on friday, but she doesn't pick up, so I text her, but no reply. I head out for a bit of sarging, but end up getting asked to help pilot a small (35ft) sailing vessel round to st tropez in the middle of the night in exchange for a bottle of rum. I gladly oblige (even though I was quite drunk :S) and end up staying up all night sailing down the coast, and catching the train back in the morning. [Obligatory waking up in a cool place photo](http://i.imgur.com/EiMfG.jpg) I didn't end up going to bed (apart from 2 hours deck sleep overnight) until 3pm. I woke up around 8, jumped on IRC, and miwmiwmiw said that I woke up at the perfect time to head out. HBsportys lack of contact is pissing me off a little bit, so I give her The|Vet's text A-bomb. Fuck it, what have I got to lose ""Heyy, It was really nice meeting you Kebab Girl. You are really cute, and I would have enjoyed hanging out again, but it seems like you are really busy. All the best"" Not really expecting much (considering my last text took her 3 hours to reply to) , I head outside and chuck my shoes on. By the time my shoes are on my phone vibrates ""Hey Ease! I take a drink with my mom tonight at (irish bar) Maybe see you later? xxx"" flake avoided. I give it an hour, go and sit down for some sushi (solo style) then text her and say ""Maybe later x.""

I stop past another bar on my way to irish bar, have a pint, then decide to head off. I arrive at the irish bar and she is sitting outside with her mum and a few friends, I say hi, introduce myself to her friends. I kiss her on the cheek, and tell her it's nice to see her again. The next hour was a bit difficult for me because she was talking away in French to her friends, waaaay to fast for me to understand. I continue to escalate kino, and before long (without almost any conversation) she gets used to having my hands on her. Her body language loosens up, and she is very receptive. In all honesty, the entire night we barely spoke, but kino was there the whole time. I remain dominant body language wise and drum up conversation with some of her english/french speaking friends. 

The night continues on, and we eventually she turns her attention to me (She has just been away for 6 months, so keeps bumping into people she has to catch up with, normally I wouldn't sit there and wait while some girl barely talks to me, but I understand what coming home is like.) She is standing at this stage facing away from me, positioned between my knees as I sit on a bar stool, she leans over her shoulder and starts talking to me. I put both my hands on her hips and spin her around, so she is facing me very very closely, smile, eye contact, and then go in for the k. She reciprocates, and we end up having a very nice kiss, pull out and I say ""Sorry, I have been thinking about doing that all night."" She leans in for another kiss, which her mom notices, the mom claps and laughs, sportyHB is obviously embarrassed. 10 minutes later, the mom says she wants to leave, but that HBsporty should stay out with me, HBsporty decides to go home though. We kiss again, and she heads off, we make plans to meet up the next day.

I have just woken up to a text from her that says ""When are we meeting up? Can't wait xxxx""

Feeling player as fuck.

Thanks for reading, comments, questions, and criticism always welcomed and appreciated.

Peace, Ease. 
",pickup
Player-Approved texting examples (for the most part),"Yo, so there's a lot of advice on this board about how to text in a player-approved fashion, and that's fucking awesome. But being a visual/kinesthetic learner, I need some examples. I've stumbled through enough text game by now to get the general feel for it (although I'm nowhere near advanced/pro status), so I wanted to drop some text game as examples for y'all. You can find the texts [here.](http://imgur.com/a/nCcgd) 

First three pics are of the HB9 asian I number closed in 30 seconds yesterday. The next three are of an indian girl I number closed in a similarly short fashion at the campus gym (although not in a half-minute), and the last one was a 3-4 minute approach that I hung out with last week. 

Notice how during each first text I recognize and vocalize how I felt about the interaction in a genuine fashion- **always** do that in a first text. Every moment and interaction is inherently significant - creating incredible moments requires that you vocalize how you feel. 

Furthermore, I always ask if a girl is down to hang out later when I number-close, so hanging out is already implied. That's why usually I won't even wait for her to reply the first time before asking for logistics. Keep in mind that **if you two have already established that you intend to hang out sometime, you can go straight into logistics from the first text.** 

Let me know what you think dudes!!

*Notes: I haven't got laid with any of these girls. So this isn't a how-to-get-laid guide- just how to get a follow-up date with a girl you just met and not get flaked on. It's up to YOU to handle that follow-up date in a player-approved way so that you can get laid. Or just have fun, if that's what you're looking for.*

*Also-- Everyone has a different texting style. I tend to use smileyfaces and 'hahahas' because it helps put the text in context. Part of the reason why texting is shitty and usually not player-approved (except for setting logistics etc), is because its so easy to be misinterpreted and flaked on. Using smileys IMO works in my favor because it's really the only way to set the tone of a message. But you can get away just fine without using them.*",pickup
"R16D SPILLS GUTS TO THROKIL: craziest night i've ever had guys, srsly.  [428L]",,pickup
Nearly perfect approach - #-closed HB9 asian in 30 seconds. I'm astounded - it was beautiful.,"Yo so today I decided to wear my sexy tank top and get the fuck out of my room around 4pm after a couple hours of class, studying and working out. To my chagrin, campus was dead (4pm on a Friday - everyone's headed out of town. There was also a big mud volleyball tournament going on). So there were very few pretty ladies to approach. 

I end up chatting with one of my homies I run into in front of the library. We're talking about random stuff when suddenly I see this DROP DEAD GORGEOUS asian girl wearing a fancy Coach bag and some of the most ridiculous platform heels I've ever seen (she was walking on cobblestone too- lawl). I immediately stop dead in my tracks and start walking towards her - forget whatever I was saying to my friend. Here's how it went:

Me: ""Hey."" (grabs her attention)

Her: ""Hello..."" (she looked like she thought I was trying to sell her something)

Me: ""Don't worry, I'm not gonna sell you anything. That guy might (points to some 
random guy), but I won't.

Me again: ""Anyway, this might sound kinda crazy. You know, here I am meeting you right now and it's kinda crazy to think about that we might never see each other again. Some people like to say that the world is a small place, and in some ways it is, but in other's it's not. I dunno, it's just kinda crazy to think about sometimes... But that doesn't matter. *(insert silent pattern interrupt before proceeding.....)* What matters is that I saw you and I thought you were *really* fucking attractive (with the lower tone &amp; slower pace), and I had to said hi."" 

Her: (Immediate blushing/laughing/smiling)... ""Are you serious?""

Me: ""Hell yeah I'm serious. Why?""

Her: ""I dunno, guys usually don't approach me in this way. It's pretty crazy.""

Me: ""Well... I'm only being honest"" (Thought this part was meh). 

Her: ""Aww thanks"" or some shit

Me: ""Well what do you think about hanging out sometime?"" (Realized I shouldn't 
have said this yet - saved my ass in the next line)

Me: ""You know, cause I don't know you. And you don't know me. But I'm willing to take a risk. What do you think?""

Her: Immediate ""Sure.""

Me: ""Alright well put your number in my phone and I'll send you a text.""

While she was putting her # in my phone, we made some small talk while I tried working a tiny bit of sexual frame. She was receptive. Got her number, ejected, and went away feeling AMAZING AS FUCK. 

As you can see, it's a really solid textbook 30second PAM approach. Sure, there were one or two things I could've left out or changed, and I almost hung myself when I suggested hanging out too early, but I made a snap decision on my feet to backtrack a little bit and got a solid number close. This was a beautiful interaction if you ask me. The closest I've come to perfect yet. 

Just goes to show - if you stay direct, open, and use a couple tricks, you can do well. Hope this helps the homies :)",pickup
[FR] My first three approaches EVER (100% noob Wall'O'Text incoming!),"Okay. Some LOONG backstory first. I'm a 19 or 20 year old virgin who has never kissed a girl in his life and hasn't had a girlfriend since probably like the 8th grade (thirteen years old). It never really bothered me THAT much until I realized that every time I thought ""Okay, this is where I get a girlfriend"", things usually went to shit. I felt desperately and inescapably single. Like the concept of me having a companion of the opposite sex who appreciates everything about me, someone that I can go on actual fucking DATES with or can have intimate physical contact with came across as a laughable concept.

Hence, my occasional lurking around ForeverAlone. (Also because I have few friends other than my coworkers and I don't get out much) Eventually, I saw a link that said ""this is spot-on!"" or some shit--it was one of XMP's Real Talks. After some detective work, I found this 'haven' of sorts--this Shangri-La of Suave, this Eden of Former Loners. This Home For Infinite Winners.

r/pickup. FAWKIN' NICE.


I went into the IRC channel where EVERYONE was cool as fuck! They directed me to the shit in the sidebar where I did a little reading. At this point, I'm like ""Fuck this. I'm going to ""approach"" a cute girl on campus tomorrow. 



Tomorrow comes. Campus is absolutely dead (the semester was 
functionally over), and the occasions I DO see a cutie pie, I flake like a little bitch and can't do it, or things just don't seem logistically correct (She's too far away and walking the opposite direction, shit like that)
Keep in mind that this is the day of my FINAL and I've barely studied, but in my head I'm like ""FUCK MY FINAL. THIS IS MORE IMPORTANT. I HAVEN'T HAD A GIRLFRIEND SINCE THE 8TH GRADE. I'M NOT GOING TO STUDY UNTIL I 'APPROACH' A HB.""



HB8 incoming. THIS HAS TO HAPPEN. 



I open a door for her, she says thanks. I let her walk in front of me to 
set the scene. Then I rush up to her.



KooC: Hello, excuse me--hello?

*HB8 turns around*

KooC: You're really pretty.

*HB8 gives me the WARMEST, MOST GENUINE smile that any random girl has ever given me! She also blushes, slightly.* 

I'm fucking shocked. Like super shocked. Then I just feel smooth than a motherfucker.

HB8: Thank you.
KooC: What's your name?
HB8: HB8. (I forget her real name!)
KooC :*bitch mode starting to resurface* Hi, I'm KooC. Nice to meet you. *shakes hand*
KooC: I just had to say it. I would hate myself if I didn't say it to you.
*HB8 giggles. I eject smoothly by walking away briskly*

Thoughts: I WISH I HAD GONE FURTHER, DAMN IT! My reasoning for NOT doing so was this: It was the semester's end, I live nowhere near school (at least not close enough to justify hanging out with this girl), and I'd rather find someone closer to home. I still regret not doing anything. 

Ways I could've improved: Held an actual conversation, discussed education. GOTTEN HER FRACKIN' NUMBER.

This was yesterday (Thursday).

Approaches number Two (failure) and Three (failure) take place today (Friday) after work. I work in a MAJOR shopping center out here and for a VERY MAJOR clothing brand. So being well-dressed is kind of my thing. I'm feeling confident. I'm feeling SEXY.

I walk through the mall, doin' just fine. I see HB6 at a mall kiosk TEXTING. I take the TEXTING to mean: ""I'm cool, you can approach me, I don't care about my job that much.""

Here's how it goes.
Kooc: *approaching confidently, yet nervously* Hi.
HB6: *not making eye contact* Hi. (She's quiet, and her tone is of the 'oh god, another douche' variety)
KooC: What are you selling here?
HB6: Sheets. (Tone indicates 'wtf does it look like I'm selling?')
KooC: Cool, well tell me about sheets. But I'm gonna warn you--I don't really want to buy any sheets. I just came to talk to you because I think you're really pretty.
HB6: (Doesn't even smile! Still no eye-contact) Oh. ('Oh' sounds like 'Oh God, it IS another douche)  Thank you. (total lack of emotion here)
*I introduce myself, ask her name, shake hands. Then try for small talk, but she doesn't seem to be having it*
KooC: So, do you make commission?
*HB6 nods*
KooC: How's business going, then?
HB6: Good. (shitty one word response)
Kooc: *trying to comment on her coldness* Hey, you're not selling to me! Come on, you're supposed to be selling!
HB6 is now angry: ""Why would I try to sell you sheets if you just told me you don't want to buy any sheets?"" 
KooC is mortified: *nervous chuckle* I'm sorry.
HB6: Yeah, it's ok.
I get the FUCK out of there and avoid that part of the mall altogether for the rest of the night.

I FUCKED UP here--First of all, I didn't make my intentions clear enough in my opinion. I should have opened with ""I know you're at work, but I feel like I should at least introduce myself since I think you're really pretty."" (For those who don't know, my ""not interested in sheets"" line is inspired by something Jim Halpert (The Office) said to a lady selling purses. Worked for him. Looking back on it, I feel like I came across as a douchey, stereotypical PUA type character. (I don't want to be a PUA--I want a girlfriend.) Also, like someone on IRC mentioned, I didn't give her much space--she's at work and can't just leave her kiosk; there's no way out for her.

Anyway, I chalked it up to a failure, though it shattered my confidence for the rest of the night and may have impacted my next attempt at an approach.


Later, after passing and ignoring an assload of HBs throughout the mall, I'm disheartened, depressed, out of my element. I want to go home. I feel like shit--like I'm not good enough. But I decide that I'm absolutely NOT going home until I at least talk to ONE more girl. (I'm SHYER THAN A BITCH. Talking to a [cute] girl is a big deal for me.)


So, I'm randomly walking, when I see a tall, latina HB9! Walking in my direction! Alone! My first fuckup was assuming that she was meeting a BF or something--She's alone and dressed up at a mall on a Friday night. I say, ""fuck it"" and approach anyway.


*Walking towards each other. HB9 is buried in her phone, texting.*

KooC: Excuse me. Excuse me!

HB9 slows down (DOESN'T STOP, this is important) she looks at me quizically.

KooC: I-uh (sheepish grin)-I think you're really pretty.

*HB9 gives me the same warm smile HB8 gave me yesterday--her teeth are beautiful!*

HB9: Aww (or Oh), thank you!

She walks away,  I walk away, and there is no further interaction.

HERE'S WHY:


We were walking towards each other, and as I stopped her, my BODY LANGUAGE indicated that I was gonna keep walking ( slightly turned away, feet still kind of moving), and naturally, so did hers. She never stopped--she simply slowed down. THIS INTERACTION TOOK LIKE 4 SECONDS TO COMPLETE. 

While I approached her with a compliment and got a warm reception, I considered this a failure because I didn't take it further. I already know how to compliment women. I need to do better than that. My body language didn't indicate ""stay here and chat with me for a while"", it indicated ""real quick, lady--I gotta tell you something.""

I still think she might have been meeting someone, but I'll never know now, will I? And even so, I came up with a decent strategy after the fact: I'd simply say, ""well I don't want to put you in an awkward position, but can I at least get your name?"" and eject gracefully.

My other issue is the sheer volume of adequate cuties I simply passed by because I was too scared to make a move. This is a serious issue with me. I'm shy around women I'm attracted to--and NOTHING ELSE. Doesn't help that unless I know you super well, I'm socially awkward and occasionally have trouble holding a conversation. I'm not ugly, however. I like to think that I'm uber handsome. Like I said, I work for a major and prestigious clothing retailer, so I'm always nice and spiffy.


Anyway, that's my story. I'd LOVE some constructive criticism on my efforts, if that's cool. Thanks for reading. (if you did)


-KooC",pickup
[FR] Follow up from club night out post,"This is a follow up with the HB6 from the club night out post here: http://www.reddit.com/r/pickup/comments/slnos/fr_club_night_out/


A lot of FRs seem to be more about approaches and talking to multiple girls, but this FR is strictly about this date (not sure if this is welcome here or not).


HB6 and I have been texting. I mentioned I have a bike (motorcycle) and asked if she's ever been on one. This topic is usually hot or cold with women. Either they're down to ride or not. With HB6, she was very excited and playfully offered me a smoothie for a ride.


A couple days ago she came over my place at night...smoothie in hand. We sat down and talked a little bit about each other. A little bit of kino (legs brushing up against one another). I just finished washing the helmet liners and gave her the task of fitting it back inside the passenger helmet I have. While I'm doing the same thing to my helmet, she's becoming more playful. We're sitting on the edge of my bed and she claimed she wanted to help me with my liner. She reaches in and unbuttons all the work I did on my helmet and I playfully shove her.


After a de-briefing about riding (for first timers), we hop on and buzz around town. We go on the highway and eventually I suggest we ride to the beach. During the ride the kino was still there a little (not sure if you can really call it kino because she's forced to hold onto me). She alternates between grabbing my waist and the top of my leg/near hip area.


Onto the beach. I park and we hit up a really nice hotel to go to the bathroom (lol). We walk back to the beach and find a spot where wooden beach chairs are all over (probably some resort's...whatever they're ours for now). She asks about some Google sky application (Sky Map) and I load it up on my phone. As we're pointing the phone to the sky, the kino is escalading. Her legs on top of mine and vice versa. As we're talking, she asks me about my career and what I do. As I start explaining, SHE goes in for the kiss. I was kind of caught off guard. I've had very few girls do this before, but I can't deny it was nice. The making out gets more intense and eventually she just hops on top of me. O.O She breaks out some slut defense line ""I don't want to hurt you"" (these wooden beach chairs didn't have any padding). I said something along the lines of ""Don't worry, I'm a strong man that can handle it"". The making out continues between our conversations about ourselves. I was in the zone. I felt that swag I haven't had in almost a year. One line that just NATURALLY came to me I won't forget. She (legit) asks ""It's getting late. What time is it?"". I reply ""It's time to kiss me"" BOSS MODE.


The night ends with more making out in my parking lot and a lot of groping. She's really keen on feeling my man goods on top of my jeans (same as from club), but this time I wasn't shy about it. As soon as she did it, I said ""That feels nice, you like what you're feeling?"". She replies ""Mmm, yes"".


That's about it for the FR. She wants to watch a movie she doesn't want to see (wtf lol) with me next week. Another FR will ensue. Comments/criticism/suggestions are gladly welcome.

~PoundPickupFR",pickup
"Guy friends, cockblocking, and ""dibs"". What are your opinions? Also, some background on a recent situation.","We've all had it happen (at least I have, like a lot), you show up with a girl, but your ""friends"" instantly swoop in. They don't seem to even feel like they did anything wrong.

Flip the script, and its ""wtf man why you cockblocking??""

Because I've had it happen to me in the past and I thought it sucked balls, I generally consider girls my homies are after to be off-limits.

But last weekend, I went out with some buddies, only one of whom I actually consider a friend. The rest I'm cool with, but honestly I wouldn't give a flying fuck if I never saw them ever again. These guys brought a couple girls, and from the moment I showed up it seemed like I was one doing all the talking, getting all the IOI's, pretty much keeping the night fun. I'm not trying to brag, just honestly saying how I felt; maybe I'm totally wrong.

Anyway, I had one these girls (HB7) bringing me outside for smokes, buying me drinks, trying to grind on my dick. Trust me, it was on. Except for my bitch-ass brain doesn't let me pull the trigger because I'm worried dude is gonna feel bad, and I hated that feeling. Driving a girl home when you stayed sober so she could get drunk and jock your friend is a baaaaad time.

What do you all think/feel/do in situations like these? ",pickup
Girls flaking on you? Ready to give up? Try this first: The text A-Bomb,"I rarely get flakes but I've had two girls do it to me recently: I called, they didn't pick up. I sent a text, no reply. Waited for a week, still nothing. *What would you do? Give up?* Here's what I did instead; I've sent them this text, it's crudely translated into english from my native language, but it'll do as an example:
 
**""Heyy [name], it was nice meeting you [throw in a reference point here if you got one]. You're [compliment] and I would've enjoyed hanging out again but it seems like you're really busy. All the best.""**
 
You probably already get what it means, but here's what I'm trying to relay:
 
1. Remind her of the approach and tell her that you enjoyed it. **Literally**: ""We had a good time, remember [reference point]?""
2. Reinforce your motivation to see her with a compliment, remind her how you're trying to get this working. **Literally**: ""You're special and I want to see you again""
3. But SHE is screwing it up by not replying. **Literally**: ""You're sabotaging any possible future we could have""
4. Wish her all the best for her future, because you're not going to be a part of it. We really want to make this clear. **Literally**: ""Fuck you, I'm out""
 
Keep in mind, THIS IS ONLY FOR WHEN YOU'RE ABOUT TO GIVE UP! We are giving her the choice between either seeing us or never hearing from us again.
 
Ok now, what happened after I've sent those two texts? Girl #1 replied in **THREE MINUTES** with a *huge* text, saying she's sorry, reminiscing about the approach and asking when I'm free next week. Girl #2 replied the next day, said she was busy working night shifts lately and wants to meet next month when she takes a few days off from work.
 
So before you're calling me too needy, think about this: What would've happened if I hadn't sent this text? That's right, nothing. This shit works and unless you're drowning in numbers I don't see why you wouldn't at least try it.

Vet out.",pickup
Small Tidbit to Consider,"Just heard this and thought I would share.

""An addiction is something that you cannot stop. We bring to ourselves situations that will fulfill the biochemical craving of the cells of our body, by creating situations that meet our chemical needs. If you cannot control your EMOTIONAL STATE, then you must be addicted to it.""  

Meditate on this...



",pickup
[FR] The Night of the Pentacle [# Closes] [Part 2 of 2],"Alright guys, after a slight delay here are the final three number closes during my Marbles full adventure:

Stumbling toward the bar after meeting Will Smith, Marbles and I decided that a new opener was called for. Questing for this we realized we were carrying enchanted foodstuffs from McDonalds. Screaming ""McDonald's Opener"" we headed back down the hatch. After which we promptly arrived at our location.

Outside leaving, were three lovely young ladies. HBskyrim(7), HBfuzzy(10), and HBsister(8). Initially, I walked directly up to the most gracious looking of the three and just started chatting. Remembering my opener, after saying ""Hey!"" HBfuzzy smiled, looked me over as I asked. ""Want a nugget?"" HB said yes, and the set was open. The Game was on. Going direct as she asked ""What are you up to?"" I was reminded of a legendary_ technique of flooding her with the truth. ""Well I saw you leaving, and I thought you were really good looking. So I wanted to talk to you before you left."" HBfuzzy said ""Well that was refreshing! People have been commenting on my shoes and crap. I just moved here, and it was really uncomfortable."" I continued on with the torrent stating ""Well, I felt it was the right thing to say, it's making me slightly nervous just to talk to you right now. I was wondering since you were leaving and we are going inside, can I have your number to hang out sometime?"" She smiled, took my phone and put her number in and called herself. When I was startled by a wild HBsister ""Hey you can't ask her out! She just moved here! If you ask her out, don't be surprised if I show up too!"" Smiling, and genuinely enjoying her honesty I fired back with my own. ""Well I think that'd be a great story. You're also very pretty. I wouldn't mind being on a three way date. You can fight for my affection."" she laughed, and HBfuzzy did too. I observed the situation, and saw Marbles talking to HBskyrim. Returning my steely gaze to the two in front of me. ""I'd better get him inside, he is almost done with his food. Hey, HBfuzzy, can I get your number since I wouldn't mind hanging out with you either. You're a pretty cool chick for someone so good looking."" she smiled, waited a second and gave me her number. I looked around again, and HBskyrim was alone, who I learned from HBsister that they were in fact sisters HBfuzzy not included. I didn't really know where Marbles went and assumed inside, so I just asked her. ""Did you scare my friend away?"" she shook her head, and I said. ""Did you at least give him your number?"" she said ""No, because I don't like giving my number out."" I asked her why, and she took the conversation over. ""Well, I guess I come off a little weird, I like playing Skyrim, and video games and like to do a lot of reading."" my interest was peaked. So I asked ""I've never heard of Skyrim, what's that? Hey are you half German?"" (she had asked me my nationality and where I was from. She was from Missouri) with a  smile. She laughed and said ""I guess stereotypes work sometimes."" (I guessed it because of something I read online that like 40% of white people are half german.) we chatted about video games for a minute after that. Luckily the two other ladies had been distracted by two gentlemen they knew previously and were talking. ""So, why don't you give out your number? You seem pretty fun. You're not exactly unattractive either."" she explained point blank ""I don't like giving my number out because people don't usually call me when I do."" so I assured her. ""I'll definitely give you a call. Maybe even a little more."" handing her my phone. She popped her number in. ""Hey cool. I'll give you a call in a couple of days."" then I returned to the bar to hang out for a while.

The rest of the night was fun.

Marbles got a round of applause from a group I pulled him into, other than that I got tired and needed to go home. So I did.

Lessons learned:

* Don't be afraid to ask for a number from each person in a group.
* McNuggets are delicious
* I don't need to drink to be able to have fun
* Hot chicks can be self conscious too.
* Making friends is not a bad outcome
",pickup
"[FR] - Nothing ventured, nothing gained","NOTE:  This will NOT be the most interesting FR you've ever read.  The point of my making this post is just to illustrate that going out is always better than not going out, and that you should by extension stop being a pussy, turn off Call of Duty, and go talk to girls.

SETTING:  A rainy Monday night.  This is the least-likely circumstance for a ONS, which is what I was shooting for.  Unsurprisingly, I did not obtain said ONS, but I fucking tried, so when my head hit the pillow at the end of the night (alone), I still felt good about it.

PREMISE:  I'd met these two blonde chicks a week ago at Sunday Funday, and one of them (the foxy one) sells a lot of prescription meds on the side.  I'm not a *huge* drug guy, I don't like weed, never done white girl, but I don't mind a xanny now and then.  I'd arranged to head to this girls' house on a Monday night to grab some shit, and thought maybe it'd develop from there.

Guess what?  It didn't!  She had a job interview early the next day and, while perfectly friendly, was not in the mood to party on this particular rainy Monday evening.  I didn't honestly expect her to be, so I wasn't butt-hurt about it.  We exchanged a few texts back and forth the rest of the night, I'll see her again, etc.  Just not the night.

**NOTE:** I carry a party in my car.  I've got an overnight back with clothing, shoes, contact lenses, toiletries, a bottle of Ketel One, condoms, adderall, spare phone chargers, and a ton of other shit in my trunk.  It's always there, I don't have to think about it, so if I'm out and a situation develops, I am PREPARED.  I can stay over, and I'm good for work the next day.  If not, it's there for next time.

I went back to my friend's place, he took a benzo, I did not, and I goaded him into going out.  We go to a couple of bars, get in with one 2-set, play some bar games, lots of kino/flirting, but they have to work early in the AM so they go home after a couple hours.  I did not have sex with them, although one of them rode me like a horse in the bar while I was shooting shuffleboard.  I didn't really expect a ONS on a Monday, and so wasn't disappointed.  

Specifically on this set, just to give some color, my friend went into the bar and these 2 were smoking outside.  I stop and join them, get them talking, and by the time we walk in we're old friends.  They were pre-isolated, and it's always good to find a girl or girls that's pre-isolated, and then get them BACK in the bar, easier than the other way around, IMO.  I teased the shit out of them, I called their attention to humorous social shit developing elsewhere in the bar with other people, and I looked at their tits just often enough so that they knew I was about business.

I went out, I opened every chick I ran into, hooked a few, got some interest, and most importantly I had a good fucking time.  We made fun of some other girl for having Skrillex hair, I ripped on a bartender for not knowing what a Gibson was, we owned shit at shuffleboard, etc.

For a Monday, it wasn't bad.  Some people would lament having lost the sleep to not get laid, and those people are the fucking death of fun.  This is not about ROI, it's about having a good time.",pickup
The Fundamentals,"Lurking around in the IRC as of late, I notice a trend of people asking for specifics and what appears to me to be some ""next level"" shit.  All this time I am wondering, 'but do they have an expert knowledge of the basics?"" I feel that the community has performed a tremendous job in gathering so much information into one place, yet my fear is that there is a trend of trying to [ http://tinyurl.com/7wnemg8 ].  While it is great that there is such a high desire to learn new information, I think many in the community are missing a very large aspect of trying to become better in any endeavor; in order to master something, you must first master the basics!

So then, what are the basics of pickup?  To my knowledge, the list is as follows: BE HONEST with yourself always, and with those you talk to (tell the truth-and make sure it is the TRUTH and not a false belief you have- this includes self-talk); if she is someone you would want to have an intimate or sexual relationship with, APPROACH; don't worry about doing/saying the perfect thing, just worry about DOING SOMETHING; always HAVE FUN (if you are not enjoying what you are doing, why are you doing it); accept the fact that it is OK to fail (it is how you learn what doesn't work).

If the members of the community master these basics to a level of unconscious competence (to perform something without thinking of it - like tying your shoes), then I think moving onto the technical aspects of pickup (building rapport, NLP, reading body language, etc) will be easier and more successful.  Members, especially those new to the community, should solely focus on mastering these fundamental skills.  Don't focus on whether you sent the right text, or said the perfect line, or tilted your body at the right angle at the right time while hypnotoading the shit out of that dime... Just focus on the basics.

All this being said, I am no master of pickup, and am open to suggestions from those more experienced to give their insight as to what they think the basics are.  I think overall, the fact that people should focus on the basics till they absolutely master them, is the key message to take from this post.  

When you get to the point where you approach women you find attractive even under the damnation that is AA or other outside factors, when your conversations flow naturally and without pause or interrupt (unless done purposefully), when you are always having fun, regardless of the situation, when you are completely honest, and know without a  doubt the words you speak and thoughts you harbor ARE the truth, and when you don't get that #-close or F-close and don't stress about it, then you have mastered the basics. If you ever find yourself NOT doing any of these, exiting from unconscious competence, return back to the basics till it is instinctive again.  

Lastly, never assume that you have mastered the basics.  ""To know and not to do is not to know!""

Go forth and conquer my brothers!",pickup
Push &amp; Pull quiz due to popular demand,"I've made a short quiz (12 questions) on push &amp; pull. The questions are all transcribed from Sauce #3 and I'd love it if you could post some more in the comments that I could add.

[Take the test.](https://challenge.zoho.com/pickup)
 
**Edit:** If you're in the UK and free on May 4. let me know,[ I'm attending an NLP introduction seminar by Richard Bandler](http://www.reddit.com/r/pickup/comments/sprss/nlp_introduction_seminar_in_london_with_the/).",pickup
--&gt;NLP'd my professor into letting me retake a lab that was due over a month ago. NBD. --&gt;,"http://pastebin.com/MJH990m6

Or was it more Persuasion techniques? Idk what I did would be called, this was all off the dome. 

If you see me unwittingly using NLP techniques, please analyze them and post it in the comments! I'd love to know more about the mechanics of what I'm doing and I'm sure we could all benefit. 
",pickup
"NLP Introduction seminar in London with (THE) Richard Bandler, anyone in?","So Richard Bandler is still doing some NLP stuff, 1 on 1's are ridiculously expensive but he's doing [an introductory course on the 4. of May](http://www.nlplifetraining.com/events/introduction-to-nlp), tickets are 48£.
 
I'm going to fly in from Switzerland and attend this, any UK pickupees want to come with me or meet up? I'm staying the night and will probably hit up a bar or two before my flight leaves in the morning.
 
**Edit:** I'll try to get some of it on film on my smartphone for you guys. Probably won't be able to get the whole 4 hours but maybe 1-2.",pickup
"Pound pickup phone chat partyline thingy (y'know, for encouragement!)","So like I said in my recent FR, I texted accconrad for encouragement, he delivered, and I did my thing. Cool.

Now, why not have hands on deck like that 24/7 right on your phone, regardless of what kind of phone you use (shitty or top-of-the-line)? We can, by setting up a [Groupme](https://groupme.com/) sms chatroom. It turns your regular texting into a chat among multiple people - it's like having PoundPickup.com/chat on your phone, and all you need is the ability to send/receive texts (and probably unlimited texting)! No additional software/apps required (though you can get apps that act more like a chatroom so that your phone doesn't buzz with 100 texts). It can also be used to create conference calls. It's all free. It's fucking cool.

[Here's what it looks like](http://5.mshcdn.com/wp-content/uploads/2010/10/groupme.jpg).

What d'you think? I think the more we chat together the happier we'll be. Message me your number and I'll add you in.

Notes:

-There may need to be multiple lines to account for the fact that we're all in different time zones

-Please remember that not everyone has a smartphone and may be receiving groupme chat messages as text/sms - so try to be as succinct as possible to avoid blowing up people's phones with a billion text messages

-Once added in, send a quick text to the group, or else Groupme removes you from the line",pickup
[FR] First FR and first approach (at last),"First off, apologies for wall of text! I'm also horrendous at writing so bear with me. 

Although I've been around in IRC for a while I feel I should introduce myself. I'm an 18 year old virgin, never had a girlfriend all the usual shit. At my first year at uni, home for Easter holidays at the moment. Been on seddit for ages but haven't been able to get over AA whatsoever. Had a few drunken makeouts since being at uni but nothing I've really initiated.
 
Went out to a local club with 2 of my old friends. I had a feeling that it would be pretty empty since most people have gone back to uni. We get there pretty early and there's a few dozen people in separate groups so we just grabbed a few drinks and chilled for a bit whilst more people arrived. 
 
After a while we head over to the dancefloor - I saw a few people I knew from school/work so I made sure to say hello and introduce myself (and friends) to their friends. All in all no one I was attracted to but had some decent conversation in the smoking area with 2 HB5s. 
 
The dance floor filled up a bit and I noticed a cute HB8 sitting by herself on a table off to the side. She seemed like she wasn't enjoying herself so I headed over and said '""You don't look like your having too much fun."" She agreed and I said ""It's cool I was dragged out by my friends, I'd rather be at home playing video games,"" as I looked over in their direction. (XMP suggested this to me in my realtalk) Worked a charm and her face lit up and she said something to similar effect. I introduced myself and asked her name whilst placing my hand on her waist. 
 
At this point I was struggling to hear what she was saying because the music was so damn loud. I  panicked and said ""Hey let's go dance,"" and held out my hand while kinda leaning away towards the dancefloor. This when she goes ""My feet are hurting, I want to but can't."" Now on hearing this I kinda froze up because I honestly didn't know what to say to that haha. I ejected with ""Well it was nice to meet you, I've gotta get back to my friends.""  
 
I was pretty excited considering that was my first approach ever. At this point I didn't really care that I hadn't even got a number and to be honest I still don't.  
 
I got back on the dancefloor and a UB2 fat chick is grinding on one of my friends and he is not having any of it. The look on his face made my night. 
 
He had got talking to a brunette HB7 and HB6 who knew HB2. I got talking to HB6 but felt like I was pretty much interviewing her, she was really quite boring and not my type at all. Started talking to HB7, can't remember many specifics but had great eye contact and pretty much constant smiles from her. Once again I was having problems hearing her though. 
 
For the next hour or so I was just dancing with them and my friends but had no idea how to escalate with HB7. We kept making eye contact and smiling etc. so I knew she was interested but I started to feel anxious. By the end of the night after nothing happened and I was feeling a bit bummed out but also excited because I'd finally beaten my AA and it is hardly as difficult to approach as I'd been making myself think it was.

Although nothing really happened I'm glad I'm over my AA so I can actually do shit now haha.

**TL;DR Got over my AA and had a good night. More to come.**
",pickup
Persistence is sometimes necessary.,"Ok this FR is a little stale.  Happened the weekend before last weekend but I'm writing it sooo what evs.

Me and a group of 4 guys and 3 girls go to a club after pregaming.  When we meet up on the main dance floor we start dance battling and it's super fun.  I think I'm a pretty damn good dancer when I get on the floor and one of the other guys can improv pretty good as well, so we go at it. 

*Note: if you know how to have the most fun at a club the ladies notice*

I'm not exactly sure how it happened but I make strong eye contact with a small(turn-on), really cute girl.  I danced towards her until I'm moving with her.  It was very slow and steady how we got closer, I would spin her and then our faces would be a little closer than before.  Until they were just too damn close and I couldn't help but kiss her.  

We dance all over the club kissing and touching intermittently both of us super happy, talking every once in a while.  Then she asks my age.  

Bam.  Her smile is gone.  I'm too young.  

Oh nooooes guys.  That's it.  I'm tooo young.  Might as well give up.

Fuck that.  Frame = exactly the same, for me, as before.

What do I do?  I laugh.  She is very serious about it though.  And we discuss it and I tell her that it's not that big a gap and it doesn't matter to me.  Besides she doesn't even look old to me.(which was completely true and why I went after her in the first place)

So from this point forward she is putting up resistance.  I somehow get her to leave the club with me and we have fun walking through the town.  I get her to buy a slice of pizza and we share it.  Then she starts to want to go home because she's tired.  

Instead we do jagerbombs.  

Walking in the town again, I ask her.  ""Do you want to see where I live?""

""Ok.""

We go in my house and get some water and chat for a while.  Then we go in my room.

Next Morning:  

 # close

",pickup
"[FR] Ya boy TheImpetuous levels up, cold approaches, doesn't die.","Gotta say it was a good day.

Sued an ex-landlord. Hypnotoaded the judge(!) - she said I looked ""like a movie star"" @_@. Won the case. Coincidence? You decide.

Skipped work and went out to celebrate the moment. Got high, Mexican food. [Bought some fly kicks](http://www.amazon.com/Converse-Taylor-Outsider-Chocolate-127813C/dp/B0067NYWSK) as a present to my now $1000 richer self. They're the most manly Chucks you can get, and they make me about 1-2 inches taller. Swag.

Felt good, right? Boost of confidence and all that. I'm like, yo. Talk to girls. You're in state ffs. So like, it makes sense, do it, oui? Tell 'em why you're feeling so goddamn confident. Girl on the train is vibing to some music and making what look like come-hither motions and smiles, but I rationalize away: *I haven't showered, I'm sweaty, I've got too much clothing/bags with me* (weird, quasi-muggy and rainy day in Boston) *I'll do an approach after I get a shower and put these awesome shoes on....* (yes, I realize that I'm a [shoe-obsessed weirdo](http://www.youtu.be/bckwS5fpaVU?t=9m24s), lol.)

I go home, shower, get suited up in my regular duds. Go to Starbucks. Barista kinda flirts with me, knows my name @_@. Do some reading on [this fine tome](http://www.theinvisiblegorilla.com) (book report forthcoming) till I notice this cute girl. We make eye contact, I smile, she sits down. I text accconrad for encouragement.

AC:
&gt;**Stand up, move your feet forward, say hi I saw you across the room and I just had to introduce myself. Do not think, just do.**

I get, move to where she is, but I kinda divert myself toward the other end of the room, wtf? Rationalizing again, like, maybe she's not as cute as I first thought or whatever.

*AC's right* I think, *move those feet*. I move those feet. I go up to her. Maybe she had headphones on? I'm not sure, really, but if she did she took them off and I spoke to her. (Paraphrased) ""Hey, I saw you and you were just distractingly attractive. I wanted to come up and talk to you. Hi, my name is...."" She's receptive. I get her name, do a little bit of mind-fuckery with the handshake. I tell her about my court case, and how it's made me happy, and how I just wanted to share that feeling of happiness. I tell her she's blushing, since she is. Hair tosses coming from her. I eject way early, don't ask for a number, but still, I did it and didn't die! I walked past her again with my coffee on the way out and cheers her with it. I made this girl's day. It's uphill from here. Up, up, up!

Moral of the story: I've always known how to do this. Now I'm simply beginning to remember

It's nothing in a sense (I talked to a girl!), but it's something (I talked to a girl!), and it's something from nothing.

Anyway, afterward I'm at the grocery getting stuff for dinner and I get into a conversation with this girl who attempted to switch lines and then thought better of it. We get into conversation about how in CA they'll just open up a new line if there's enough people waiting, since people are more likely to just leave if they have to wait - who knew? She's buying mint, plain frozen yogurt and [weird European bread](http://www.aumarche.com/index.cfm?fuseaction=store.prodDetail&amp;prodID=1871), so I'm all ""you can't really build a meal from that!"" She's qualifying herself all over the place, seeking my approval on her selection. Her friends show up and she says hi to them - and then introduces me to them as her new friend(!) @_@. She doesn't even separate our items on the conveyor - is that a sign? Lol.... Anyway, I don't get the # (sensing a pattern here?) because, though kinda cute, she just was not my type (no butterflies or anything). 

Things to work on: 

-Said ""I'm sorry"" a lot when starting off sentences with the girl in Starbucks. (""I'm sorry, but I saw you over here, and you're so attractive that I just had to come over and"" etc.)

-Why not get the second girl's number? Even if I'm not into her, she wants me to have new friends!!!! Oh well, that grocery's the kind of place where you see people once and again, so maybe some other time - it was nice to connect so easily and pass the time in line....

Prometheus Rises. Feels good man.

Sincerely, 

ya boy,

TheImpetuous

aka Supreme Allah XXIII

aka the Lush Who Makes 'Em Blush

aka D———

*~Victory or Death~*

Selah.",pickup
[FR] The Night of the Pentacle [# Closes] [Part 1 of 2],"Hey guys,


After an excellent night out with Mr. Marbles, and an interesting bit of conversation. I ended up with 5 new numbers in the phonebook, and a new opener for you foodies out there. So let's sally forth and have a brief recap of the events leading up to the action.

Meet up after work at about 615 for some late day game with Marbles, who approached like a boss when I watched. He talked to a couple HB10's, and I while impressed found no such inspiration. Venturing into a local dive, we ended up having a couple of pitchers of beer amongst us (a bad, yet fun move as we got a bit sloshed before 8:30pm). Flirted with the waitress a real cute lady a bit, which went no where (this time). 

Fast forward to the next bar, which we soon realized was dead, but I was recognized by an elementary school classmate (HB7), who I number closed before we hopped out. ""Hey, let me get your number since you work in my neighborhood; we could hang out!"" she was reluctant explaining she ""kind of had a boyfriend"" so I pulled out the PA: ""That's perfect. I am just looking for a cool chick to hang out with."" and the first number close was done for the evening.

Now I'm riding a horse [if a horse is a #-close] to the next bar. Which, after a few minutes we realized was a gay bar. After about a half hour talking with some nice lesbians and a couple laughs with some of the dudes around we neoncactus'd outta there. Heading next door to a bar where I got told ""If you were a chicken with it's head cut off you'd run to the butcher."" confused and amused, we then ejected from that place for the second bar.

Upon arriving, and chit chatting for a few minutes Marbles, grew hungry. So hungry in fact he issued forth a quest, for something both delicious, and greasy. We headed to McDonalds. I exited first, while the might Marbles emptied his gargantuan bowels. I spotted a two-set of HB7's relaxing all cool on the curb. After non chalantly chatting about a few things and remarking that they looked cute Marbles exploded from the door exclaimed. ""Give this man your number, we are in search of food!"" and I got my second number for the evening.

We searched after traversing the endless desert of McDougal Street, arriving at a Golden Arched Oasis, the locals referred to as ""Mickey Dee's"" upon entering this heaven of food like stuff, we met none other than Will Smith, the epic server. With his reassurance and his blessing of delicious Chicken McNuggets, we returned to the bar for an epic adventure. We were then accosted by a three set with no equal.

To Be Continued!
",pickup
Taking hypnosis further,"Overt and direct hypnosis can be a really crazy thing.  It also appears to be pretty easy to get success at least some of the time

I’ve been into the hypnosis thing for about a year now, and have done some interesting things with it. I started with text hypnosis, and after getting the hang of it decided to try it in person on a random person. Here’s the story...

I walked up to a guy and two girls on a college campus asking if they’d answer a couple survey questions. “Have you ever been hypnotized? No? Want to try?” The guy agreed and I did a couple “set pieces” - magnetic fingers and magnetic hands. From there I did a handshake interrupt and got him to close his eyes and SLEEP!

“I want you to imagine *your hand is falling asleep*. Can you imagine that?” &lt;nods&gt; “Now imagine that you aren’t just imagining it. Your hand is absolutely STUCK. The harder you try to move it, the harder it’s STUCK”

Cool, got arm catalepsy. Now for name amnesia!

“I want you to imagine that you cannot remember your name. You ask yourself what your name is and come up with “I don’t know!” - but of course you do know, and there’s a voice in the back of your head reminding you, isn’t there?”

He nods

“Now imagine that voice is fading away. And this is happening automatically - you’re not even doing it. In fact, the harder you try to grab it, the more *it’s just gone*... Do you think you can remember your name?” 

He nods

 “I’m not so sure about that. Eyes open wide awake!”

I really wasn’t sure, but he looked zombified enough that I had a hunch. I asked the girls their names first as a distraction, then got back to him

“I didnt catch your name? And yours?” and to him “You can’t remember your name can you?” 

He gave me a zombified look of confusion and shook his head

“SLEEP! And now everything I say is your absolute reality - without doubt or question, everything I say is your absolute reality. Nod if you understand” &lt;nods&gt; “And in a moment, when you open your eyes, you will not be able to see me or the clothes I’m wearing. It will be as if you see right through me. Just like how your brain fills in your blind spot without your conscious awareness. Nod if you understand” 

He didn’t respond for several seconds and I started to worry, but I was relieved when he nodded, and I had him open his eyes.

His eyes open and he still looks “out of it” - No response. I move my hand around in front of his face - nothing. I pick up my notebook and move it around - he looks confused, but still out of it.

I have him sleep then count him out.

This whole time I was in the moment focused on making it work. It was only *after* the whole thing, when the guy asked me how I did it - how I became “invisible” - that it really hit me. The expression on his face looked like I had just turned his world upside down..

There’s a lot going on, but there are a few things I want to specifically point out. I could have just gone straight for a stuck arm or a forgotten name, but instead I built the individual pieces and tested them separately - then put them together for the final effect. This “imagination” thing is a very powerful tool for building the pieces, since it deflects the huge concern of “but is it *really* working?”

If you can understand the structure of the suggestions you’re shooting for, you can often piece them together more easily - and debug when it doesn’t go well.

Framing things as “hypnosis” and using “SLEEP!” can be convenient, but are by no means necessary. As long as you can find a frame that allows them to engage their imagination in the way you want, you’re set.

The take away here is that you can take this far and do some really *ridiculous* shit - and quickly.

Erotic hypnotists do some pretty surreal things with hypnosis. Things that would be *amazing* if incorporated into pickup conversationally.

Can you imagine that it’s possible to @_@ a girl to orgasm within a few minutes?

Can you imagine that you’re not just imagining?
",pickup
"[FR] Tearing up the party, LEGENDARY NIGHT!","My photographer friend is one of the ugliest guys I know but he hangs with the hottest dimes and models around. He threw a party on Saturday and yours truly was invited. 
  
**tl;dr:** Made out with a ""lesbian"" 9, kclosed a busty 8 and got a so-so bj in the bathroom by a 7.5. blue haired chick. 
  
**Aight let's reminisce:** I arrive a bit late because my fwb8 got freaky in the shower. I don't know anyone, 3/4's are women, half of them dimes. Aaand here it comes, my AA of 8+ girls... My heart starts to race, I feel panicky, nervous. I get a drink and get to know the few other guys, mostly afc's but nice, sympathetic people. I'm feeling better. 
  
A busty Austrian 8 joins our conversation and says hi to me. I ask her what she's drinking as the punch I tried was pretty bad. She mixed something up randomly, tastes good. I ask her to show me how to make one, offer her my hand, she takes it, we smile at each other and head over to the bar. I touch and peek over her shoulder as she's mixing my drink. My friend walks up to us and tells us that the hookah is ready, we join him and walk outside to the balcony. 
  
I see one of the afc guys from before, two sixes, a 9 and a 7.5 with blue hair sitting around the hookah. My friend introduces me and adds ""You know, you've changed, I would've never invited you the way you were a year ago."" The 9 is curious ""Changed how?"" All eyes are on me. ""Well"" my friend says, ""he used to be all negative and a womanizing dick, wait you still are aren't you? How's your fwb?"" I play along ""Which one?"" Laughter all around. Friend: ""And THAT is what I meant."" I'm not sure if that's what he intended but all girls look at me with @_@ eyes and ask me a ton of stuff. 
  
The 9 bursts through the questions of the others, moves closer to me and rests her knee against mine, ""How do you do that? I can't even stand the drama with my ONE girlfriend."" (lesbian) Me: ""That's the beauty of it, it's NOT a relationship, you just..."" I slow down, adjust my tone, touch her knee and look her in the eyes: **""do... what... feels... right...""** slight bit of tension, she goes a bit red. My friend tells me that the 9 is too young for me, dude, seriously? Wtf? (I'm 23, she's 20) I ignore him, she asks me to guess her age. Me: ""Ok hold still"", I act like I'm looking for something but in reality I'm just kinoing the fuck out of her, I brush her hair strands out of her face, hold her cheek with my left hand and caress her face with the right one. 
  
It's dead silent, everyone is staring at me half making out with her. Me: ""Ah... Hm... Ok now, show me your hands."" She complies, I act like I'm reading her palms, caress her hands, you should've seen the look on her face. I now hold both of her hands, flat out guess and throw in some ""cold reading"" and suggestion: ""You've recently turned 20, you like being yourself and are a very open and happy person but when the noise around you quiets down you realize that there is something lacking, you're looking for something new and exciting, **something to make the hairs stand up from your skin...**"" I brush my right hand up her arm, and feel her getting goose bumps. DEAD. FUCKING. SILENCE... Even my friend can't pick up his jaw from the floor. Her: ""Oh my god can you read hands?! How do you do that!!?"" (I guessed right) I almost can't believe everyone is buying my bullshit. I give the 9 a wink, stand up and ask if anyone else is coming inside for a drink. 
  
The 7.5, the 8 and the 9 ALL go ""me!"" but I end up taking the 9 with me as she stretches out her hands, indicating me to help her up. Sorry 8 and 7.5... We go back inside, get drinks and I lead us to a quiet corner. We sit beside each other on a couch. Me: ""What's it like to have sex with another woman?"" Her: *giggles* ""Are you serious? Well most lesbians are amazing at sex because they know what feels good for them, so they know just when and where to touch other women"" I get nervous but fight through it, I touch her cheek again and make her look me in the eyes. Me: ""Like... This...?"" I kiss her, my heart is almost exploding from how nervous I am. She reciprocates, I grab a boob, she gasps, full on make out session until... My fucking friend comes and tells us that we ""should both know better than to do that"" he looks pissed, I think he has the hots for her. Okido senor cockblock, guess I'll just get her another time then. I hand her my cell and tell her to give me her number so I ""can show her some of my secrets some other time"" she puts it in, looks a bit sad (guilt tripped?) and excuses herself to the bathroom. 
  
I get another drink and wonder wtf is up with my friend. I see the blue haired chick and chat her up, she's still wondering about that palm reading stunt from before and goes into interview mode. I dodge most of the questions and only give her answers that lead to even more questions. Me: ""Stop"" she looks at me with a confused look, me: ""Let's make this easier, truth or dare?"" long story short: We end up only doing truth questions, I ask her about her fantasies, the atmosphere thickens between us, she starts asking about my fantasies too, I muster up all my courage and say ""I've always wanted to do a cute chick with wild hair like you"" she finally goes for dare. Me: ""Let's lock ourselves in the bathroom"" There it is again, my heart going into overdrive. ""Ok"". 
  
We sneak in, I lock the door, kiss her, she's touching my chest, making her way down to my pants. I sit down on the rim of the bathtub and grab her boobs, she unzips my pants, I can't believe this shit, I'm getting a bj. It's taking me forever to come, she's not as good as my fwb and it kind of becomes more of a chore than fun for both of us after a while. She rinses her mouth and the magic is flat out gone, we're both feeling awkward. I lie: ""That was amazing you're fucking wild."" she smirks and takes another sip of water. Yep, this is over. I give her a hug, go in for another kiss, tell her I need some fresh air and leave. 
  
I see my friend and decide to have a drink with him and lighten his shitty mood. Turns out the lesbian has been playing games with him for a while, ouch! We're having some brotime, smoke hookah, play rock band, I think we're good again. (I'm still going to call her though) 
  
It's 4am, many have already left, it's just me, the Austrian 8, my friend and one of the AFC's. I get ready to get some shut-eye on a L-shaped leather couch, one of four. The 8 sits down and I tell her that I'm going to sleep here. Her: ""That's ok I'll sleep on this part and you on the other"" my friend heard that, is giving me an ice-cold death stare and says good night. I decide to just go to sleep... Or at least try, my head is full of questions, why isn't she sleeping on one of the completely empty couches, is she coming onto me? Can I approach her? How? She is still awake for at least half an hour but I decide doing anything at 4 in the morning while lying head to head (L shape) is too creepy and drown in my own thoughts, half dreaming, half hallucinating, kind of drunk. 
  
Her cell phone goes off, it's 6am, I didn't sleep, or did I? She apologizes for the alarm, asked if I slept ok and says she has to go in a few minutes. She heads to the bathroom, I try to think of a way to approach her, still nothing... Her: ""Ok I have to go, nice meeting you [theVet]"" Me: ""Wait, I'm coming too"". We leave together and head for the train station. Neither of us slept much but the ""thing"" between us is going good. We joke, small talk, sit down on a bench and wait for our train. Silence. I feel it's time for PAM &amp; honesty: ""Hey"" I take her hand. ""You're absolutely beautiful and I feel like there's something between us. I've been awake half of the night wondering why you slept on the same couch as me when there were two others that were completely empty. And... I just have this urge to kiss you right now."" I can feel my heartbeat in my head. I move my head closer to hers, and give her the best ""fuck me eyes"" I can muster up after a night with no sleep. We kiss. She's a great kisser, my god, I'm almost getting hard. I hear my train coming, tell her I would love to see her again, hand her my phone, she puts in her numbers. We kiss again, hug, and I barely catch my train in the last second. 
  
What a fucking night. I'm going back to my fwb, tell her to buy us some lunch for later and fall dead asleep in her bed. I wake up, take a bath, ask my fwb to [make me a sandwich](http://i.imgur.com/Fk8gu.jpg) and start writing this monster of a FR. **Ain't life fucking good?**",pickup
"PAM Cooking #1: Spinach Salad, Chicken in Red Wine Sauce, and Chocolate Mousse. ","###This is Player Approved Cooking.###

Knowing how to prepare your own food is a matter of life and death.  We gotta get you eating right, player, and to do that you’re going to have to pick up a new vital life skill.

Cooking is good for relaxation, nutrition, and feeding all the dimes you’re sleeping with.  In this course, I’ll be posting solid meal recipes that are easy, nutritious, quick, and impressive.  I’ll be covering full meals, including appetizer, main course, and dessert.  Feel free to mix and match as you please.

**Let’s get this ball rolling with PA Meal #1…**

##**Appetizer:  Spinach Salad**##

Women love their salads.  You also love your salads.  Here’s what you need to do to make the Player Approved Spinach Salad.

* Spinach

* Feta cheese

* Walnuts

* Dried cranberries

* Vinaigrette (Balsamic is common so try other ones like a Red Wine Vinaigrette)


Explaining how to make a salad past just listing the ingredients shouldn’t be too necessary.  Be sure the spinach is chilled from the refrigerator.  Add the feta cheese, walnuts, and dried cranberries to the desired quantity, and let the person add the vinaigrette themselves to their own liking.  PROTIP: It is infinitely classier to prepare each individual bowl of salad by hand, rather than mixing one giant salad bowl and serving out of it. This isn’t Golden Corral.  

##**Main Course: Chicken in Red Wine Sauce**##

A quick note on serving wine: ALWAYS ASK before serving wine if the person is a wine drinker.  When sweet honey baby girl comes over and asks what’s on the menu, ask her if she drinks wine.  Don’t just ask her immediately if she wants a glass, player. 

Having said that, here’s what you’ll need for Chicken in Red Wine Sauce.

* 3-4 boneless chicken breasts

* 2-3 scallions (green onions)

* 1 cup of red wine (I stick with a Cabernet Sauvignon or a Merlot)

* ½ cup of soy sauce

* ¼ cup of brown sugar

* 2 teaspoons of garlic (seriously?  Just add as much as you want…it’s fucking garlic for crying out loud.)

* 4 heaping tablespoons of corn starch

* 5-6 tablespoons of water

Cut up chicken into cubes and brown in a frying pan, skillet, or wok with a little olive oil.  Once the chicken is cooked on all sides (though not completely cooked through) remove it from the pan and add the scallions, wine, soy sauce, brown sugar, and garlic.  Mix the corn starch and water together and add to the sauce mixture.  Increase heat to bring to a slight bubble to thicken the sauce.  Add chicken and coat on all sides.  Cook until chicken is ready.

You can serve this over pasta, over rice, over quinoa, anything.  Try adding broccoli to the recipe for an added vegetable and some color.  This one is a battle-tested winner, so get ready to look like fucking Emeril Lagasse to her after she’s eaten it.

##**Dessert: Chocolate Mousse**##

You’re eating and drinking red wine.  For dessert, you’re already thinking it. Chocolate.  It’s time for some rich, creamy chocolate for dessert.  Luckily, chocolate mousse is one of the easiest things to make, and it is just as French as the wine you had with dinner.  Have this made and in the refrigerator ahead of time.  Nobody likes cooking anything after eating the main course.  

* 3 egg whites

* 1 chocolate bar (dark or milk chocolate, whichever you prefer.  Know that this is what your mousse will taste like.)

Optional: dash of Vanilla extract, mint extract, or any other sort of flavoring


Break up the chocolate bar in a ceramic bowl (or basically just not glass).  Fill a pot up with just enough water to place the bowl inside it.  The bowl should touch the bottom with the water just barely up to the middle of the sides of the bowl.  Bring this pot to a low simmer to melt the chocolate.  This is called a double boiler, and all the fine chocolatiers use this method when melting chocolate.  

While that’s going, beat the egg whites and optional vanilla extract in a mixing bowl with a whisk until it thickens.  Add the chocolate slowly to the egg whites while continuing to beat.  Spoon it into glasses and put them in the refrigerator to cool until firm.

There are more complicated recipes out there for chocolate mousse, but those are the basics.  If you want a more intricate dessert, stay tuned for the next installment of Player Approved Cooking.  We’ll be doing something with rum and fire.  

Fuck a diva, and fuck a restaurant.  This has been Player Approved Cooking. 

EDIT: Formatting. Also, if you make any of these, post pictures!",pickup
MANVENTURE~~XMP'S LOADOUT... what?,"Adventures are infinitely more enjoyable when you bring the right things with you, and leave the rest at home. I'm running through my packing list, and figure I might as well make a post.

For the dude's that are interested in what I'm taking on this three month venture into the unknown, I've put together my [loadout.](http://i.imgur.com/oO0kq.jpg)

_____
**1:**

* My trusty [GR1](http://www.goruck.com/products-page/rucksacks/gr1/) and [Brick Bag](http://www.goruck.com/products-page/accessories/brick-bag/) from the dudes over at [GoRuck.](http://i.imgur.com/oO0kq.jpg) Jason, the founder, is on some straight man shit. After being disappointed in the bags given to him during his time serving in the special forces, he decided to give bag making a go. They're indestructible, minimal, and comfortable. I don't leave home without mine. I'm hoping we get a chance to hang with Jason on our cross country adventure, he embodies masculinity, and is an awesome dude.

* So far as use is concerned, everything should fit in my GR1. I'm going to use my brick bag to separate my clean stuff from the rest, or get my dirty stuff compartmentalized as it pops up. Another bonus is using it as a go bag for daily bullshit, so I don't have to huff my main pack around. I have a feeling we're going to be getting into some wilderness wildness, and the brick bag will function great for a quick bouldering trek, or a few hours in the gym. Stinky shoes, gym clothes, etc, suck... and the stuff sack is nice to get those things away from your cleans.
* Beyond that I foresee some nights spent under the stars, so I might be taking advantage of the stuff sack for my sleeping bag. The cool thing about the shit over at goruck is that it integrates, so affixing the brickbag to the gr1 is easy with the available molle webbing on both. Anyways, /tacticool.

______
**2:** 

* I know everyone around here is hype on kindle and reading pirated pdfs. But I think there's something awesome about having a book in hand. I won't tell you what it is exactly I'm bringing with me, but if I finish it before I meet anyone of you along the way, I'm down to trade. Trading books is a cool way to keep growing your mind, and also find out about other people. It's an interesting custom I've picked up from travelling lots.

_____
**3:**

* The tech stuff: as moderators of the sub, and dudes on a mission to help spread the good word digitally, I gotta bring the mobile battle station. This setup has been working well for me in Montreal, and I see no need to change it. 

* Late 2011 [13'' MacBook Air](http://www.apple.com/ca/macbookair/features.html), nuff said. 

* [Bose MIE2i Headphones.](http://www.bose.ca/controller?url=/shop_online/headphones/audio_headphones/in_ear_headphones/index.jsp?model=mie2i_headset) (Gotta keep the real talks going, gotta cut the Sauce every Sunday. Figure this will be a good compromise on listening to tunes late at night, skypin', and maybe even catching up on some ebooks.)

* [Magic Mouse](http://www.apple.com/magicmouse/)

* [SuperDrive](http://store.apple.com/us/product/MC684ZM/A) (The purple destroyer doesn't have a line in for audio, so we're doin it oldschool with CDs. This badboy is saving the day for burning shit on the fly when we just HAVE to hear that [90s RnB song](http://youtu.be/kwEZRPkAAu8) we've had stuck in our heads. How else will be practice for the multiple month karaoke bender we're about to embark on?)

* [Wireless Keyboard](http://www.apple.com/keyboard/)

_____
**4:**

* Fitness is important to me, so I plan on training as much as possible. I don't see why travelling should be anything but an excuse to get even more jacknasty.

* A rashguard that should double as a layer in case we run into any cold nights.

* Thai shorts and wrestling shoes, good to hit the gym in, or to lounge in while waiting for my laundry to dry. Extra socks and underwear tucked into my wrestling shoes.

_____
**5:**

* I think clothes can make the man, that being said I think it's important that the stuff you wear suits you, makes you feel comfortable, and is capable of being lived in. I really dig nice stuff, but nice to me means quality, durability, and functionality--with an aesthetic as a touch linking all three things.

* [Self Edge](http://www.selfedge.com) is an ill shop run by a badass dude named Kiya. Kiya loves denim, and I've been a big follower of the shit that's gone on with him for quite some time. I really like the quality products he puts out, it just vibes well with the background I come from--working dudes, doing working shit, wearing the things that work best. Also, motorcycle swag--xmp trivia: I was raised in multiple motorcycle club houses, and was always around bikers as a kid. And that shit still resonates with me, I love to ride--and the shit I wear should be capable of being rode in.

* [Iron Heart Super Black Rider's Jacket:](http://www.selfedge.com/shop/index.php?main_page=product_info&amp;cPath=71&amp;products_id=554) I love this fucking jacket. The fit is gnarly, and at 22oz it can really take a fucking beating. The leather zipper pulls are dope, and have worn in nice. Hopefully this catches any stray bullets, and keeps me safe for manventure. Also, I've heard some rumors that some of my homeboys in SF want to ride, so I have to have something I can hit the streets in if I can cop a lender bike.

* [SE x FH x RJB Boom Time Casino Heavyweight Cotton Tshirt:](http://www.selfedge.com/shop/index.php?main_page=product_info&amp;cPath=68&amp;products_id=732) I don't know if anyone has noticed, but I love this fucking shirt. The weight is on point, and the loopwheeled sleeves and collar make sure that nothing gets out of whack. You might accidentally get a bloody nose taking it off, but at least the neck will keep it's shape. I was stabbed in this shirt, and the shirt didn't even flinch.

* [Martino's Riding Boots:](http://www.martinofootwear.com/EN/Products/index.html) I wanted to get my RedWing's resoled so that they didn't have that gnarly vibram shit going on, but couldn't find anyone to do it. So I checked out this leather shop here in Montreal and this dude sold me on these Martino riding boots. They're so fucking comfortable, apparently the swat team rocks them here. He tried to get me to walk out in the combat edition, but I couldn't stomach it. That being said, he promises that they're invincible. And will take manventure style abuse. It's nice, they lace up for fit, and sidezip for comfort. The pricepoint was dope too, because they're made here locally--I must say, I've worn hella boots in my day and they're the most comfortable pair I've owned. 

* [RJB Waffle Summer Shirt](http://www.selfedge.com/shop/index.php?main_page=product_info&amp;cPath=76&amp;products_id=721) My boy Thomas at the NYC SE hooked me up with this shirt a while back, and I love the shit out of it. The waffle flannel breathes, so it's nice in warmer weather when I want to rock something with sleeves. It also layers nicely under my riding jacket, which is nice. I figure I can't look like a total scumbag all the time, so it's coming along for the ride. As a nice little detail, it has black cast iron buttons. Japanese do it right.

* Like I said, I'm really into denim. So I'll spare you my [Iron Heart's](http://www.selfedge.com/shop/index.php?main_page=index&amp;cPath=71) history. These jeans better be fucking white again by the time I get to SleezCon.

* Dope ass handmade leather belt from [Nick at LeatherHead in Kentucky](http://www.theleatherhead.com/). He has done tooling for Orlando Bloome, Johnny Depp, and Hunter S. Thompson, god rest his soul. This thing has broken in great, I see no reason to get a new belt now.

_____

**6:**

* My glasses from [Moscot.](http://www.moscot.com/) These things are ehhh, alright. I like them, but they could be a bit more robust, like, I'm always worried I'm going to fuck them up. Whatever, have to bring them.

* THESE [SICK AS FUCK FLAMES ON THE SIDE IRIDIUM TINTED OAKLEYS FROM THE 90s](http://cdn.sulitstatic.com/images/2011/0724/17360220_173446654a205accab9c04ae9adac26dce8c51e23c6c7a64e.jpg). SO FUCKING SICK CANT WAIT TO STYLE AKA PROFILE IN THESE BAD BOYS. MYSTERY WATCH OUT, MY PEACOCKING IS OVER900000000.

* We're planning to get down and dirty, whether I'm going to be working with tools, moving shit, or belaying, I want to keep my paws useable. These ua shooting/movement gloves have kept me on the better half of things for a long time. Unfortunately I don't think they're made anymore. The next pair I cop, will definitely be from [Hatch.](http://www.tacticaldistributors.com/apparel/gloves/operator-tactical)

_____
**7:**

* Toiletries can make or break a trip. Even though they're easy to get, for the most part--there are some crucial things I'd like to have with me immediately. 

* Deodorant, hella important when you're crammed in a car with a bunch of dudes getting gnarly. [Dove](http://www.amazon.com/Dove-Clinical-Protection-Original-Clean/dp/B001ECQ56Q) kills it, this clinical protection stuff is HEAVY DUTY.

* Speaking of heavy duty, I like to keep my long hair out of my face or handled, and slicking it back is a good option. [Murray's](http://murrayspomade.com/) won't come out for at least a week or two. I don't even know why I'm bringing the whole tin, I just probably just scoop out something into a film canister. But fuck it, I've got the room to spare--and I'm not huffing my load, so this beautiful orange bastard is making the trip with us. Hopefully I can convert everyone else in the car, and we all use it, together, forever. &lt;3

______
**TL:DR:** LOOK MA! I'M GOING AROUND THE COUNTRY WITH 1 OUTFIT, AND A BACKPACK FULL OF STUFF...


",pickup
[FR] Introduction and first day approaches from a total newbie (long read),"So, first of all, I'm a 23 year old virgin who recently realized how totally messed up and unsocial his life is. Dated 3 girls in my whole life using online dating and nothing more. So, now that I fixed my shape (-55lbs followed by heavy calisthenics routines resulting in ABS becoming visible) I decided to fix my social anxiety. 

So, after deciding that ""today I will talk to at least one girl"", I went on a hunt.

**FR, Day 1**: 

I was wondering for over 4 hours trying to concentrate on my task. Missed several nice opportunities simply by getting scared of talking. Then, there was **APPROACH ONE (success)**:

HB6 sitting all by herself in a coffee shop eating slice of cake and talking on a phone. Well, a thought of just sitting near her and wait for her to end her call bursted in my mind, but I was not sure if that was good kind of action. So I kept a safe distance waiting for her to finish her call for about 10 minutes. Afterwise I simply walked to her, sat on the nearby chair and said ""You don't mind if I sit here?"".

Me: You don't mind if I sit here? (big smile)

She: Not at all (big smile).

Me: So I've noticed you looked bored so I decided to join you. Are you waiting for someone?

She: Yeah, waiting for my mom, she should be back in like 10 minutes (horray, a natural timeframe, I even forgot about telling her my timeframe).

Me: Ah, I see. Well, I want to familiarize(translation problem: missing english word) with you, I'm Max (handshake).

She: I'm HB6, nice to meet you. 

... some smalltalk about her education, her desire to get to some other country after finishing her bachelor and other random stuff. I keep a calm soft tone for the whole conversation (It's one of my natural ones) with a lots of eye-locking. Then her mom calls ...

She: My mom's gonna be here any minute now, I have to go.

Me: It was nice talking to you, how about we do that again sometime?

She: Yeah, that would be nice.

Me: I wonder how could we make it happen? (I've found that phrase somewhere among this subreddit, also tried to make a wondering tone of voice, I think with success)

She: Mmm, emm (confused eyes)... Well, I could give you my phone number (Horray, a **first successful #-close**).

... took out phone, wrote down the number by myself (had a thought of giving my phone to her, but she was already standing and in a hurry so it didn't seem appropriate) ...

Me: And what would be your surname (Also phrase found somewhere here)?

She: You are even writing down the surname (confused look)?

Me: Well, otherwise it will be hard to find you in my addressbook (I guess this phrase is ok, is it?). 

She: (tells me her surname, runs away).

**Mindnotes:** It was kind of too easy. Not sure if that's because she was a HB6, or just because she was a talkative kind, or because it HAS to be that easy, but I had to do almost nothing at all. I just sat there, threw some random comments and questions, which led to a pretty natural conversation and then a number-close. Forgot to mention my own timeframe at the beginning. Also no kino is bad. Also I wonder if it would be ok to sit near her during her phonecall (any advice?).

**APPROACH TWO (failure):** Some business-lady style HB7. Probably most of guys would rate her HB9 or even HB10, she was pretty, expensive clothes and so on, but as she is not my kind of HB, she only got HB7. Anyway, she was sitting on the opposite bench from me with her friend talking on the phone. The phonecall was pretty negative, some problems of sorts, but HB7 looked like she was uninvolved, so I decided to approach.

Me: Hello, while your friend is busy on the phone, I'd like to familiarize(translation problem again) with you.

She: (""who the hell are you?"" look, followed by an excited look, followed by a cold-smile and a neutral look) Oh, hello, I'm HB7 (handshake).

Me: Sorry, I'm not used to talking to girls like this. And my face is probably all red now.

She: Yes... it is. (her friend finishes the call) Sorry, I'm kind of in a hurry and need to go, bye.

Me: Bye.

**Mindnotes:** The ""Sorry, I'm not used to talking to girls like this"" sounded pretty stupid, had to finish it with the main part ""But I found you attractive and had to say hi"". Also, I don't think I had any chance, I hoped the phonecall would last longer - her friend really did look like in a hurry.

**APPROACH THREE (failure):** HB9 buying perfumes in a trouble of choosing the one she likes. Approached:

Me: Seems like you have a problem with making a decision, need help?

She: Well, I can't find the one that's good. (almost no eyecontact at all from her side)

Me: Well, I think you could use a man's taste here.

She: (smirks) Heh, ""man's taste""? Well, have a go (hands me pieces of perfume papers to smell)

... Some neutral comments from my side on each perfume. She mostly ignores my comments and makes almost no eyecontact at all busy smelling the perfume. Then she pays for it, walks out ignoring me. I tell her that I'd like to know her better (probably translation error), she says that she's in a hurry. ...

**Mindnotes:** Probably should've ejected at the beginning, when she failed to show any sign of interest or even eyecontact me.

End of report of day one. Even one number-close resulted in huge boost to self-confidence. Going to try some more tommorow. Thanks for listening, thanks in advance for commenting. Have a nice day.

**Added:** Also, I think I've found my strong side: intonation and pacing of the speech. It seemed pretty easy to change it to whatever I liked with desired results. Have to concentrate on that when I start reading TOK.",pickup
[FR] Approaching Rampage,"Alrighty so I am fairly decent with the PAM opener, very good with indirect openers, so I figure I get better at the PAM opener. Saturday night my roommate and I decided that we wanted to go watch the UFC fight, have a couple beers, then go out to our standard club.

**TL:DR at the end**

**9 pm**

We want to get the bar showing the fight fairly early so we can get a table and just chill for a bit. We get there and it is already packed, so I approach these two guys and see if we can join them at their six-top they are currently sitting in. They are fine with it so we join them. My roommate and I order a round, and get some fries. About 15 min later a couple shot girl promoters come up and ask us if we want a free shot. Since I can't say no to free alcohol I oblige, I start talking to one she seems pretty cool, but she has a job to do so she doesn't spend much time worrying about conversation. She moves on.

About 15 min later the two guys leave and a couple comes over and sits at our table. We start shmoozing it up with them, doing the standard intro where are you from, what do you do non-sense, next thing you know we are taking shots.

I am starting to get into state, my roommate is aswell, we order two more rounds finish those off and head to the club.

**11pm**

By this time I am in state and ready to approach anyone. So I start talking to everyone around me. Introduce myself to this one HB9 and her friend HB4. I pull the HB9 out to the dance floor, while the HB4 sits off to the side. We are dancing we are getting pretty into it, but then the HB4 just comes over and pulls her into the back bar. I'm like....what...the...fuck. I say whatever and go back to my roommate at the bar.

I turn around and see a fairly attractive two-set. I walk over and indirect open again. Turns out this two set was a mom + daughter combo. The daughter went off to dance while I was talking to the mom for a bit. I got her to blush a couple times. However, when I realized that it was a mom I just switch my frame from sexual to friendly. She asks how old I think she is, I say she looks 35. She gives a big smile and says shes 43. I tell her she looks really young/attractive for 43, kiss her hand, tell her to have a good night, and eject.

Head back to my roommate, we start talking, he can't seem to find anyone he really wants to approach. I shrug and tell him just talk to random people get your social momentum going and see where it takes you. 

**12am**

I look behind me and I see this 3 set of girls, HB9, HB6, HB5 who are currently being chatted up by these three guys, but they do not look into it. The guys made the mistake just talking to HB9 rather than including the whole group in the conversation. I point this out to my roommate and go watch this. I wait for the group of guys to be shoved off as expected, and make my move. I walk up introduce myself to the HB5, then the HB6, then the HB9 in that order. I set the friendly frame on the first two, sexual on the HB9. I PAM the HB9, tell her she reminds me of Lady Gaga for some reason (she was a pretty indie chick). The comment apparently made her night, because she apparently really likes her style.

After talking to the girl for like 3 minutes the three-set of guys from earlier come over with drinks for the girls. They give them to the girls and I body block them by turning my back to them while holding eye contact with the HB9. They realized they just got AMOGd and they move on. I bring my roommate over who has been watching this and introduce him to the group. HB5 and HB6 seem to take a liking to him so it works out in my favor. I get my alone time with HB9, he gets to build his social momentum.

One thing leads to another, and we end up at the bar ordering more drinks, having a good time. I try to do the handshake induction on HB9, but fail miserably because I was a tad sloppy, I recover by using the ""Ring Game"" and great success was great success. She apparently had an interest in mythology and was very impressed by what I knew.

**2am**

Last Call happens sooner than expected(dat timewarp) and we start to head out, HB9 in hand. We walk outside and its raining. I take this chance to have one hell of an anchor for later. Turns out she lives like two blocks down from me so we are heading in the same direction. We are walking, and then I just pull her and I get that k-close in the rain. We are making out for like 5 minutes in the street when her friends start calling her. She gives me her number, and tells me to text her later in the week to hang.

Overall this night was one of my more approach heavy nights. I do have to say I am exponentially more comfortable with the PAM, and plan on using it on Wednesday at this sorority birthday party thing.

**TL:DR**

I went into the night wanting to get more comfortable with the PAM. Opened on a substantial amount of females to perfect my openings.
PAM'd HB9, got that k and # close.",pickup
[FR] First day game,"This is my first day game FR.


Today, my wingman and I prowled the local mall. We walked slow and discussed last night's clubbing with our group. We discussed kino, linguistics, what we think we did right/wrong, etc.


We went to the food court and spotted a blonde HB7 sit a table behind us by herself. After talking a bit, I decided to throw out my trash+tray and do it. I was going to approach her and sit down at her table. And I fucking did it.

Me: I saw you sitting by yourself and thought I'd join you. Hi, I'm PoundPickupFR (with a big smile)

At this point, she was caught off guard and it showed on her face...then she smiled. She was still chewing her food and introduced herself.

Her: Hi, my name is Rachel.

Me: So this mall food court has really changed. It's a lot more upscale than it used to be and there aren't as many food options.

Her: Yeah, there definitely aren't many food options here.

Me: Are you on your lunch break?

Her: Yes.

Me: Where do you work?

From this point on, I realized that I was asking her non-stop questions. ..almost like I'm interviewing her. After realizing this, I tried to mix in the questions with statements. I asked where she went to school (same university I graduated from). I wasn't getting many IOIs and for the most part, I felt like I had to keep asking her questions to keep her talking to me. I noticed at one point her arms were crossed, which I understand is closed off body language/a bad thing. 

Not many minutes later, she had to go back to work and I said I'd see her around.

Lessons learned: 

1. I had a lot more AA thinking about doing the approach. Once the approach was over, I wasn't as nervous. Just fucking do it.


2. Back to back questioning/interview style. Asking back to back questions can become standard/boring IMO. What school do you go? Where do work? What do you like to do?

3. Indirect vs direct approach. This day game was an indirect approach (I believe) and I still want to try a more direct approach as taught here by XMP.



~PoundPickupFR",pickup
Picnic Day [FR] - #-close x2,"Today was Picnic Day. The day where a town full of college kids takes to the streets for a drunken party. Started the day at a friend's house for the pregame. Beer pong ensues. Suddenly an HB 7 and an HB 8 show up and ask to use our bathroom. I see one of my homies taking an interest in the HB 8, I tell him he should invite the two to stay for drinks. They do, and he ends up #-closing her. We all decide to take off and hit the main event.

I'm walking down the street with a fairly good sized group, and I see a solid dime coming in the other direction with her friend. She passes by and I turn to my buddies and ask them to hold up for a bit. I run after her, get her attention and PAM open. She's totally @_@ and just kind of stands there with her mouth hanging open. Not wanting to waste a good opportunity, I say ""I mean, I couldn't just let you walk by without taking a chance to come meet you, because you're so beautiful I started getting hella nervous, and I knew I just had to come talk to you. My name's PopeFool.""

HB10: ""I'm Hannah Hooked""

Pope: ""Look, you seem cool, but I can't really hang out. I've got to get back to my friends, and I'd really like to get to know you some time. Would you like to meet up for lunch this week?""

HB10: ""Um... I don't know. I'm really drunk.""

Pope: ""How about this, if you give me your number, I can call you tomorrow when you're sober, and you can decide then. Does that sound fair?""

HB10: ""Sure.""

I hand her my phone and she puts in her info. I tell her it was nice meeting her, and I bounce back to my friends. They're staring at me in utter shock and disbelief, since none of them have ever seen me cold approach before. One of the girls we were with (HB9) proceeds to attach herself to my hip for the rest of the day. Ended up #-closing her and setting up logistics for a day 2 this week.

Most of the rest of the day is spent wandering around, gaming the one chick who came out with us, and running some intermittent text game on a # I got earlier in the week. I've got several options for parties tonight, so after a couple of hours of chillax time, round two begins.",pickup
[FR] Club night out,"Here is my very first FR, so bare with me as I try to make this as detailed as possible. :D


Last night, my one friend met up at my apartment early. We watched some Simple Pickup and it really got our heads in the zone to talk to girls. I told myself that I wanted to do as many approaches as possible that night and embrace/learn from the rejection.


An hour later, my bros come over and we roll out to pickup the girls at their place. These girls are all roommates, except for one girl who is a cousin of one of them. I'd say HB4, HB5 (has a bf), HB6, and HB7. When we got there, none of us had met HB7 yet and it was pretty agreed that she was the prize pig in the looks department. We split up into 2 cars (8 people) and rolled out to the club.


In my car, it's one of my bros and HB4,6,7. HB5 is in my friends car with two other bros. Anyway, one the way we and my buddy talks with them about some Draw Something game they were playing on their phone. HB4 talks about some guys she's been dating and HB6 says she dumps the ones that are too ""nice"". We crack a joke about the truth coming out about what women really want.


We arrive at the club and valet our cars. At this point, it was minutes before 12 and the free guest list I got us on was about to expire, so we hustled.


Inside the club is actually two sides...electronic side and more pop/hip-hop side. We all head straight for the bar. One of my bros (my wingman actually) is sitting down with HB6 and HB7. As he's talking with HB6, I sit down next to HB7 and start talking with her. In a typical loud club environment, I move in closer and talk into her ear when I talk. We shoot the shit about our careers. She asks how old I am and I reply with 26. She's 21 and says something like wow..you're older. So I play with that and say that I forgot my cane and I need her to hold me while we're dancing so I don't fall. She goes to the bar to get another drink while HB4 sits down next to me and we sit-dance. I BS about her cosmo that she needs to drink it with her pinky out and be fancy.


Jump to the dance floor of both clubs. Dancing started out physically mild until on my buddies (actually the one one of us with a girlfriend LOL) starts grinding on HB7. This just leads all of us to grinding/swapping the HBs back and forth. Towards the end of the night it became very evident that HB6 liked grinding/dancing with me. We isolated our dancing from our group for a second and she kept digging her nails into my back, a little nibbling on my chest. I kept smiling and had a real sly look when we exchanged glances. I eventually nibbled on her ear and she went CRAZY. She moved my hands to start groping her tits and ass. She grabbed my dick and started jerkin a little....DAMN. I didn't go in for the kiss when I had plenty of opportunities to. I wasn't ready to make that commitment I guess because HB5 (the one with a BF and her roomie) is actually a friend of mine.


We all ended the night eating at a restaurant very close. When we dropped the girls off, HB6 said for me to keep in touch. On the way home, I texted her something along the lines of ""those were some mighty fine dance moves ;)"". She replies with ""you weren't bad yourself sir ;-)"".


Conclusion. I definitely did not stick to my original plan of banging out a lot of approaches. I only stuck with the group of girls I invited out, but I still had a really good time. Open to comments/criticism/questions from all. Cheers.",pickup
